_	Baltimore, having fallen into disarray, was replaced by New York City in 1903, for the reason that the new league would not be totally respected and have "major league" status without a team in the nation's largest city.
_	The communist regime cited this incident as the reason that the Romanian fleet was seized.
_	Luke Gelineau of "TV Equals" wrote "Oh, so this is the reason that we've had this annoying character on this show for the last nine episodes!
_	The schooling behaviour of herring is largely the reason that many can survive these predation events.
_	For his merits during the war of resistance, in 1258 the Emperor Trần Thái Tông decided to grant Lê Phụ Trần a marriage with the former empress Lý Chiêu Hoàng who was downgraded to princess Chiêu Thánh after the 1237 event in which Lý Chiêu Hoàng was forced by grand chancellor Trần Thủ Độ to give up the position of Empress Consort of the Trần Dynasty for her elder sister Thuận Thiên, for the reason that she could not give birth to a child for Trần Thái Tông.
_	Drug impaired driving is today suspected by the European Road Safety Observatory of being the reason that drink driving crash rates no longer reduce in direct proportion to reducing or plateaued numbers of drunk drivers found on roads.
_	She stated that the reason that she was hired was to compete against the then-local NBC affiliate, KYW-TV, which had just hired its first African American woman reporter, Trudy Haynes.
_	In 1943 he protested that "The Holy See would fail in its Divine Mandate if it did not deplore these measures, which gravely damage man in his natural right, mainly for the reason that these people belong to a certain race."
_	He presented credentials on December 5, 1887, as a Senator-designate to the United States Senate for the term commencing March 4, 1887, but was not permitted to qualify for the reason that the appointment was made before the vacancy occurred.
_	Disputes over prize money were widely held as the reason that Jervis and Grey were not awarded peerages for their service.
_	It is not clear if the elevation of Nzambi a Mpungu to the status of creator god and equivalent to the Christian God by priests and missionaries was the reason that he is regarded as such by modern Kongo cosmology, or whether he was always considered the creator.
_	The good conservation of the farms is the reason that 12 of them are included in the special Plan of protection of the historical heritage of Badalona.
_	But only "differences" in potential are physically measurable, which is the reason that a voltmeter must have two probes, and can only report the voltage difference between them.
_	Later on, she said the reason that she is mayor now is because her son had many projects including the completion of the PUP San Juan Campus and the completion of the new San Juan City Hall which she wanted to see finished.
_	"Being so good is what led to making the movie, and it's also the reason that many small-screen episodes are better than this big-screen venture."
_	The stability of helium-4 is the reason that hydrogen is converted to helium-4, and not deuterium (hydrogen-2) or helium-3 or other heavier elements during fusion reactions in the Sun.
_	The Allahabad High court in 2013, restrained Government of Uttar Pradesh from continuing the reservation for Ahir, Yadav, Yaduvanshi and Gwala stating the reason that representation of these OBC communities in government services has reached to 59.67 percent.
_	This was the reason that despite a lack of schooling, straight after his confirmation, Augustinussen was employed as the communal school teacher by pastor Krogh.
_	i.e. the reason that physicists observe a universe with such a small cosmological constant is that no physicists (or any life) could exist in a universe with a larger cosmological constant.
_	Cold nitrogen is a better medium than hot nitrogen, and this appears to be part of the reason that the pulse energy and power drop as the repetition rate increases to more than a few pulses per second.
_	Part of the reason that "The Vampire Bat" looked almost as good as any Universal Pictures horror film is because Majestic leased James Whale's castoffs, the “German Village” backlot sets left over from "Frankenstein" (1931) and the interior sets from his film "The Old Dark House" (1932), plus some location shooting at Bronson Caves.
_	Thus, the reason that all were killed except for Toussaint was because they screamed upon seeing the creature, and it killed them in order to stop the noise, just as the original "kurrshuq" did in 1958.
_	This is the reason that there are helix vectors which exactly correspond to the maxima of the two components.
_	This is the reason that the figures look into the interior of the park, so that they can say farewell to the guests.
_	Theismann's injury was highlighted in the film "The Blind Side" as the reason that, after the quarterback, one of the highest paid football players is the left tackle, who protects a righthanded quarterback's blind side.
_	She was adopted by a Turkish Muslim family in the World War I. Fear is the reason that Ayshe never spoke of her ethnic past again.
_	He taught that the reason that mankind is on earth is to progress, and that this life is but a single step in our eternal progression, and part of the Plan of Salvation.
_	This is the reason that these rivers never have a shortage of water.
_	The gang of the taverna soon turns against Mary, for the reason that she alters the character of the neighbourhood.
_	This fact is in large part the reason that the Schaus are at high risk of endangerment.
_	Behind these Murlens Abbey and Ringa Hustle had encountered trouble with the connections of Murlens Abbey publicly criticising the rails seeding of Ringa Hustle as the reason that both greyhounds had been knocked out.
_	This is for the reason that toxic materials such as plastic additives that can disrupt the physiological development of children (e.g., malformed genitals for boys, early onset of puberty for girls) are present in the toy.
_	Monty J. Ellsworth said in his eyewitness account "The Bath School Disaster" that he thought that this rejection was the reason that Kehoe had planned his "murderous revenge" of the bombings, to destroy the school and kill the community's children and many of its members.
_	According to Ubisoft, they stated the reason that "Due to the expiration of licensing rights over certain military items within the game, "R.U.S.E." is no longer available for purchase".
_	Even if Parmenian proved more extreme than Ticonius, he can be considered a relatively moderate Donatist for the reason that he did not require the rebaptism of all converts, but only those who had received their first baptism as Catholics.
_	This approach is semiclassical for the reason that scattering mechanisms are treated quantum mechanically using the Fermi's Golden Rule, whereas the transport between scattering events is treated using the classical particle notion.
_	This is also the reason that plants stand upright.
_	But co-producer Aamir Khan replaced them with her, giving the reason that they charged too much money for the film's budget.
_	The nutritional poverty of the soil is the reason that the plant relies on such elaborate traps: insect prey provide the nitrogen for protein formation that the soil cannot.
_	She noted that there was no "1234" on the album, which is the reason that "it feels like such a refreshing and slyly badass statement of artistic integrity" and also that "it doesn't reach The Reminder's heights."
_	However, he had backed out from poll race citing the reason that he was convinced by the Central BJP leaders not to contest and that he himself had acknowledged the work of PM Narendra Modi.
_	The same idea for educating young girls was the reason that they were educating mothers, the girls would grow up to be mothers and have an influence on the lives of Mexican Americans in and outside the household.
_	He had many bad habits like drinking and that was the reason that he was replaced by his younger brother as the king of Mahishmati.
_	Pointing out that the reason that she had retained her position with the Christian Democratic Union group on the Neuenhagen council was that she was the one who had always attracted the votes in local elections (""Ich habe immer die Stimmen geholt""), she again stood as a candidate for the local council in the 2008 municipal elections, now representing the "New Neuenhagen Citizen's Alliance" (""Neue Bürger Allianz Neuenhagen"" /NBA).
_	This 24/7 policy was seen as the reason that gave 7-Eleven its edge over its competitors.
_	It was also included in the 2011 list of the best violent video games of all time by "The Daily Telegraph" for the reason that "few games have ever been so keen to have their protagonists murder civilians, burning them with flamethrowers, blowing them up with rocket launchers and simply mowing them down."
_	This is perhaps part of the reason that the idea has endured since its conception in the 1970s.
_	Roughly 15 years later, between the release of the CD-ROM game "Monty Python's Complete Waste of Time" in 1994, which used many of Gilliam's animation templates, and the making of Gilliam's film "Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas" (1998), Gilliam was in negotiations with Enteractive, a software company, to tentatively release in the autumn of 1996 a CD-ROM under the same title as his 1978 book, containing all of his thousands of 1970s animation templates as license-free clip arts for people to create their own flash animations, but the project hovered in limbo for years, probably because Enteractive was about to downsize greatly in mid-1996 and changed its focus from CD-ROM multimedia presentations to internet business solutions and web hosting in 1997 (in the introduction to their 2004 book "Terry Gilliam: Interviews", David Sterrit and Lucille Rhodes claimed that the internet had overwhelmed the "computer-communications market" and gave this as the reason that the "Animations of Mortality" CD-ROM never materialised).
_	On the last days of October 2017, the deputy of Cortés Luis Redondo has decided to join as deputy of the Innovation and Unity party, based on the reason that he won´t be a member of the Anticorruption party led by congresswoman Marlene Alvarenga.
_	Without this light man is blind and the historical process, in the last analysis, is an impenetrable mystery; with it, man may see a little way at least into the reason that lies hidden."
_	She tells the reason that on her way, an accident happened on the road in which her sister's husband's relative Devashish Mukherji died.
_	In this case, the reason that C's stack behavior is part of the runtime system, as opposed to part of a keyword of the language, is that it is systematic, maintaining the state of the stack throughout a program's execution.
_	Although double-hulled tankers reduce the likelihood of ships grazing rocks and creating holes in the hull, a double hull does not protect against major, high-energy collisions or groundings which cause the majority of oil pollution, despite this being the reason that the double hull was mandated by United States legislation.
_	This was the reason that Ferizaj for a period of thirty years become the city with about 400 houses and 200 shops.
_	The red color of the hill is the reason that it was called Chengode.
_	In 1985, he noted that he had stopped working for all British publishers except IPC, publishers of "2000 AD", "purely for the reason that IPC so far have avoided lying to me, cheating me or generally treating me like shit."
_	Thus physiological interaction of Na1.7 and Na1.8 can explain the reason that PE presents with pain due to hyperexcitability of nociceptors and with sympathetic dysfunction that is most likely due to hypoexcitability of sympathetic ganglion neurons.
_	The federal government stated that the reason that it sought this harsh punishment was because of the comedy movie "Up In Smoke" trivialized the government's anti-drug efforts.
_	The build up of cryoprotective compounds is the reason that insects can experience cold hardening.
_	(A statement from a band spokesman cites the issue as the reason that Tennant ceased his well-publicized support of Tony Blair's Labour Party.)
_	This along with the local noise sensitivity, is part of the reason that prior permission to land is required before planning of any trip to the airfield.
_	According to him, children were the reason that he and others were working toward socialism.
_	This perhaps is the reason that Dirk, unlike his forefathers, was not buried at Egmond, but at Rijnsburg.
_	Eventually, the bill was not passed but a similar bill was introduced in March 2010 and the reason that was put forth again was the protection of Kashmiri identity and the fear of demographic change.
_	Secondly, CAMI has a local organization division, called the Community Concerts Division, whose main purpose is to organize and upkeep hundreds of nonprofit organizations ("Community Concert Associations") for the reason that some communities are too small to support professional managers and producers.
_	Her gifts on her death were quite substantial, and are the reason that the hofje was to last for so many centuries, despite later upheavals in the Haarlem Mennonite community.
_	Apparently, Balan was her bully back when they were in school, and she was also the reason that the whole school ended up hating him and calling him a Loser.
_	Part of the reason that many women are without birth control is that many countries limit access due to religious or political reasons, while another contributor is poverty.
_	Hindemith revised both the score and the text, for the reason that, according to Ian Kemp, the musical idiom "seemed crude and undisciplined".
_	In 2005 an outdoor music and dance performance in Qalqiliya was suddenly banned by the Hamas led municipality, for the reason that such an event would be forbidden by Islam.
_	This belief in a cosmic duality was likely the reason that led to the exclusion of Veles from Vladimir's official temple in Kiev.
_	This is the reason that the building was named this temple " Wat Chan ascetic ".
_	This is the reason that Claudia Christian, who had left the show prior to the fifth season, appears in the series finale.
_	This is likely the reason that they are one of the later warblers to appear in spring migration, after one or more short overwater flights and a relatively prolonged movement overland after through North America anytime from early May to mid-June.
_	This was contested by DCA as quite misleading giving the reason that a firm cannot be selected to administer a domain that has not yet been delegated.
_	Gibson asserted that the reason that king Edward I kills his son's lover is because the king is a "psychopath".
_	The club initially adopted Melbourne rules, but soon switched to Rugby rules "principally for the reason that the clubs in adjoining provinces play under those rules, and as the club contemplate playing a match with the Nelson club before long the necessity of such a course is apparent."
_	After Olens claimed that the reason that protesting cheerleaders were kept off the field during the National Anthem had nothing to do with their protest, contradicting email messages came to light, including one from Ehrhart to a local sheriff that Olens "had to be dragged there but with you and I pushing he had no choice.
_	The two actresses stated that part of the reason that they chose to act in the film was because their characters were atypical to how they were traditionally cast, as Lyonne is usually cast as a "trainwreck" while Greer was usually the "levelheaded" character.
_	Atheists and non-Offlians are suspicious of this claim, although Moist von Lipwig commented that this could be the reason that frying sausages always smell more appetising than they actually taste.
_	All delegated legislation may therefore be directly tested against the Bill of Rights for this reason, and for the reason that the Bill of Rights applies to “all law.
_	Others have argued that the reason that humans have a duty to protect other humans from predation is because humans are part of the cultural world rather than the natural world and so different rules apply to them in these situations.
_	Lali's happiness receives a blow when Frank's former sweetheart tells her the reason that he had married her.
_	This is the reason that some crystals like lithium chloride, potassium chloride, and zinc oxide become pink, lilac and yellow, respectively on heating them.
_	Persister cells are highly enriched in biofilms, and it has been suggested that this is the reason that makes biofilm-related diseases so hard to treat.
_	In 895, by which point Tian was referred to as full military governor of Ningguo, Qian, who then carried the title of military governor of Zhenhai Circuit (鎮海, headquartered at Hang Prefecture by that point), was attacking Qian's former superior Dong Chang the military governor of Weisheng Circuit (威勝, headquartered in modern Shaoxing, Zhejiang), under the reason that Dong had rebelled against the emperor by claiming imperial title himself earlier in the year.
_	It explores the reason that college students may resort to violence.
_	This was the reason that the townsfolk asked for his help to create a cure for the plague.
_	Is this the reason that the word "närä" has been written as "näòä"?
_	This is the reason that nuclear reprocessing is a useful activity: solid spent nuclear fuel contains about 97% of the original fissionable material present in newly manufactured nuclear fuel.
_	The war begins after the collapse of Bhishma when he is on his "Alpaseyam" arrow bed, he calls Karna, says sorry for his action and explains the reason that he has done such thing to protect the piety.
_	Although Tax from HTLV-1 and HTLV-2 can cause cells to become cancerous experimentally, Tax produced by HTLV-2 is less oncogenic than that from HTLV-1 and therefore is thought to be the reason that HTLV-2 is not associated with ATL.
_	Lei Bin had, during the time away from the group, discovered that when Lixia had defeated Chiyou, Chiyou had scattered his body amongst the five orbs, and planted his heart within Lixia, thus allowing his resurrection when Lixia had claimed all five of the orbs; this was the reason that Lixia had been sealed by the Yellow Emperor, who was ultimately unable to separate Chiyou from Lixia, and the reason why Lei Bin wanted to terminate Lixia.
_	APC's antiapoptotic effects are part of the reason that APC is effective in treating sepsis, as reduced levels of apoptosis are correlated with higher survival rates in septic patients.
_	As «hepatic clearance» is an active process it is therefore determined by factors that alter an organism’s metabolism such as the number of functioning hepatocytes, this is the reason that liver failure has such clinical importance.
_	The typical dividend growth stock is rated B plus or higher, for the reason that a company has to be generating a significant amount of free cash flow in order to pay an increasing dividend annually.
_	She desired to express through photography and this is the reason that photography came into her life.
_	When an auto comes, she refrain to enter the auto citing the reason that the auto driver is a stranger.
_	(Au 42) Some argue that Gardel's leadership was the reason that so few notable dancers emerged from the Opera during and in the years that followed his reign.
_	The congee is also called Sanyuan Jidi Congee for the reason that the numbers of its ingredients in each bowl, namely pork balls, pork liver slices and pork intestine slices correspond respectively to the numbers of "Zhuangyuan", "Bangyan" and "Tanhua" .
_	That is the reason that the M55 has no junction 2, because it was reserved for the new western bypass.
_	The implications of this taxonomic split were part of the reason that this species' listing was changed to endangered in 2016 by the IUCN, as it meant that it was not as widespread as previously thought.
_	This was unexpected, as the original strategy was to let Huo Qubing's elite troops deal with Chanyu's elite cavalry (the reason that the two Han columns switched route).
_	All requests by the 2nd Battalion, 310th Infantry to bring artillery fire on the enemy positions were denied for the reason that it was believed that friendly troops from the 2d Battalion, 309th Infantry were in Kesternich.
_	There would be no role for Thomas Parry in the London business, so this is the reason that he left London later in 1788 (source - Thomas Parry Free Merchant by G H Hodgson published 1938), probably as an agreed strategy of the two cousins to expand into India.
_	Fuentes claimed electoral fraud had benefited Árbenz, but scholars have pointed out that while fraud may possibly have given Árbenz some of his votes, it was not the reason that he won the election.
_	Most modern authors fix on aseity (Aseitas; a = "from" se = "himself"), or self-existence; for the reason that, while all other existences are derived from, and depend on, God, He possesses in Himself, absolutely and independently, the entire reason of His uncaused infinite Being.
_	The high nickel content is the reason that they do not develop a Widmanstätten structure, because in this case kamacite can be exsolved from taenite only at such a low temperature (below about 600°C) where diffusion is already too slow.
_	As Leontios Makhairas writes, the reason that Peter could not keep Tripoli was because the city did not have walls.
_	During an interview with Bagri on 28 October 2000, RCMP agents described Surjan Singh Gill as an agent for CSIS, saying the reason that he resigned from the Babbar Khalsa was because his CSIS handlers told him to pull out.
_	As a director, on occasion, if he ran into friction from his star—as was the case with Lou Costello in 1946's "Little Giant"—Seiter would get even by adhering religiously to the script, refusing to add any nuance or creativity to the project (this pettiness may have been the reason that one prominent actress of the 1930s referred to Seiter as the most unimaginative director she'd ever worked with).
_	Hill felt conflicted about his relationship with the Broussard murder, as he felt that he was the reason that the murder had been classified as a hate crime which in turn cause Buice's strict 45 year prison sentencing.
_	There is also another possibility behind the reason that current "pulingaw" practices are female dominated.
_	This is the reason that the Spanish themselves refer to the Way of St. James as "the French road", since most of the pilgrims they saw were French.
_	Which could be the reason that the Boy's Basketball team has won less than 15 games total over the last 8 seasons.
_	Such filter-feeding organisms are the reason that much of the materials we throw in the oceans comes back to us in our food.
_	The combination of this potential evolutionary trait and language-based exact arithmetic may be the reason that humans are able to do advanced mathematics like physics.
_	That afternoon, the two have lunch together to try and reconcile, and Tessa reveals the reason that David left her was because she was having an affair.
_	Then, the village was built in 1903 and named Khawbung due to the reason that the place was the old site of Hmars -Khawbung.
_	This is the reason that all the practical implementations of content-based image retrieval must complete computation of all images from the database, and is the main disadvantage of these implementations.
_	And that is precisely the reason that mathematicians do not assign a single value to formula_10 but rather label it "indeterminate".
_	Another important decision ordered a lighter tax on the Jewish farmer than on the merchant, for the reason that agriculture was less profitable than trade ("Mordecai," B. B. i. 481).
_	A good part of the movie was filmed in the old house for the reason that in the movie hadzi Zamfir lived there and the shooting had to be done there in a good part of the film.
_	This erosion processes is the reason that very few remaining craters are visible on Earth.
_	Jonathan Spence, in a review of the book, speculates that part of the reason that the crime was not solved was that Werner made "a self-insulating cult of his loneliness.
_	These dealings were leaked by the Parliamentarians, primarily for the reason that all political stakeholders in the country strongly opposes coup.
_	Three walls of Wu Liang's shrine were still standing as late as the 11th century, which is the reason that the site of all the family shrines are often called after him.
_	This is the reason that in countries with poor sanitation, human skin is exposed to E.coli strains from faecal matter but it does not usually result in an infection.
_	The Bageshwori pond that is situated within the temple area is also famous among the devotees, specially for the reason that the temple of lord Shiva with mustache stands at the center of it.
_	This is the reason that sometimes Tower 115 is incorrectly regarded as the tallest building in Bratislava.
_	He concluded that the reason that 19th-century glass lacked brilliance was because it was too flat and regular, allowing the light to pass through directly.
_	Cotta's experience at Newnham college are said to be the reason that Crown Princess Victoria chose her over other well qualified candidates to lead the Victoria Lyceum after its founder died.
_	The Men & Boys Choir, which originated during the 19th century, was the reason that the train station in this area was initially constructed - to transport the boys from their homes in Brooklyn or Manhattan to rehearsals and services.
_	Another story sometimes told is that the reason that the clock in Trinity Great Court strikes each hour twice is that the fellows of St John's once complained about the noise it made.
_	She also has vulnerability about her; Newbon said that this was the reason that Walker is attracted to her.
_	In 1914, they built the new bridge just upstream for the reason that it would not have to move much track for better service.
_	Peter is gay when Angel arrives at the school and Storm explains to him that the reason that all the girls "and "maybe" Colossus" stare at him is because he is good looking.
_	This momentum mismatch is the reason that a free-space photon from air cannot couple directly to an SPP.
_	The creators have stated that the reason that the series protagonist Sakura does not return her friend Tomoyo's feelings is not because Tomoyo is another girl as Sakura does not consider sex or gender as barrier for her romantic attraction.
_	It is the reason that drives actions without any sense dependent incentives.
_	I think the reason that my rep is so nasty is that I tend to do it... unexpectedly, or to someone people are recently invested in, and that is a real mission statement for me, because, death doesn't leave a card.
_	When it is changed to the point where nobody even knows Daffy, Witch Lezah (who was unaffected by the time change) sends Daffy back in time to correct it since Rodney is the reason that Bugs first met Daffy.
_	However, during the journey to Luoyang, Emperor Zhaozong tried to slow down the trip with the reason that Empress He had just given birth and could not travel fast — so that he could try to send out secret emissaries to other major warlords Wang Jian the military governor of Xichuan Circuit (西川, headquartered in modern Chengdu, Sichuan), Li Keyong the military governor of Hedong Circuit (河東, headquartered in modern Taiyuan, Shanxi), and Yang Xingmi the military governor of Huainan Circuit (淮南, headquartered in modern Yangzhou, Jiangsu) — to no avail, as Zhu forced him to progress quicker to Luoyang.
_	This article lists notable banned books and works, giving a brief context for the reason that each book was prohibited.
_	This is the reason that Worf's brother Kurn was granted a seat on the council after the 2367 civil war, and was later taken from Kurn when Worf refused Gowron's orders to turn against the Federation in 2372.
_	This design flaw may have been the reason that the tsunami in 2011 led to explosions and fire in Fukushima Daiichi nuclear disaster.
_	At the trial level, Judge Corinne Sparks acquitted the youth, for the reason that the only evidence was the testimony of the officer and the youth, and both had reasonable credibility.
_	Often the reason that business do not analyse their dark data is because of the amount of resources it would take and the difficulty of having that data analysed.
_	The man gives the reason that he wants them killed because they ruined his family.
_	In the exchanges rates between gold-standard countries, these limits were known as the gold points, for the reason that, if the price of foreign bills rose above the upper limits determined by the exchange rate, countries would find it cheaper to export gold than to export bills for the purpose of settling international accounts.
_	He has stated that the name came from a combination of “Aardvark” and “Superman” for the reason that they found aardvark to be a particularly funny word.
_	The Northern boundary of the nunnery is known as the Soul-Mountain of Juniper Forests” (Shug pa’i nags bla ri), for the reason that juniper trees were in abundance here (higher slopes of the mountain still have some juniper trees).
_	The rivalry between the cities was the reason that neither Sydney (the oldest and now largest city) nor Melbourne (the largest city at the time) was chosen as the capital of Australia when the nation was federated in 1901.
_	The development of the R8 TDI was cancelled, Audi cited the reason that the cost of re-engineering of the petrol R8 to accommodate the massive twin-turbocharged diesel engine is simply too great, and that it would be unable to recoup its investment through sales alone.
_	GameSpy's Bryan Stratton scored it 1.5 out of 5, comparing it unfavorably with the film; "the reason that the movie worked was that Peter Jackson knew what to keep from the book, what to fast-forward through, and what to cut altogether.
_	Around 698, Wu Chengsi and another nephew of Wu Zetian's, Wu Sansi, the Prince of Liang, were repeatedly making attempts to have officials persuade Wu Zetian to create one of them crown prince—again citing the reason that an emperor should pass the throne to someone of the same clan.
_	Peripheral hyphae are poorly differentiated and this is the reason that "C. punctatus" was once considered in the Gymnoascaceae.
_	This was a large part of the reason that he became the first member of the band to release a solo album, "Smash Your Head Against the Wall" (1971) which featured contributions from Keith Moon, Jerry Shirley, Vivian Stanshall, Neil Innes and the Who's roadie, Dave "Cyrano" Langston.
_	The River Mourne was the reason that Herdman's Mill was built in Sion Mills, County Tyrone.
_	This is not the only problem Grant is facing; his car is breaking down, and he discovers that he is the reason that his wife Brooke cannot become pregnant.
_	In Kosovo, where many families had sold many organizations were established for reconciliation for the reason that: ""should stop the killings, because Serbia is killing us"."
_	Clark's opposition to the Federal Reserve Act is said to be the reason that Missouri is the only state granted two Federal Reserve Banks (one in St. Louis and one in Kansas City).
_	Undoubtedly, Pashaei was an exceptionally talented artist, however that is only half the reason that he was so loved, and left behind such a phenomenally enduring legacy; the other reasons include that he had a huge heart and that is how he will always be remembered by those who will continue to love him and think of all of the beautiful memories he left behind.
_	communiqué, in French language), for the reason that the neutrality of election officials was not observed in one of the communes, which, given the small difference of vote counts, may have altered the electoral results.
_	Stewart gave Johnson some fits, but cuts would take their toll on Stewart and were the reason that the fight was stopped in the seventh round, thus making Johnson the first ever three-time champion in the division.
_	This gimmick was the reason that Yamaguchi decided to capitalize the two central letters of the album title ("kikUUiki").
_	"Concerning these scriptures, which are called apocryphal, for the reason that many things are found in them corrupt and against the true faith handed down by the elders, it has pleased them that they not be given a place nor be admitted to authority."
_	This is frequently and incorrectly claimed as the reason that the temple became popularly known as "Nage-komi-dera" (Throw-away temple).
_	If it failed to meet this mark, then it would above all be for the reason that only a few readers will be likely to manage to digest the heavy academic fare of the first eighty pages.”
_	Taran Adarsh of Bollywood Hungama rated the movie with four and a half stars and wrote – "Eventually, Delhi Belly works big time predominantly for the reason that it's a pioneering motion picture, an incredible film that dares to pierce into an untapped and brand new terrain.
_	He also praised Michelle's dedication to her role, saying "I believe that the reason that she managed to get inspiration to write this song is because she likes her role [in this film]".
_	Nobel Prize-winning economist Joseph E. Stiglitz says, on the topic of one of Smith's better-known ideas: "the reason that the invisible hand often seems invisible is that it is often not there."
_	Increased attention to livestock was the reason that Spain became a net importer of grains.
_	Her Mughal name was Mariyam Zamani Begum and this being the reason that the mosque was built in her honor in Lahore’s walled city.
_	"It's an improvement," says Meier, adding that "the reason that wall was there has to do with traffic and noise.
_	This is given as the reason that the constellations of Scorpius and Orion are never in the sky at the same time.
_	This is said to be the reason that the constellation of Ophiuchus stands midway between the Scorpion and the Hunter in the sky.
_	Part of the reason that Milton is a target is because he is very much like a "hayseed" who acts folksy and simplistic among others.
_	Scherzinger's version replaces the original tune's Hindi words with English lyrics, including the chorus, "You are the reason that I breathe/ You are the reason that I still believe/ You are my destiny/ Jai ho."
_	Although, maybe it was easier for them to play fast and high (soprano) melodies on a cornetto than on a trombone, hence the reason that the soprano trombone "disappeared".
_	In a shoot interview, Jim Cornette said part of the reason that Vader's WWF run was not as successful as what was hoped was due to the failure to properly book Vader.
_	For the reason that students need to save time and money on meal, they save meal time by eating on the street.
_	"Sunshine Reporter" newscast as the reason that this particular broadcast day was selected for recording:
_	He announces that the reason that the violin's tone had flattened was because someone had poured liquid varnish into it, and suggests that the person who did this is responsible for the violinist's death.
_	The green part of the light spectrum is not absorbed but is reflected which is the reason that most plants have a green color.
_	Ashley and Joshua find out that the reason that Orky is possessing people is to try and tell them that he is dying because a businessman is dumping toxic waste into the lake.
_	Feeley himself saw this painting as a breakthrough: “So I suppose the reason that I can see that red and green picture as significant has to do with the absence of all those textural variations and all that brush dynamism.
_	Although every man should desire to be good, and endeavor to acquire these virtues, not only the preachers whom we have mentioned, but others as well, whose duty it is to maintain the country by means of their labors and exertions; among them, there are none, to whom this is more becoming than to the defenders, for the reason that it is their duty to protect the Church, the monarchs, and all others.
_	This is the reason that drugs such as morphine affect consciousness.
_	This same "curse" is also considered by some Christian commentators as the reason that Zerubbabel, the rightful Solomonic king during the time of Nehemiah, was not given a kingship under the Persian empire.
_	Studies aimed at identifying important areas for the conservation of Pampas grasslands and wildlife (especially birds) that depend on them have shown that well-kept pampas grasslands were mostly private properties and the reason that they were well preserved was mostly due to having been used carefully for extensive cattle raising.
_	"Wonging" is the reason that some casinos have signs on some blackjack tables saying, "No Mid-Shoe Entry", meaning that a new player must wait until exactly the first hand after a shuffle to begin playing.
_	Furthermore, health issues regarding women are argued as the reason that some submarine services avoid accepting women, although mixed-gender accommodations in a small space is also an issue, as is explained in more depth below.
_	According to Martin Gottfried in his biography of Fosse, ""His baldness was the reason that he wore hats, and was doubtless why he put hats on his dancers.""
_	This is considered by scholars to be the reason that, in Israelite culture, the rights were restricted to just six locations by the time the Priestly Code was compiled—the late 7th century according to textual scholars—and it is thus regarded by biblical scholars as being no coincidence that the three cities of refuge to the west of the Jordan were also important ancient religious sanctuaries; little is known about the cities of refuge to the east of the Jordan (as of 1901), but scholars consider it reasonable to assume that they were once also important sanctuaries.
_	He is also the reason that Azusa came to meet Funaho, as he had lost in battle against Kagato and fled to Earth.
_	Regarding the Arab–Israeli conflict, in a January 2012 Republican debate, Romney said, "Well, the reason that there's not peace between the Palestinians and Israel is because there is — in the leadership of the Palestinian people are Hamas and others who think like Hamas, who have as their intent the elimination of Israel.
_	After events of the battle with the U.S. Navy aircraft carrier, USS "Wasp", Kikuchi changes his stance on attacking enemy targets, putting the reason that "Mirai" is put in danger and they are doing it for self-defence.
_	Later, Khalsa accepted the name "Dasam Granth", for the reason that it contains compositions of 10th Guru of Sikhs.
_	Part of the reason that he had previously stopped competing in alpine skiing was that he was tired of the strict competitive regime, feeling there was too little play or action.
_	On January 3, 1993, Zuyev revealed that the reason that Korean Air Lines Flight 007 succeeded in crossing over Kamchatka without being shot down was because Arctic gales had knocked out the Soviet radars on Kamchatka ten days previously.
_	"The famed Chisholm Trail, about which more has been written than any other Southwestern Trail, cannot be traced in Texas for the reason that it never existed in this State."
_	This idea would profoundly influence Jefferson over the course of his life, and would lead to his acknowledgement that the Constitution of the United States would be revised by future generations, and was part of the reason that the Constitution includes a provision for its own amendment.
_	Part of the reason that Disney has been so successful is that they are able to seamlessly integrate traditional and new media markets in a way that allows them to reach large audiences with a stable continuous message.
_	This may be the reason that while North Brisbane challenged South Brisbane for a place in the final, Valley played Toombul to give them an opportunity to secure a further two points.
_	As he blacks out, he realized the reason that he lost twice was that he has always been alone and envies the fact that Issa has friends that he can rely on and fight for.
_	In winter, this relatively warm water, even though covered by the polar ice pack, keeps the North Pole from being the coldest place in the Northern Hemisphere, and it is also part of the reason that Antarctica is so much colder than the Arctic.
_	Historian Michael Lanza argues that while the 1866 law pack was not as beneficial as it might have been, it was part of the reason that by 1900 one fourth of all Southern black farmers owned their own farms.
_	According to King Faisal Al Saud the armed resistance that Bani Sakhr put up against Ibn Saud and the Wahhabi Ikhwan was "the reason that Saudi Arabia's borders do not extend all the way to Palestine and why the Al Sauds never became the rulers of the Levant".
_	The removal of seromas by fine-needle aspiration is controversial: it is recommended by some for the reason that seromas can be a culture medium for bacteria, whereas others advise it only for collection of excessive amounts of fluid, because even an aspiration carried out under aseptic conditions carries a certain risk of infection.
_	In fact, part of the reason that the women's final at the US Open was moved to its "prime time" spot was because of the positive effect that the Williams sisters had on television ratings.
_	Extensive changes in the international fish and fishing industry in the following years and decades were the reason that the main business of the FMH gradually shifted.
_	Thus, the reason that the eldest son was special was not because they were the first male child, but because they continued the male line.
_	Qu for the reason that ‘Qu grasps authority to form a despotic government’, and the Emperor dismissed him from office and sent him back to his hometown.
_	This is the reason that Devdi Mubaarak is abuzz every time with the spiritual proceeding of believers.
_	He seized on this as the reason that he and his father never got along; he became very upset and walked out on his mother when she tried to explain the name change to him.
_	However, the reason that Kelso never mentioned his real age was because he knew that when he turned 65, he would have to step down as chief of medicine.
_	At a press conference on February 24, Menezes said that he was "touched" by the support of the security forces; he also said that he would be willing to leave office if he was "the reason that things are not working in this country".
_	He works as a photographer, what is the reason that brought him to Düsseldorf.
_	His head injuries, Thompson suggests, were the reason that Spector began his habit of wearing outlandish wigs in later years.
_	According to one historical account, Amason would not give the land unless the new town would have a four-acre town square, and that is the reason that Center has such a large square.
_	The fact that the S(t) = 1 – CDF is the reason that another name for the survival function is the complementary cumulative distribution function.
_	Sakebe explained that "these tables save much labor, [but] they are but little known for the reason that they have never been printed in our country."
_	Despite its rarity, it is widely believed to be the reason that there is much more matter than antimatter in the universe, and thus forms one of Andrei Sakharov's three conditions for baryogenesis.
_	When Lucifer started his rebellion they joined him, as he promised them that they would be able to explain to humanity the reason that things they loved had to die.
_	In July 2009, Toyota cited a global economic slump as the reason that the Japanese Grand Prix would not return to Fuji Speedway in 2010 and beyond.
_	In this manner, the DF technician could switch back and forth between agent and control with one hand, and could easily determine at any given time, whether they were unable to hear the agent station for the reason that the control was transmitting, or whether the agent was transmitting and they could not hear them as they were too far away.
_	At first Snow wasn't sure if he wanted to work on "The X-Files", giving the reason that he felt they were "weird".
_	Yeshe-Ö's first act as ruler was to issue commands decried under the title "bka’ shog chen mo" (Great Dictums), which reflected his theocratic approach to rule the kingdom as his primary aim; it was the reason that he came to be known as "a king and monk".
_	This is also the reason that the zeroth law of thermodynamics is stated explicitly.
_	I regret the occasion of such a meeting as this for the reason that the principles of this bill were placed upon the Republican platform when we nominated our present President , and who, in this message to Congress, recommended the principles of such a measure.
_	Moengangongo had died 2 years later, which is probably the reason that he has not gone into history as Ulukālala III
_	It is notable ornament for the reason that it is worn as accomplishment of "Navas" – a promise to the almighty for fulfillment of some prayer made to Him.
_	(2006) suggest that this unusual diet may be part of the reason that so few individuals have been captured for study.
_	For example, the Mississippi River forms the boundary between several U.S. states; this principle is the reason that states on the lower Mississippi have occasional pieces of land on the opposite side from the rest of the state.
_	It is assumed by the historians that this is the reason that the Turks had arrested him.
_	The origin of water on Earth, or the reason that there is clearly more liquid water on Earth than on the other rocky planets of the Solar System, is not completely understood.
_	After the match, JoJo & Shay would attack her, however Team Blossom make their return to OVW with the reason that the rule - that they would not be signed until 90 days.
_	She receives a scroll, (via messenger bat), with likenesses of all three brothers and the layout of their mansion, and Selene realizes the reason that Kraven and higher-ups want the castle is to put the balance of power in the area in favor of the Vampires.
_	Wigmore gave the episodes a 9 out of 10 rating and wrote "the reason that this two-parter works is that its plot is simple enough for the audience to still have a handle on".
_	Tavo is the opposite of Fito, and maybe that's the reason that they are friends.
_	This is the reason that the most Shia give for the recitation of the phrase regarding Ali.
_	It is these forms that are responsible for much of the chemical properties of this reagent, which is also the reason that the substance is sometimes written as [(CH)TiCl] or [CpTiCl], where Cp represents the cyclopentadienyl anion.
_	For the reason that the user does not understand the target language when speech translation is used, a method "must be provided for the user to check whether the translation is correct, by such means as translating it again back into the user's language".
_	It was said that his Christianity led to many conversions in the Roman army, which was the reason that Licinius was so concerned.
_	This includes exchanging greetings, paying tribute to the dead (especially those who have most recently died), and referring to the reason that has brought the two groups together.
_	Gus is enraged and he later reveals the reason that Mikey acted like a monster is because Randall told him lies and said he was his only friend.
_	Between 1920-1925 many people got infected with plague that was the reason that led to the migration of population and make it empty, but after several years they have come back.
_	Thus, the reason that U.S. food labels describe food energy in calories can be traced to Nicolas Clément-Desormes' lectures of 1819-1824.
_	His constituents have in the past called him "muthungu" (a white man in Kikuyu language) for the reason that if he calls for a meeting to start at 7am, it will start precisely at 7am and not later.
_	These have often been cited as the reason that Vance was so quick to lead the defense during Dula's trial.
_	According to Mackenzie, the reason that MacLeod distanced himself from the actual event was so that he could not be held responsible if his men were thought to have helped themselves to the loot.
_	Bullet Voting occurs when a voter approves "only" candidate 'a' instead of "both" 'a' and 'b' for the reason that voting for 'b' can cause 'a' to lose.
_	Enough for me the mystery of the eternity of life, and the inkling of the marvellous structure of reality, together with the single-hearted endeavour to comprehend a portion, be it ever so tiny, of the reason that manifests itself in nature."
_	A day later, on 20th January, 2017, NPCI renounced the previous instructions citing the reason that PhonePe indeed violated the UPI norms.
_	Thus, Pyongan dialect was chosen as the standard dialect for North Korean, purely for the reason that it was considered less "contaminated" by foreign cultures and capitalists.
_	For most of these no statistics are published, for the reason that the Census Bureau collects its statistics directly from congregations rather than from the officers of corporations."
_	This ended the European medieval household tradition of slavery, resulted in Brazil's receiving the most enslaved Africans, and revealed sugar cultivation and processing as the reason that roughly 84% of these Africans were shipped to the New World.
_	Aleida Greve's will stipulated that her sitting room with all of its paintings and furnishings had to remain intact, and this is the reason that this art collection with all of its curiosities still exists in its entirety as a "time capsule" of a lady's art gallery.
_	Residents of the new town of Tseung Kwan O in New Territories East have been fighting for a direct bus connection to Kwai Chung and Tsuen Wan in New Territories West for many years, citing the reason that travelling by MTR between the two places requires a number of transfers in between.
_	On the first days of November 2016, the deputy of the independent group Ana Joselina Fortín has decided to join to the National Party of Honduras based on the reason that she wants the reelection of the current president and to establish limits on how many times a president can be reelected.
_	There are many similarities of Korean "sijo" poetry and Chinese Tang poetry: the reason that people wrote poems, the messages that they want to deliver, and how they express their feelings by talking about natural things.
_	Kristin was perhaps the reason that Ross relented about his parents running the day care center; he had a crush on her.
_	In 2010, Edelstein presented a paper at a meeting of the American Physical Society in which he disclosed his findings that the reason that space travel at the speed of light had not been achieved is that according to Einstein's Special Theory of Relativity, spaceships would be exposed at such speeds to a dose of radiation that would be fatal to crew members.
_	He claimed that the reason that he called it "Scarface" was not because it was about him (which it was), but because Al Capone was one of the most famous men of the time and it would intrigue people to go see the film.
_	Colin Doran has said "Our relationship soured with Sony when the MD left the company as he was the reason that we signed in the first place.
_	The high logical complexity of the out-of-order technique is the reason that it did not reach mainstream machines until the mid-1990s.
_	Part of the reason that the input and output are in-line on a rear drive unit is to relieve torsional stress on the transmission and mountings, but this isn't an issue in a front-drive as the gearbox is integrated into the transaxle.
_	Manager Mike Newell commented saying that he had made a mistake when signing Buscher, and this was the reason that the player was never used in his 7-month stay at Blundell Park On 5 May 2009 Buscher's contract was cancelled ahead of schedule by mutual consent.
_	Verwer attributes to her some of the reason that he made a commitment to Christ, and for what resulted in his life.
_	The Deuteronomic Code is regarded by textual scholars as dating from the reign of Josiah, which postdates the fall of the Kingdom of Israel to the Assyrians; this is considered to be the reason that only three (unnamed) cities of refuge are mentioned in the Deuteronomic Code, with a further three only being added if the Israelite territory was expanded, as by the time of Josiah's reign, the cities east of the Jordan were no longer controlled by the Israelites.
_	His government represented one of the greatest events in the republican history of the nation, for the reason that Peru entered a stage of internal and external peace, progress, power, and international prestige.
_	Donnie is the reason that we got our record deal .
_	This peaceful collaboration, Leeper felt, was the reason that Blacks did not need to take to the streets in protest, an important aspect of the integration of the two races.
_	The striking scene has been thought to be the reason that Euphronios signed the work.
_	And the reason that I ended up being the chief engineer or chief designer, was not because I want to, it's because I couldn't hire anyone.
_	This model is also the reason that Edward Jones currently has the largest number of branch offices among brokerage firms in the United States.
_	Parks declined for the reason that he thought there was nothing he could add to the track.
_	This is the reason that major warmings are only observed in the northern-hemisphere, with one exception.
_	This is possibly the reason that it was only printed after the death of the author and the fall of the Swedish empire.
_	According to Aspen Skunk Rabies Research, part of the reason that this research has not been done yet is the high cost of these clinical trials, which would be difficult for drug companies to recoup.
_	By using a pelletron accelerator and measuring α – γ coincidences from the catcher foil, Marinov and his group found 5.2 MeV α - particle group in coincidence with various γ - rays of σ ≈ 30 nb, which was identified as a transition from Fr to At; and the reason that it decayed with low energy when much higher energy was available was that it was enhanced by a factor of 3x10.
_	Linh said the reason that made everybody go trekking is, "Sometimes, life is a pile of shit.
_	This was the reason that Rajasthani school flourished first in Mewar, (the purest form and later on in), Jaipur, Jodhpur, Bundi, Kota- Kalam, Kishangarh, Bikaner and other places of Rajasthan.
_	However, contrary to Rosenfield, he criticized the character of Ivy and the reason that made her join the cult.
_	"Sitcoms are formulaic, but the reason that ones like ‘Modern Family’ stick around for so long is that they have such great characters and often charming writing that we can forgive the repetitive nature and just have a good time.
_	Long before September 11, 2001...the reason that I believe I'm qualified to be president of the United States is not because of September 11th, 2001.
_	Ironically, the reason that Reddy left Capitol Records for MCA was that she didn't feel that she was being supported by them during the last few years that she recorded there.
_	Dong Zhuo executed Zhou Bi and Wu Qiong by the reason that most figures who were appointed by them defected to the anti-Dong Zhuo forces.
_	Gittins stated that the reason that it took two years for Waddle to make the trip to Japan was because Waddle was forbidden to do so while he was still in the USN and because of financial constraints and fear of litigation after his retirement.
_	He reminds them of episode of Mauleverer's stolen banknote, told in the previous story, and suggests this is the reason that Loder has not reported the morning's events.
_	The previous separation of Dettenheim is the reason that its districts have different area codes.
_	This is the reason that hair and nails are commonly found with skeletal remains.
_	However, the tour in 2008 was distinctively known as the 'Khilafat Centenary' tour, for the reason that 100 years have passed by 2008 since the first inception of Caliphate in Ahmadiyya.
_	His staunch quaker upbringing may be the reason that he almost comes across as a naive and laidback player in Kenya's vibrant political scene:
_	One explanation is that this was done by design, to make the city easier to defend from any raiders; by the same version, the reason that there is only one exit from the city was that should pirates ever return and succeed in entering the city, it would be possible for local inhabitants to entrap and kill them.
_	After Güney had begun to shoot the film he went behind bars due to the reason that he had sheltered anarchist students at home.
_	She, too, believes that the bearded man was the reason that her former mistress left Lausanne.
_	The season ground to a halt near the end, when Vic Metcalfe was forced to miss the last 7 games of the season and many say this was the reason that Town failed to win the title for the first time in 28 years.
_	However, this last scene was cut in the 4Kids version, mainly for the reason that Molly's death never occurred in that version.
_	Shahinas has declared that he is a fan of A.S. Roma and that was the reason that he signed immediately with them in first offer, despite other offers.
_	The building was strengthened in 2008–09 and this work was the reason that the 2010 and 2011 earthquakes caused only moderate damage.
_	His deep respect for al-Jazouli was the reason that Abu Abdallah al-Qaim chose Afoughal as his residence.
_	In 1956 the Chitral State Scouts were reverted to the identity of Chitral Scouts, for the reason that Pakistan became a republic and from dominion status and all the Princely States were amalgamated into the One Unit.
_	A double hull does not protect against major, high-energy collisions or groundings which cause the majority of oil pollution, despite this being the reason that the double hull was mandated by United States legislation.
_	Assyria was now a large and powerful empire, and a major threat to Egyptian and Hittite interests in the region, and was perhaps the reason that these two powers, fearful of Assyrian might, made peace with one another.
_	Paradoxically and in historically circular twist, the reason that the glass sea creatures sold to Harvard were to prove so crucial was because the University would soon, and did, open its new Botanical Museum in 1888.
_	In a July 2016 interview, Trump said of the European Union, "the reason that it got together was like a consortium so that it could compete with the United States."
_	Homer has decided to find out more about her because of the reason that not only that he loves her but he also wants to unravel her mystery, which she always tries to hide from him.
_	George Vertue's notes on the former Royal Collection were published in 1757, which is the reason that, following its long series of the Vertue notebooks, a collated edition of the four manuscript catalogues was published by the Walpole Society as its Volume 37 (1958–60); it was edited by Millar, who later followed van der Doort as Surveyor of the Queen's Pictures.
_	The day is chosen for the reason that the Armenian law on the National Flag of Armenia was passed on 15 June 2006.
_	This is the reason that Rhett is not received in Charleston society.
_	Despite a struggling defense James would be part of the reason that would help land UNLV with the 23rd best best pass defense in the nation.
_	Four pan-blue legislators attempted to enter the Hsieh election headquarters without permission, with the reason that they were there to investigate the claim that the government provided them office space for free.
_	This protection is perhaps the reason that this species has extremely docile females.
_	This is primarily due to the reason that till 1997-98, these were offered as pre-degree courses in colleges.
_	This also is part of the reason that there are no exits available until after one has crossed the bridge and paid the toll.
_	A study done by the Department of Neurology at Keele University, North Staffordshire Royal Infirmary suggests that forced dextrality may be part of the reason that the percentage of left-handed people decreases with the higher age groups, both because the effects of pressures toward right-handedness are cumulative over time (hence increasing with age for any given person subjected to them) and because the prevalence of such pressure is decreasing, such that fewer members of younger generations face any such pressure to begin with.
_	The kids eventually earned enough snelfus (the Cyberspace term for dollars) to win it, but they discovered the chip was infected to drain Motherboard (which might be the reason that this one is orange and yellow, rather than dark pink and chrome as the old one had been), replacing her with Hacker.
_	That is the reason that we cannot use the energy spectral density as defined above in such cases.
_	However, the reason that the conference created headlines was because Professor Rutter, who had sat on the Lawther Committee, changed his mind about the causality of lead, and its association with lower IQ in children.
_	"It seems to me that the principal goal of the whole of mankind must be the knowledge and development of the wonders of God, and that this is the reason that God gave him the empire of the globe.
_	While Moore wanted to write about "power politics" and the "worrying" times he lived in, he stated the reason that the story was set in an alternate reality was because he was worried that readers would "switch off" if he attacked a leader they admired.
_	Rajavelu is mentally retarded person due to the reason that he has lost Rs. 2 Lakh in Kolkatta Palace Hotel which was given by Nesamani Ponnaiya.
_	Although Broadstone Works has been extended 1877 the reason that ten were subcontracted externally was due to Broadstone working to capacity at the time.
_	A large part of the reason that this is so low, is that the recoil of firing a round pushes the gun's aim off target.
_	But it is the reason that does the justificatory work of justifying both the action and the desire.
_	It has been speculated that Currer was a benefactor of the Brontë sisters and this is the reason that Charlotte Brontë chose the nom de plume of "Currer Bell" for her novel "Jane Eyre".
_	The marriage is said to be the reason that Fleming wrote the first James Bond novel "Casino Royale".
_	But that's part of the reason that when we talked about it, we said, 'You know what?
_	Some academics point to the Otter Commission as part of the reason that the Canadian Army was not fully prepared for mobilization at the start of the Second World War.
_	However, it was rumoured by Pierre Louis Maupertuis that the reason that Cavalleri was added to the list of winners was that one influential judge among those selecting the winning essays was René Antoine Ferchault de Réaumur, who favoured Decartes' vortex theory, and who insisted that at least one winner should be a supporter of that view, though by that time it was rapidly losing ground and leading workers in the field already were rejecting it.
_	This focus on superior products is part of the reason that Albert Heijn is regarded as one of the more expensive supermarkets in the Netherlands, Belgium, and Curaçao.
_	The closing of the court of Bassano was later confirmed by the Constitutional Court of Italy with the reason that "the courts of Bassano and Belluno could not be balanced within the same province..." despite the fact that Bassano and Belluno are not in the same province and the Court's judgement was thus based on a false premise.
_	A circus gorilla named Jojo realized that it was the reason that it was not being fed.
_	This is the reason that NASA stopped sending people to the moon back in the seventies.
_	However, Sir Humphrey points out that this was precisely the reason that countries joined it.
_	The way that the housing was built impressively on the contours of the land and the retention of the ancient woodland is the reason that the Gleadless Valley project is held in such high esteem.
_	And for the reason that New Orleans is being counted upon to offer a string of left-handed batsmen, Love is expected to be particularly effective in the Dixie Series.
_	The licentiate is particularly popular with students already involved in the working life, for the reason that completing a full doctor's dissertation while working would be too difficult.
_	Tuchman wrote that Kluck explained the German failure at the Marne as: "... the reason that transcends all others was the extraordinary and peculiar aptitude of the French soldier to recover quickly.
_	Regular and reliable harvests helped generate stable tax income that led to relatively strong governmental structures that were ultimately the reason that Ethiopia was the only country not to be colonized in the late-nineteenth century ‘Scramble for Africa’ apart from Liberia.
_	The outside paneling of just plywood has been debated on the reason that material was chosen.
_	Equally important, following heavy snowstorms, on 7 November 1939 Hitler put off "X-Day" until further notice, removing the reason that had most motivated Brauchitsch and Halder to consider overthrowing Hitler.
_	This was the reason that Ferizaj for a period of thirty years become the city with about 400 houses and 200 shops.
_	This is no doubt the reason that the Utah Legislature conferred original jurisdiction in both criminal and civil cases to the probate courts in 1852.
_	Loosely speaking, justification is the reason that someone (probably) holds a belief.
_	The minister and General of the Right, Ri Tōten (李蹈天) reveals that the reason that the Great King believes he can make this demand is because, in 1641, Ri Tōten had sought ten million bushels of grain to relieve the famine gripping the land.
_	And that's the reason that people don't have a right, to some extent, to use black music to their own gains."
_	Mirha is kicked out the house after Wahaj accuses her of being the reason that Palwasha ran away when in reality Palwasha ran away on her own terms but came back.
_	This was the first year in which televoting was used "en masse": viewers were given five minutes after the end of the songs to vote for the song they wanted to win, with Terry Wogan remarking that "you'll have nobody to blame but yourself", which, ironically, was the reason that Wogan quit the commentary job ten years later.
_	Their influence being one of the reason that the Greek War of Independence was launched in the Danubian Principalities instead of Greece itself.
_	When asked for the reason that Les Baer would be given the authorization to use the Thunder Ranch logo, Clint Smith cited the outstanding accuracy and reliability of Baer's guns.
_	This is due to the reason that the IP layer has long provided best-effort services.
_	The Protocol imposes an obligation on Member States to criminalise racist and xenophobic insults online of "(i) persons for the reason that they belong to a group distinguished by race, color, descent or national or ethnic origin, as well as religion, if used as a pretext for any of these factors; or (ii) a group of persons which is distinguished by any of these characteristics".
_	I suppose the reason that this film changed my life is that very early on in my film-watching experiences, I saw a film that was so sophisticated in its tone and what it managed to achieve.
_	Moore is credited as the reason that relations between whites and African Americans were so positive in Elizabeth City.
_	It was realized that while communicating with the outside world language wasn’t the major barrier but the lack of understanding and ignorance about the Chinese culture and tradition was the reason that others were not able to understand the Chinese people and connect with them.
_	Malae cited Saoluaga's legislative career, which complimented his management experience, as the reason that the two decided to run as a team.
_	Velma explains that this was the reason that she started solving mysteries.
_	On October 16, 1990, Berler again asserted the ex-Cubs factor as the reason that the favored Oakland Athletics (with ex-Cubs Scott Sanderson, Dennis Eckersley, and Ron Hassey) would lose in the 1990 World Series (which they did by getting swept by the Cincinnati Reds).
_	Although Plutarch claims that this deformity was the reason that Pericles was always depicted wearing a helmet, this is not the case; the helmet was actually the symbol of his official rank as strategos (general).
_	This trophic caste determination is the reason that "Trigona spinipes" queens are larger than workers.
_	Scientists have proposed two major theories for the reason that multicellularity arose so late after the appearance of life on Earth.
_	It's about how I'm the reason that I feel this way.
_	That's the reason that performance and durability were of such prime consideration from the very beginning."
_	Allahyari points out the social and cultural phenomena at work with the advertisements, citing Islamic law in Iran for the reason that the female body is censored and yet simultaneously sexualized.
_	On the basis of Jones’s reference to “the best personal news” in his correspondence with Freud, Jones’s biographer, Brenda Maddox, suggests that the reason that there was no subsequent autopsy was that Owen was pregnant and to have revealed this to her father and friends would have caused them further distress.
_	These difficulties are also the reason that the frog is fairly uncommon in the dart frog hobby and command a price upwards of $125–150 U.S. dollars per frog.
_	This form of government originated in Galveston, Texas as a response to the Galveston Hurricane of 1900, mainly for the reason that extra support was needed in certain areas.
_	Goble also argues that the reason that Tantric Buddhism became popular in this period lies in the similarity between their Buddhist rituals and pre-existing Tang state rites which were supposed to support the emperor by granting political stability and imperial longevity.
_	This was also the reason that costs remained high, because space users were willing to pay for the best possible cells, leaving no reason to invest in lower-cost, less-efficient solutions.
_	Ayatollah Yousef Sanei said clerical authorities have quietly expressed opposition to the development of weapons of mass destruction for many years, and he described it as the reason that Iran never retaliated with chemical weapons when Saddam Hussein used them to kill Iranian troops and Iran-backed Kurds during the 1980- 88 Iran-Iraq war.
_	This was also the reason that Go Ahead Wageningen participated, as they would later play in the eastern division.
_	In April 2016, the deputy of the independent group Tatiana Canales, finally has decided to return to the Liberal Party of Honduras, with the reason that they have expressed differences with Libre, and its return means that the Liberal caucus has officially 28 deputies.
_	The zygomatic sends signals to the lacrimal nerve that activate the lacrimal gland; which is the reason that spicy foods can cause tears.
_	This is the reason that you will usually see CRC polynomials written in binary with the leading coefficient omitted.
_	In addition she has also taken a special interest in anterior cruciate ligament (ACL) injuries of the knee and conducts research that investigates the reason that these injuries are four to six times more common in female versus male athletes.
_	Proclus said that "Pherecydes used to say that Zeus changed into Eros when about to create, for the reason that, having created the world from opposites, he led it into agreement and peace and sowed sameness in all things, and unity that interpenetrates the universe".
_	Part of the reason that Tan chose not to have children was a fear that she would pass on a genetic legacy of mental instability - her maternal grandmother committed suicide, her mother threatened suicide often, and she herself has struggled with suicidal ideation.
_	There is also the view that it is impossible to consider all the traditions of the criminal environment as antisocial and harmful, including, for the reason that some of the traditions in the cells of the remand center, contribute to hygiene and the maintenance of sanitary norms.
_	During his stay there, he issued two proclamations that sought to punish and demote officers who had been unsuccessful, with the reason that ranks and rewards should not be given to those who failed to earn them.
_	Part of the reason that South London is seen as the birthplace of the working class Edwardian style is because the popular press of the day reported the emergence of the style.
_	According to the Gospel of Luke, Caesar Augustus ordered a census be conducted of the ".. entire Roman World", during Quirinius's governorship of Syria and this is the reason that Joseph and Mary, who lived in Nazareth, were in Bethlehem, King David's place of birth, when Jesus was born.
_	Additionally, he has stated that Bob Marley, Nirvana and Pearl Jam are major influences on his work, the latter being the reason that he started making music after hearing the song "Yellow Ledbetter".
_	Mardan-Farrukh paraphrases from the Jewish Torah, and concludes that regarding light God "considered it for the reason that he had not seen it before."
_	The applications of his work to biology are the reason that he was considered as one of the pioneers in the field of computational biology.
_	Chen felt that the reason that "Cloud" had been so warmly received was because the emotions it sparked in players were different than any other game available at the time, and believed that it was his "calling" to make more games that changed what people saw video games as.
_	The third year of Lemos Theatrical Company in Kallithea was one of the efficient and optimistic, the reason that was between the abundant manuscripts that were clearly seen from everywhere, from six of his works that were lately received by Lemos for his current summer period of 1949, it had several theatrical sources that passed into the used field of .
_	That is the reason that villages named Kallergiana (Greek: Καλλεργιανά) in Kissamos or Kallergo (Greek: Καλλέργω ή Καλλέργο) in Rethymno exist today.
_	Dance's growing family was probably the reason that in 1772 Soane continued his education by joining the household and office of Henry Holland.
_	And the Midrash explained that the reason that they buried Joseph's bones in Shechem could be compared to a case in which some thieves stole a cask of wine, and when the owner discovered them, the owner told them that after they had consumed the wine, they needed to return the cask to its proper place.
_	In 2014, lead guitarist, Daniel Kenneth Rego parted ways with the band to explore other musical possibilities, citing the reason that he no longer felt the same passion and connection with this style of music.
_	That was the reason that we had to close a number of wells, and had to undertake to extend the existing water pipe system.
_	In the recent chapters Kajima reveal that he has two masters and the reason that he interested in Kenichi is that he himself was told by both of his masters that he doesn't have any talent for martial arts and he had to work hard much like Kenichi did.
_	This is the reason that the surgeon sometimes makes two holes, so that at least one hole is kept open.
_	Chan was deeply influenced by the era of sixties film in Japan, for the reason that they were not afraid to produce realistic movies that addressed society's problems.
_	According to the hypothesis, the reason that Earth time was measured in Kolob time was because the Earth was physically located near Kolob.
_	The management plan proposed by the government to preserve the island's heritage status envisaged restricting the tourist accommodation to about 400 and limiting the number of cars on the island to 100, which she objected for the reason that it was limiting the opportunities to the islanders who had lived there for many years.
_	Controversies arose during the release, only because of the reason that Balachander was at least 10 years ahead of the film-makers who were making films during those periods and tended to say whatever he wanted to say through his films in a bold and straightforward manner.
_	He restored the judicial regulations by very strict punishments, including execution, he once strangled a grand vizier for the reason that the official had beaten his mother-in-law.
_	Supporters of colovaginoplasty state that this method is better than use of skin grafts for the reason that colon is already mucosal, whereas skin is not.
_	So the reason that Lehman was able to do what it did, which proved so destructive, was that it had no limits on the amount of leverage it could adopt."
_	An opinion piece suggested that part of the reason that Palmer had held his seat was due to his high constituency work rate.
_	Nonetheless, the very embellishments that allowed these books to survive are the reason that today’s conservators find illuminated manuscripts more challenging to maintain than their plain counterparts.
_	In such cells, the hot electron effect is the reason that a portion of the light energy is lost to heat rather than converted to electricity.
_	Due to the reason that many girls from Kathmandu Valley are represented and are consistent in the pageant per year which resulted in the most winners from the Kathmandu Valley.
_	However, he said the Pope has so far "given no indication as to where he stands on anything" for the reason that this is a three-year-long process that will be concluded only when the Pope himself issues his post-Synodal apostolic exhortation, after the second leg of this Family Synod in October 2015.
_	"In this social darkness, therefore, the work of Earle Brown, Morton Feldman, and Christian Wolff continues to present a brilliant light, for the reason that at the several points of notation, performance, and audition, action is provocative."
_	Like John Locke, he also stated that true revelation can never disagree with human reason and experience, although he also argued that people should accept revelation and its interpretations for the reason that they should accept the commands of their sovereign, in order to avoid war.
_	The Icelandic proposal, with exactly the same as the Swiss initiative, cited "the [private] banks' ability to create credit" as the reason that Iceland's banking system went overboard.
_	This was also the reason that Go Ahead Wageningen participated, as they would later play in the eastern division.
_	Following World War One, the Treaty of Versailles contained the first constitution of a new International Labour Organization (ILO) founded on the principle that "labour is not a commodity", and for the reason that "peace can be established only if it is based upon social justice".
_	The tradition behind the "Shijing" poetry anthology was that the reason that poems (and presumably accompanying musical scores and choreography, now lost) were collected, polished, and brought to court for presentation to the emperor was to inform him of the thoughts, feelings, and conditions of the various peoples in different parts of the empire.
_	This is the reason that steel is combined with concrete in T-beams.
_	This led to much of the original first episode, titled "Miles Behind Us," to be discarded, and is also the reason that the premiere contains dual credits for both writer and director.
_	Richard Rawles suggested that part of the reason that the poem was initially considered disappointing was because it was not about sexuality or eroticism – a factor which he predicted would make the fragment of greater interest in the future.
_	After the war paper shortages and a diminished Dutch speaking audience was the reason that only one Batavia newspaper appeared, as of 1 June 1946 published by a collaboration of three pre-war metropolitan newspapers, including the Bataviaasch Nieuwsblad.
_	This is the reason that the borderplex's economy rotates around commercial and industrial warehousing, import, and export.
_	This was opposed by the Supreme Commander of the Caucasus, General Aleksey Petrovich Yermolov for the reason that the palace was a planned for state-owned institutions because of particularly spacious place it occupied.
_	Revealing that Zeorymer's power source was in another dimension, and that as a result, there can only be one Zeorymer, which was the reason that even Masaki couldn't make a perfect Dimensional Joint, despite having Wakatsuki's memories, the two machines merged into one, with the fake Miku collapsing, the original Dimensional Joint installing itself into Miku's womb, and Wakatsuki planning to take over Masaki's body in the process.
_	Ju persuaded King Zhaoxiang to halt the offensives, citing as the reason that the soldiers needed to rest after years of war.
_	This is the reason that it is also known as " Eliot's Indian Bible."
_	A very low consumption per head, as in Indonesia, means that many inhabitants are not connected to the electricity grid, and this is the reason that the world's 7th and 8th most populous countries—Nigeria (177M) and Bangladesh (156M)—do not appear in the table.
_	IGN said all the characters are very distinguishable and interesting, and remarked they "doesn't feel repetitive, even after dozens of hours of play", citing them as the reason that separates "Guilty Gear" from other fighting games.
_	This is the reason that, in those areas (such as Rio de Janeiro and Recife), one finds variations in pronunciation (for instance, palatalization of post-vocalic /s/) and a few superficial lexical changes.
_	Paar permanently left the show in 1962, citing the reason that he could not handle the work load of "The Tonight Show" (at the time, the show ran 105 minutes a day, five days a week), and he moved to his own weekly prime-time show, which would run until 1965.
_	After the case was over, some thought that the reason that the provincial government of Zhejiang did not publicize case facts was not to jeopardise the investigation.
_	Its use has been criticized as the reason that many successful examination candidates later found themselves unprepared for the more practical requirements of government positions.
_	The historian David Cohen has questioned the idea that these comic forms of abuse were carried out in reality, but Konstantinos Kapparis and Christopher Carey have argued that the reason that these jokes had such longevity in comedy was precisely because they were a reflection of reality.
_	This confusion may have been the reason that the flight continued to hold, burning up its reserve fuel to the point where it could no longer divert to Boston.
_	A potential solution is to incorporate flexibility into system design for the reason that the flexibility embedded can be exercised in future as uncertainty unfolds and updated information arrives.
_	Sweet ruled that Myriad Genetics' patent on BRCA1 and BRCA2, genes linked to breast cancer, were invalid for the reason that, in Sweet's opinion, genes do not constitute patentable subject matter.
_	According to the group, the reason that the lyrics are in English is because their rock influences have always been primarily English bands and they do not feel comfortable using Spanish lyrics for their songs.
_	This is the reason that Buddhism began to develop so vigorously in China with Fotudeng."
_	This is the reason that a draconic month or nodal period (the period the Moon takes to return to the same node in its orbit) is shorter than the sidereal month.
_	He denied posting a video asking if he should "shoot" Mielke for reporting allegedly suicidal online messages to police; the teen said he had used the word "sue" rather than "shoot", and that the police accusing him of using "shoot" was the reason that he was so angry that police handcuffed him to a paramedic backboard to get him to the hospital.
_	This is the reason that day and night are never together.
_	For the reason that it was first built earlier than Changsha city, so there is a saying that "there comes first the Kaifu Temple, then the Changsha city".
_	For this reason (and the reason that heavier particles settle quickly and do not contribute to a turbidity reading), a correlation between turbidity and total suspended solids (TSS) is somewhat unusual for each location or situation.
_	Hasan Pasha again became ruler of Algiers, but he was recalled in 1552, on the reason that he was one of the causes of the conflict between the Turks and Morocco.
_	Stark (2003) describes the bull as "magnificent" and believes the reason that, in his opinion, it has belatedly come to light is due to the neglect of Protestant historians.
_	He inherited his black hair and eyes from his mother and he is the reason that double blacks are so highly regarded in The Demon Kingdom.
_	Themistocles of Athens disagreed, for the reason that it would be intolerable if most of Greece should be excluded, and the general council should come to be ruled by two or three great cities.
_	It is also part of the reason that the manufacturing process is likely to cost less, since only very small amounts of material are needed to make these solar cells.
_	Julia Vassilieva credits cinematographer Anatoliy Lesnikov and set designer Nikolai Pavlov with a form "... mimicking so successfully the documentary mode" as the reason that "First on the Moon" won 2005 Venice Film Festival award for a documentary."
_	In the Ferber novel, the original show, and the 1936 film, Ravenal can stay in town for only 24 hours because he once killed a man in self-defense—this is the reason that Vallon takes him to see the town judge, and the reason that Ravenal asks for passage on the show boat.
_	This point was eliminated from the 1951 film, and the reason that Ravenal asks if the show boat will take him on is that he has lost his boat ticket through gambling.
_	Coverage and a livestream of the Texas Legislature by the Texas Tribune has been said to have been the reason that the bill became national, and later international, news.
_	According to Michael Adams, a film reviewer who interviewed Sachs, this was the reason that the film mixed horror with comedic moments, such as when Steve West's detached ear gets stuck on a tree, and when a janitor sweeps
_	Excessive dependence and trust in the local Chinese people is the reason that the Kanaq people are ready to sell to them their licenses issued by the Forest Department of Johor for harvesting and processing of jungle products.
_	His good appearances in Australia were the reason that he came to Leonidio FC Greece aged 19, where he played half of season 2003–04 with nine caps and one goal.
_	Glinda appears to tell Dorothy the reason that her friends didn't turn to stone was because they had brains, a heart, and courage.
_	He deduces the reason that boxing events have become far less profitable is because audience members are sick of watching only black boxers fight each other.
_	In his youth, he coupled a weak body to a strong mind, which was the reason that his father first let him be educated at home by a capable teacher, and only after he had strengthened, was sent to the public school of his city.
_	But, while this is so, we think that the plaintiff in error is not entitled to succeed in its ultimate contention under the stipulation for the reason that it appears that notice [241 U.S. 190, 198] of the claim was in fact given.
_	And it was decided by this Court in the case of Louisiana v. New Orleans, 109 U. S. 285, that a liability for a tort, created by statute, although reduced to judgment by a recovery for the damages suffered, did not thereby become a debt by contract in the sense of the Constitution of the United States forbidding state legislation impairing its obligation, for the reason that the term 'contract' is used in the Constitution in its ordinary sense as signifying the agreement of two or more minds, for considerations proceeding from one to the other, to do or not to do certain acts.
_	He is best known for his physical strength and that is the reason that Nebegleras can stand at top level at this age.
_	Treutlen's "wicked and worldly parents" were also probably the reason that his true origins have remained hidden for so long.
_	That perhaps was the reason that they sought the protection of the Tatars, which Władysław I the Elbow-high became afraid of.
_	This is the reason that the two types of Undead exist—because of their loathing of Nagash and his evil magic the Tomb Kings have separated themselves from such atrocity.
_	Spykman sees that its importance to be the reason that the Rimland will be crucial to containing the Heartland, but Mackinder had believed that the Outer or Insular Crescent would be the most important factor in containing the Heartland.
_	This became the reason that he was never to become a priest.
_	Dennis gave the reason that the quality was not good enough for the agreed price.
_	When a foreman demanded to know the reason that their wages were not raised, he told him, "It doesn't pay to give the working man too much money—it makes him too independent."
_	It then praises the "unparalleled sublimity" of the book's style, which it connects with the rugged Highland landscape and offers as the reason that McDiarmid's sentences "overleap the mounds and impediments of grammar".
_	Arguably, the reason that there was no merger was the fact that the USLDP, the UPSR, and the URLDP all favoured an independent Ukrainian state.
_	Hensley, the reason that he took over the lead vocals on this song was that Heep frontman David Byron had throat problems during the recording session.
_	Following World War I, the Treaty of Versailles contained the first constitution of a new International Labour Organization founded on the principle that "labour is not a commodity", and for the reason that "peace can be established only if it is based upon social justice".
_	This was also the reason that Go Ahead Wageningen participated, as they would later play in the eastern division.
_	Later in the speech, Obama said, "Families like yours, young people like the ones here today — including the ones who were just chanting at me — you're the reason that I ran for office in the first place."
_	The likely eastern limit reached by the language was the Annan, for the reason that Gaelic placenames disappear quite rapidly beyond this boundary.
_	Adequate determinism (see Varieties, above) is the reason that Stephen Hawking calls Libertarian free will "just an illusion".
_	The back EMF is the reason that the motor when free-running does not appear to have the same low electrical resistance as the wire contained in its winding.
_	Jon Laberg, the author of the old local history book for Hafslo discussed the reason that Fet and Joranger each have their own churches, even though these farms lie near to each other.
_	Richard III biographer Paul Murray Kendall believes that the reason that Edward was so harsh with his brother is because he had discovered from Bishop Robert Stillington of Bath and Wells, that George had left slip the secret of Edward's pre-contract marriage with Lady Eleanor TalbotIronically although legend claims Richard III had brought about his brother's death in fact the opposite is true--he tried to prevent it.
_	Cuddy wants to know if she is the reason that House left the hospital.
_	"That's Why I Pray" is a mid-tempo song in which the narrators address social problems, saying that such problems are the reason that they pray.
_	Perifocal reference frames are most commonly used with elliptical orbits for the reason that the formula_1 coordinate must be aligned with the eccentricity vector.
_	Looking back five years after the bill was passed, the Consumers Union reported that wire to wire competition, the reason that sold the bill, had not succeeded as legislators had hoped.
_	The intervention was supported by the French plenipotentiary in Japan, Duchesne de Bellecourt, but the French government, once informed, strongly criticized their representatives in Japan for taking such bellicose steps, for the reason that France had much more important military commitments to honour in other parts of the world, and could not afford a conflict in Japan.
_	Host Davina McCall said the reason that he did not attend was because he was "grounded".
_	It's too short; it's too ebulliently random; and it might very well be the reason that the Disney sequels were finally strangled to death."
_	Maybe this was the reason that in the Bolesław III's Testament, he was omitted and left without any land.
_	Fuentes claimed that electoral fraud benefited Árbenz; however scholars have pointed out that while fraud may possibly have given Árbenz some of his votes, it was not the reason that he won the election.
_	This is the reason that the citrate reaction has low monodispersity.
_	The Magician tells them that the reason that the King cannot see his kingdom for the wonderful place that it is, was because the wymps threw dust in his eyes as a baby.
_	Whether this was the reason that prompted the name Bangali (the people of Bengal) is still unknown.
_	In celebration of the event, 20 Minutes or Less uploaded a special video onto "SourceFed" that featured clips of "SourceFed"'s audience congratulating them and stating the reason that they subscribed to the channel.
_	It is known that the FDM is difficult to model an irregular domain for the reason that it usually requires a rectangular grid system.
_	The ending of Xbox support by the original project was also the reason that it was renamed "XBMC" from the old "Xbox Media Center" name, and why it later was renamed "Kodi".
_	This stable network of covalent bonds and hexagonal rings is the reason that diamond is so strong.
_	Duchesne however was strongly criticized by the French government for taking such bellicose steps, for the reason that France had much more important military commitments to honour in other parts of the world, and could not afford a conflict in Japan.
_	Named by Salter in 1868, "P. taurinus" is treated as a dubious species for the reason that it is effectively a composite composed of fossils of three different eurypterids.
_	In Corfu the 4,500-strong Italian garrison easily overpowered and captured the 500-strong German garrison; the German prisoners were transferred by sea to Italy (and their presence in Italian hands is probably the reason that prevented the Germans from committing another full-scale massacre like in Cephalonia), while the garrison was reinforced by 3,500 more men.
_	Parents with a low socioeconomic status cannot afford many of the health care resources which is the reason that their children may have a more advanced illness because of the lack of treatment.
_	In its October 2010 issue, the Syrian Forward Magazine said that "The series is compelling in particular due to the reason that the everyday incidents of the characters and their relatives,
_	Laerskool Raslouw and Hoërskool Raslouw exists for the reason that a school should exist: to educate pupils.
_	A particularly controversial aspect of the case was that 17 police witnesses declined to give evidence at the coronial inquiry "for the reason that their evidence might have had the tendency to incriminate them."
_	This was the reason that even after the fragmentation of Poland their interest in the Polish matters was still strong.
_	The "Glasgow Herald" Newspaper, on 14 June 1975, wrote "Robert Gayre, of Gayre and Nigg, is singular among genealogists, dynasts and the like, if only for the reason that, alone among them, he has been able to create a Scottish clan from scratch, providing it with traditions, rituals, precedences and privileges..."
_	On the day of the wedding, Elaine tells Jerry that the reason that she was angry was because it was the first time she saw him flirt with another woman.
_	Roth dropped due to scheduling conflict while Binoche citing the reason that it was "too dark".
_	As an example, the reason that 10 is even is that it equals .
_	These changes, in aggregate, reduce weight by , which is the reason that the GT-R accelerates even faster than before.
_	He tells her that "We've got the world tonight/Let's hold on together", and explains that she is the reason that his world turns on its axis.
_	Unlike other TCAs, it does not downregulate β-adrenergic receptors, which is likely the reason that it does not cause orthostatic hypotension.
_	Also in February 2016, LIBRE has expelled the deputies Esdras Amado López and Dennis Antonio Sánchez of Francisco Morazán and Santa Bárbara respectively, based on the reason that they have voted in favour of a new Supreme Court of Justice.
_	This is the reason that at least version 3.1 of MS-DOS is required.
_	Producer Michael Butler, who had declared that "Hair" is "the strongest anti-war statement ever written", said the reason that he opened so many productions was to influence public opinion against the Vietnam War and end it as soon as possible.
_	Little is known of it, other than that it lacked a hall; Baker suggests that this is the reason that it did not survive long enough to appear in many records.
_	After the victory, Yang Xingmi arrested Lü (under the reason that Lü had promised silver to Yang Xingmi's soldiers but failed to deliver) and had Tian interrogate him; under Tian's interrogation, Lü admitted to a plot that he had wanted to murder Gao and replace Gao as the military governor of Huainan; as a result, Lü was executed.
_	In short, what mattered, in the view of the judge, was the combined manifestation of her occupation, her continuing intention to occupy and the reason that prevented her from living at home.
_	This is the reason that diamond-tipped core drills are commonly used in construction to create holes for pipes, manholes, and other large-diameter penetrations in concrete or stone.
_	Martini says that the reason that almost all of the crows' names start with K (with the exception of Erkala) was because of the "Kaw" sound that crows make.
_	That Patriarch, like the other Patriarchs, disliked Russian Orthodoxy for the reason that in Russia the Tsars had abolished the Patriarchate and substituted themselves as heads of the Orthodox Church.
_	Claire resigns, giving the reason that she wants to be more active in Frank's campaign.
_	This is precisely the reason that this paradigm is not always a satisfactory methodology for decision-making under severe uncertainty (Tintner 1952).
_	"It's an improvement," says Meier, adding that "the reason that wall was there has to do with traffic and noise.
_	The district was made of four well-marked physical tracts - the fertile plains to the north between the Kollidam and the Kaveri known as the "Old Delta" which was naturally irrigated by the rivers through a system of anaicuts and comprising the whole of the taluks of Shiyali, Mayavaram and Kumbakonam, the northern part of Mannargudi and Nannilam and the eastern part of Tanjore taluk; the plains to the south of the Kaveri river covering the southern part of Nannilam and Mannargudi taluks known as the "New Delta" for the reason that these tracts were only recently brought under irrigation by numerous manmade canals from the Kaveri and Kollidam and its tributaries and which were less fertile than the Old Delta; the arid Vallam plateau which covered the western part of Tanjore and Pattukkottai taluks and the Vedaranyam salt pans the largest of its kind in the Madras Presidency that extended for about thirty miles in length and four or five miles in width from Point Calimere to Adiramapatnam covering the southern portion of Thiruthiraipoondi taluk and eastern half of Pattukkottai taluk.
_	It has been suggested that negative criticism was the reason that Hardy stopped writing novels after "Jude", but poet C. H. Sisson describes this "hypothesis" as "superficial and absurd".
_	He lost his job for the reason that ""I am not a Roman Catholic"", he wrote later in a letter.
_	Which may be part of the reason that it turns out to be so much fun."
_	In 1902 `Abdu'l-Bahá sent a very important tablet to the Chicago governing body where he said “let the designation of that body be ‘Spiritual Assembly’—this for the reason that, were it to use the term ‘House of Justice’, the government might hereafter come to suppose that it was acting as a court of law, or concerning itself in political matters, or that, at some indeterminate future time, it would involve itself in the affairs of government...
_	Assyria was now a large and powerful empire, and a major threat to Egyptian and Hittite interests in the region, and was perhaps the reason that these two powers, fearful of Assyrian might, made peace with one another.
_	This was probably the reason that he was offered a position as oídor (judge) in the second Audiencia of New Spain when the Council of Indies had to dismiss the first in 1530.
_	It is suggested that public outrage at Musa Kazim's death was the reason that Ragib Nashishibi was not re-elected Mayor of Jerusalem that year.
_	The processes affected especially vowels and are the reason that many Old English words look significantly different from related words in languages such as Old High German, which is much closer to the common West Germanic ancestor of both languages.
_	The navigation clearance of is part of the reason that the H-shaped towers are tall.
_	According to Murphy, "Louis Marshall is largely the reason that everyone from the college is here today.
_	By resolution of the House of January 20, 1909, the seat was declared to have been vacated on January 6, 1909 for the reason that incumbent had entered upon the duties of the office of Governor of Connecticut the preceding day.
_	This was the reason that ethnic study circles called professor Huang a founder of modern Chinese ethnology.
_	Apple Inc. cited UMTS power consumption as the reason that the first generation iPhone only supported EDGE.
_	This was the reason that the village was shelled in the Second World War.
_	William Grimes, also of "The New York Times", described Zakarian as "... the reason that "44" in the Royalton Hotel was always a lot better than it needed to be" in 2001.
_	Thus a Frommean authentic may behave consistently in a manner that accords with cultural norms, for the reason that those norms appear on consideration to be appropriate, rather than simply in the interest of conforming with current norms.
_	Before she could admit to Madrox that she was part of the reason that Terry left X-Factor investigations, Havok steps in and takes the blame.
_	It is not certain whether the head of the Irish branch was a son or a brother of Sir Geoffrey, but it is reasonable that he bore either the one or the other relation, for the reason that the lands of Luttrellstown secured by royal grant by Sir Geoffrey were from this time (of Geoffrey's death) owned by Sir Robert Luttrell, head of the Irish branch, who lived at Lucan, near Dublin, and that it remained in the family until the early part of the nineteenth century.
_	Lindeijer explained that this was the reason that the cause has stalled in the past as none have come forward to assist the postulation in their investigations.
_	On 10 March, defender Richard Dunne said that he felt the reason that City were performing so badly was that their foreign players, including Samaras, were letting the side down by not working hard enough.
_	Academics studying the religion have typically favoured the terms "Heathenry" and "Heathenism" to describe it, for the reason that these words are inclusive of all varieties of the movement.
_	He explains that such value and meaning nihilism is the reason that many modern people endure chronic anxiety about the lack of meaning in life.
_	(According to Bible scholar John D. Laing, it is possible that the reason that only Catholic, Protestant, and Jewish holy books were printed was that those were the three faith groups represented by chaplains at that time.)
_	So the reason that validates the value focus - namely: participation in the system is derived from the comparative value of Basic Income with the earnings of each individual - is the realization of a BI which value is not irrelevant for everyone, a valid action for gradually reaching a Basic Income either closer to the ideal the more significant this is becoming to a growing number of people - first because of the relative and subjective value of their amounts, and then due to the widespread perception of their security-productive effects, for the whole society.
_	This effect is part of the reason that Pluto is dynamically protected from close encounters with Neptune.
_	Calling it "the grand depositum" of the Methodist faith, Wesley specifically taught that the propagation of the doctrine of entire sanctification was the reason that God raised up the Methodists in the world.
_	After the match against FK Rabotnički, Dimitar Ivankov was released from Anorthosis Squad with the reason that he could not help.
_	The marketcasting portion was the reason that Roy Park, owner of Park Broadcasting, purchased the station in late 1977.
_	The first two explanations are unacceptable for the reason that such faulty readings would belong to Qere and Ketiv, which, in case of doubt, the majority of manuscripts would decide.
_	This led to some discontent amongst Chinese fans and it seemed that this was the reason that eventually led to the sacking of Gao as manager by the Chinese Football Association.
_	This is the reason that the street doesn't follow the same layout pattern as the rest of the city; the cattle's path gives the street its curvy shape.
_	[9] It is also the reason that first-wave feminist were able to protest.
_	A writ subsequently filed with the United States Supreme Court on Moyer's behalf alleged, in part, that "said Sherman Bell and the said Buckley Wells loudly and boastfully, through the public press and otherwise, threatened the destruction and death of anyone who should interfere or attempt to interfere with them by the service of said writ", that "said Sherman Bell and the said Buckley Wells did call to their aid and assistance the members of the National Guard", and that the "Sheriff is powerless to execute the order of the court ... by calling to his aid a posse for the reason that the force under the control of the said Bell and the said Wells and the said Governor of the State of Colorado is vastly greater than any force which the said Sheriff could command."
_	Pius protested that "The Holy See would fail in its Divine Mandate if it did not deplore these measures, which gravely damage man in his natural right, mainly for the reason that these people belong to a certain race."
_	After repeating the chorus, Thomas joins in to "sweetly" explain the reason that she's cheating: she needs some attention from her lover.
_	Lovecraft often expressed an appreciation for New England in his personal correspondence, and believed that returning to the area was the reason that his writing improved after he left New York City.
_	It is due to the reason that Salepur belt is one of the largest producers of Paddy in the State of Odisha because of its highly fertile soil.
_	The episode is rather faithful to Doyle's story, except that Moran tries to shoot Holmes in Switzerland instead of dropping boulders on him, and it is Watson – not Holmes – that deduces the reason that Moran had for killing Ronald Adair.
_	"Bullet" references the 1963 assassination of President John F. Kennedy, with sexually explicit lyrics directed at his wife Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis: ""Texas is an outrage when your husband is dead/Texas is an outrage when they pick up his head/Texas is the reason that the President's dead/You gotta suck, suck, Jackie, suck"".
_	<br>For the reason that:
_	In 1996 a argentin journalist claimed that the king of Patagonia was an impostor ans his titles « as false as his presumed majesty », Philippe Boiry tried to sue him, but the case was thrown by the court of Paris for the reason that Philippe Boiry could not justify the titles he claimed.
_	Laurel Avenue is considered one of the most prestigious addresses in Brisbane by some, for the reason that large portions of the avenue are overhung by large camphor laurel ("Cinnamomum camphora") trees (some over a hundred years old).
_	For example, in the Soviet Union, the figure of 26,662,400 in 1986 almost certainly underestimates shortages for the reason that it does not count shortages from large Soviet rural-urban migration; another calculation estimates shortages to be 59,917,900.
_	Redaction usually requires a marking of the redacted area with the reason that the content is being restricted.
_	The quality of the fiction was generally very poor, but Elliott Dold's artwork in both issues was of much higher quality, and is the reason that the magazine remains a collectors' item to this day.
_	This is the reason that Eddie's father, a harsh and abusive man, became a part of Ruby's Heaven.
_	In Japan, drafts based on French laws were rejected after criticism from people like by the reason that "civil law will destroy filial piety".
_	This act later was the reason that van Velde gained his marine commission in London and shows how famous Admiral de Ruyter was in the blind faith that the artists (and the Dutch in general) had in him.
_	In a traumatic flashback, the Knight reveals the reason that the Club originally disbanded, and never succeeded as an international superteam; after losing Batman's commitment, the club was brought down by scandal when the original Knight discovered that Mayhew had killed his wife and framed Mangrove Pierce, an actor with whom she had been having an affair, for her death.
_	Kangaroo rats like to feed on many various grass seeds, as well as mesquite beans and thus is the reason that plants tend to not grow as well when sharing the same community with these rats.
_	Manny learns that the reason that Jay will not hire Jack back is because he almost "hurt [his] kid."
_	The 32×16 characters was the reason that the 6502 was clocked at 750 kHz.
_	With regard to the ease or difficulty of achieving orgasm, Hite's research (while subject to methodological limitations) showed that most women need clitoral (exterior) stimulation for orgasm, which can be "easy and strong, given the right stimulation" and that the need for clitoral stimulation in addition to knowing one's own body is the reason that most women reach orgasm more easily by masturbation.
_	In 1394, he was removed from the post of Coroner of Glos. for the reason that “He dwells not in the county”, although most of his official positions related to that county.
_	Which may be part of the reason that it turns out to be so much fun."
_	This is the reason that BDD insists on a semi-formal language for behavioral specification: some formality is a requirement for being a ubiquitous language.
_	Control is no longer advanced by the members of the Community of Christ's First Presidency, although within the Restoration Branches movement many believe it is the reason that the First Presidency was able to change church doctrine so drastically.
_	This is the reason that sound propagates through solids without significant distortion.
_	His high level of play was the reason that he moved to one of the top Polish clubs, PGE Skra Bełchatów in 2013.
_	When the time came to choose high schools, instead of going to Seihō High School, a known baseball powerhouse in Nagasaki, he opted to go to Hasami High School instead, for the reason that he wanted to reach the Koshien using his own abilities.
_	The move was due to the reason that it never gained headway against its rival show "Showbiz Lingo".
_	This is the reason that Syeds of Rakh Syedan are also called as Masanvi Sadaat.
_	A statement from the band cited the issue as the reason that Tennant ceased his well-publicized support of Tony Blair's Labour party.
_	This lesson is the twin sister of the one on ACCURATE THOUGHT, for the reason that no one may become an Accurate Thinker without practicing tolerance.
_	He explained that "these tables save much labor, [but] they are but little known for the reason that they have never been printed in our country."
_	This is cited as being the reason that Lapaha in Mu'a, the former capital of the Tu'i Tongan Empire, is Catholic in contrast to neighbouring Tatakamotonga, which is predominantly Methodist.
_	Historians met to discuss the cause on 20 November 2012 to ascertain if historical obstacles existed and the reason that the cause had not been introduced earlier as a recognition of holiness.
_	Obama said, "I think that the reason that the organizers used the phrase Black Lives Matter was not because they were suggesting that no one else's lives matter ... rather what they were suggesting was there is a specific problem that is happening in the African American community that's not happening in other communities."
_	The company is also required to inform investors regarding why the same person is to serve as the board of directors' chairman and its chief executive officer (CEO), or the reason that different individuals must serve as the board's chairman or CEO.
_	That Pasta owned a house near Como and would be staying there over the summer was the reason that Felice Romani traveled to meet both her and Bellini.
_	Central Education Institution was closed by the Japanese Occupation Government from 1922 to 1928, for the reason that the institution had led Samil Undong uprising.
_	This is the reason that from approximately southwards of Tel Aviv there stretches an area of seabed that is relatvely shallow.
_	Over time children used to play in the fields and farmers reckoned that that was the reason that their children were so strong.
_	But co-producer Aamir Khan replaced them with Maxima Basu, the assistant director of Slumdog Millionaire, giving the reason that they charged too much money for the film's budget.
_	The conventional nature of the poem, what Evelyn Simpson called its "frigid conceit," is perhaps a large part of the reason that this poem is not among the most famous of the sonnets today.
_	According to the liner notes of her next album, "The Power of Jennifer Rush", she explained that after that performance she slipped off the stage and broke her leg; despite honoring most of her tour dates, this caused a considerable delay in recording "The Power of Jennifer Rush", and was the reason that album was issued as a compilation album rather than a studio album.
_	Increased attention to livestock was the reason that Spain became a net importer of grains.
_	They stated as the reason that they wished to have more freedom to disagree with the party publicly.
_	According to Carl Jung's principle of compensation, the reason that there is latent content in dreams is that the unconscious is making up for the limitations of the conscious mind.
_	But it absorbs the infrared energy emitted (radiated) upward by the earth's surface, which is the reason that humid areas experience very little nocturnal cooling but dry desert regions cool considerably at night.
_	Abejorral the aspect of a city "suspended" in the colonial era, which is the reason that a part of the municipality was declared National monument.
_	For example, according to Peter Berkowitz, the reason that "[t]he primarily democratic nature of the Constitution's governmental structure has not always seemed obvious", as Breyer puts it, is "because it's not true, at least in Breyer's sense that the Constitution elevates active liberty above modern [negative] liberty".
_	( is the highest-pitched and most piercing, which is the reason that hissing sounds like "Sssst!" or "Psssst!" are typically used to attract someone's attention).
_	Sharing a physical border with Germany was also part of the reason that the Swiss maintained amicable economic relations with Germany.
_	An accomplished pottery artist, Kishiwada is the reason that Kayoko takes a job as an apprentice to a pottery teacher.
_	Stiffelio lays out the reason that their marriage can be annulled ("Opposto è il calle che in avvenire" – "Opposite are the paths that in future our lives will follow").
_	Education is an important factor to improve technology in order to boost productivity, which is the reason that US and Canada surpassed the others.
_	For the reason that he was an agnostic and libertarian, his burial took place without religious ceremony.
_	Perhaps that was the reason that the new owner of the artwork in 1996 carried it away as scrap...
_	This being the reason that, on the set of "House", she felt "at home, in a strange way".
_	This is the reason that defensive linemen such as Richard Seymour and Vince Wilfork do not always rack up sack and tackle statistics despite their critical importance to the team.
_	Later in his book "A Writer's Tale" Davies discussed with co-author Benjamin Cook how he had originally named the character "Peth" in a treatment but it bugged him, he later renamed her to "Astrid" giving the reason that it "...sounds more spacey, more like a futuristing Doctor's companion".
_	The Ruthenians composed most of the population of the Grand Duchy of Lithuania: this is the reason that the late GDL is often called a Slavic country, alongside Poland, Russia etc.
_	This is the reason that the schims competed against each other in 1970 Elections.
_	The first principal was Mr.H.Davin, hence the reason that the footpath to the administrative building was named "Davinweg".
_	Kings were not very active in legislating especially for the reason that Hindu legal texts always preceded the authority of the king.
_	Siberians were using a full 25% of the Agricultural machinery in the country, which was part of the reason that grain production exploded in this period.
_	The large value of the enthalpy of condensation of water vapor is the reason that steam is a far more effective heating medium than boiling water, and is more hazardous.
_	Shamar's mother and sister who work as servants at the Sanghvi house, being the reason that Akashi knew Shamar in the first place, become very close to her, therefore she begins to enjoy living there.
_	Not because he made any decisions, but for the reason that his illness contributed to the fact that others have imposed these decisions on him.
_	NOTE: Yin Yang Man was also a contender and he challenged Turbo for the title (hence the reason that Yin Yang Man was starting on his second Dragon Belt when the series started), but Turbo defeated him.
_	In his cell, Trafford is visited by Sandra Dee, who turns out to be an undercover police officer, and the reason that the Temple knows all about the Humanists.
_	Her bedside manner (or lack thereof) is part of the reason that Dr. Cox decides to split the role of chief resident between her and the more sensitive J.D. (saying the two of them together would make "one barely passable doctor/Labradoodle").
_	In winter, this relatively warm water, even though covered by the polar ice pack, keeps the North Pole from being the coldest place in the Northern Hemisphere, and it is also part of the reason that Antarctica is so much colder than the Arctic.
_	In March 2018, Bosnian leader Bakir Izetbegovic said, some days before the visit of the Turkish President in Bosnia, that Recep Tayyip Erdoğan is a mentor for the Muslims and this is the reason that West doesn't like him.
_	The inquisitors imply that the banner is the reason that she had been victorious in battle, but Joan gives all credit to God.
_	This behaviour was the reason that, on 6 December 1388, Freiburg attacked and destroyed Falkenstein Castle.
_	This building in particular wasn't the reason that 4/64 Armor (3rd Infantry Division) and 1/6 Infantry (1st Armored Division) were securing this area.
_	The latter shot missed hitting anyone and was the reason that Brehm quickly dragged his son to the ground, covering him protectively.
_	The middle one, Number 5, is called “uniquely deviating” (asādhāraṇa), perhaps for the reason that this sign becomes a unique sign of the paksa itself, and is not found anywhere else.
_	In 2013, "Complex" ranked Siegfried/Nightmare the best character in the series, citing his duality as the reason that makes the character "one of the most fascinating characters in the entire series."
_	Lovecraft often expressed an appreciation for New England in his personal correspondence, and believed that returning to the area was the reason that his writing improved after he left New York City.
_	Furthermore, when clients questioned Barclays about these rejected trades, Barclays failed to disclose the reason that the trades were being rejected, instead citing technical issues or providing vague responses.
_	He then realizes (after imagining Alan lecturing him) that Bridget's controlling behavior was the reason that their relationship first failed.
_	In 1985, Paul Wong, who initially designed posters and record covers for Beyond, became the band's lead guitarist after former lead guitarist Chan Sze On (陳時安)'s departure due to the reason that he went abroad.
_	This is also the reason that the A 92 is used in part as a test stretch by the BMW factory in Dingolfing.
_	However, others, while agreeing that the case did not invent the idea of shareholder wealth maximization, found that it was an accurate statement of the law, in that "corporate officers and directors have a duty to manage the corporation for the purpose of maximizing profits for the benefit of shareholders" is a default legal rule, and that the reason that ""Dodge v. Ford" is a rule that is hardly ever enforced by courts" is not that it represents bad case law, but because the business judgement rule means:
_	Mistakes and philosophical weaknesses in reasoning about infinitesimal numbers in the work of Gottfried Leibniz, Johann Bernoulli, Leonhard Euler, Augustin-Louis Cauchy, and others were the reason that they were originally abandoned for the more cumbersome real number-based arguments developed by Georg Cantor, Richard Dedekind, and Karl Weierstrass, which were perceived as being more rigorous by Weierstrass's followers.
_	Part of the reason that unpaid care work is largely ignored is because of this belief that the household does not form wealth.
_	This disturbing image may be the reason that the page was removed from the Codex Sangermanensis.
_	Byrnes says similarly, "I think [the Watchers are] part of the reason that the character caught on.
_	For the art historian Elena Filipovic, the high importance of Duchamp’s "Fountain" in art history accrued especially because of the reason that the artist understood very well that the reproduction, display, framing, dissemination, and reception of an artwork not only constructs its value and meaning, but also help determine how and if it enters history at all.
_	Thomas Dilworth has asserted that the reason that Jones' poetry is not widely read today is the "general neglect of "The Anathemata.""
_	Thus, the reason that "B. mallei" is not found outside of a host is because it lacks the genes necessary for survival in the soil.
_	This may have been the reason that a four-corps sized formation - which would usually be considered an army - was given the title of 'Army group'.
_	"...he wondered now if the reason that he could not find his consciousness was that not all of it was inside of him.
_	We often define formula_9 as elemental signal, for the reason that any 4-D can be generated by taking a linear combination of elemental signals.
_	"Will Scott, an artist and author, has written in "The Limping Man" a comedy thriller which is far above the average if only for the reason that it contains at least a score of very amusing lines.
_	On February 27, 2004, the Constitutional Court of Bosnia and Herzegovina issued an opinion declaring the names of certain municipalities in Republika Srpska to be in violation of the Constitution of Bosnia and Herzegovina for the reason that the war names "are not consistent with the constitutional principle of the equality of the constituent peoples in Bosnia and Herzegovina."
_	This coding is the reason that during the entire World War II the group and all 4500 people in hiding were never unmasked.
_	The dual expression thus produced is of the same form, and the reason that the dual is always a valid statement can be traced to the duality of electricity and magnetism.
_	This important step, that the refusal to play Roslavets's compositions was justified for the reason that Roslavets belonged "to the arrested peoples’ enemies," did not improve the situation; Roslavets's oeuvre was suppressed.
_	The applicability of a mathematical concept is not the reason that Hardy considered applied mathematics somehow inferior to pure mathematics, though; it is the simplicity and prosiness that belong to applied mathematics that led him to describe them as he did.
_	Philip Sidney, in "Defense of Poetry," argued that poetic justice was, in fact, the reason that fiction should be allowed in a civilized nation.
_	Witnesses who testified before the commission claimed that conflict between the officers was the reason that necessary precautions were not taken before "Kronan" came about.
_	The Gemara explained that when Jews recite the "Shema", they recite the words, "blessed be the name of God's glorious Kingdom for ever and ever," quietly between the words, "Hear, O Israel: the Lord our God, the Lord is one," from and the words, "And you shall love the Lord your God with all your heart, and with all your soul, and with all your might," from for the reason that Rabbi Simeon ben Lakish expounded when he explained what happened in That verse reports, "And Jacob called to his sons, and said: ‘Gather yourselves together, that I may tell you what will befall you in the end of days.'"
_	The company cited high labor costs in Germany as the reason that its sole European location was not sufficiently profitable.
_	After his return to Germany he and most of the other German gymnasts were suspended, because the "Deutsche Turnerschaft" (at this time the governing body of German gymnastics) boycotted the Olympic games with the reason that competing is "unGerman."
_	However, during the Writer's Block Q&A session at The Office Convention in 2007, the writers, perhaps sardonically, suggested that Tom's death was the reason that Ryan was brought in as a temporary worker.
_	This is part of the reason that these lice are able to survive and thrive off of the cattle.
_	You’ll see that the drugs are the reason that Ryan is falling out with everyone and causing trouble.
_	Third—and the reason that above-cost bundles should not be just presumptively lawful but "per se" lawful—fact finders are not able reliably to distinguish between efficient bundles and those whose anticompetitive effects outweigh efficiency.
_	What then is the reason that we imprison these people?
_	He felt that faith was the reason that kept them from accepting the facts and evidence for evolution.
_	The most common and probable opinion is that irregularity is contracted, for the reason that it is not the guilt of the desire, but the intention to contract and consummate the two marriages which is the reason of the irregularity as laid down by Innocent III (Cap. 4, De Big).
_	This is the reason that some dates have an apparent discrepancy of one year.
_	During the early 1990s, Peugeot decided not to directly replace the Peugeot 205, citing the reason that superminis were no longer profitable or worthwhile.
_	This may be the reason that triple-agent operations appear not to have been undertaken by U.S. counterintelligence in some espionage cases that have come to light in recent years, particularly among those involving high-level penetrations.
_	Therefore, it is the reason that Yanbang enslaved Korean as thought of the saints Jizi’s purpose to educate them.
_	For the reason that 'sameness' has been construed as a male perspective, some feminists reject the term ejaculation.
_	Young once taught that the devil was black, and his successor as church president, John Taylor, taught on multiple occasions that the reason that black people (those with the curse of Cain) were allowed to survive the flood was so that the devil could be properly represented on the earth through the children of Ham and his wife Egyptus.
_	This is the reason that we called it "Curtain Call", because this could be the final thing.
_	The Council of Elvira (306), Canon 6, refused the holy Viaticum to those who had killed a man by a "per maleficium", translated as "visible effect of malicious intention" and adds the reason that such a crime could not be effected "without idolatry"; which probably means without the aid of the Devil, devil-worship and idolatry being then convertible terms.
_	Anthropologists Alice B. Kehoe and Dody H. Giletti argued that the reason that women are more commonly seen in Afro-Eurasian spirit possession cults is because of deficiencies in thiamine, tryptophan-niacin, calcium, and vitamin D.
_	She explains Gilberte’s infidelity was the reason that Robert enlisted.
_	Livy refers to two competing traditions for the reason that Romulus chose that number of lictors.
_	People, who are never really left with an explanation as to why, generally fall back on the reason that "it was their time to go" and through this somewhat "explanation" find themselves able to move on and keep living life.
_	This is also the reason that if the player travels outside of the level using the noclip cheat the floors and ceilings will appear to stretch out from the level over the empty space.
_	Joseph and Anne now lived in London, and this may be the reason that a third, local person, Lewis Jones, acted as the Harris's agent.
_	And the Midrash explained that the reason that they buried Joseph's bones in Shechem could be compared to a case in which some thieves stole a cask of wine, and when the owner discovered them, the owner told them that after they had consumed the wine, they needed to return the cask to its proper place.
_	Numan discovers that Them perceive the ticks as a greater threat than the humans or the auxes, but realises that Them are evolving rapidly to counter the ticks, which is the reason that intelligent
_	This was the reason that initial shows in Canada were cancelled, delaying the first North American leg.
_	The Holy See would fail in its Divine Mandate if it did not deplore these measures, which gravely damage man in his natural right, merely for the reason that these people belong to a certain race."
_	Congress eventually refused to pay Hopkinson for the reason that Hopkinson was already paid as a public servant as a member of Congress.
_	It is soon apparent that Medusa's decision to destroy the Terrigen Cloud is the reason that is afflicting Medusa.
_	This is the reason that many potentially innocent activities, such as a scavenger hunt, are included under hazing; they could start out as perfectly legal events, but could easily be modified to include some activity that could make it hazing (ex. stealing some of the items on the list or adding heavy drinking before or during).
_	His traditional style as a Bourbon prince of the Parmesan branch is the reason that cadet members of the Grand Ducal Family of Luxembourg enjoy the style of "Royal Highness" (but that style belongs to the Luxembourg monarch and heir apparent by right, as the historical prerogative of grand ducal dynasties).
_	It seems that the reason that he used his initials, H.B.P., and not his full name in the work; it could be that he practically transcribed commentaries of Mattioli.
_	Heartbroken over this and insecurity over his height, he tries to commit suicide but is prevented by his mother, who then reveals the reason that his dwarfism might have been because of the poison force-fed to her when she was pregnant with the twins.
_	As with many other episodes, Duchovny did not want his character to have all the answers, giving the reason that it looked too easy for him.
_	In frustration she replied, "this is the reason that nobody likes the Jews."
_	Blaine has a sister named Summer, who, according to the "Cali Girl" storyline, was a good friend of Barbie's, and the reason that Barbie first met Blaine.
_	The fact that this treatment was worse in the south than in the north was the reason that the war began in the south.
_	He was a devoted admirer of the heroes of the Independence of Chile, the reason that led him to become a collector patient of whatever object that may be linked to these heroes.
_	Other economists argue that the deficits slowed economic growth during the following administration and was the reason that Reagan's successor, George H.W. Bush, and raised taxes.
_	This was rumored to be the reason that Ashley demanded the repayment of his £5m loan to the club.
_	The age gap between Nicolaes and his older halfbrother Harmen is probably the reason that Houbraken called him a grandson.
_	Flipping back to the present, Black Widow is back saving people from the incursion as the reason that triggered Natasha's flashback is revealed...a man she saved is holding his cat.
_	Atkins alleged that the reason that she repudiated her grand jury testimony was that "Manson sent his followers to suggest that it might be better for me and my son if I decided not to testify against him".
_	According to Kant autonomy is part of the reason that we hold others morally accountable for their actions.
_	Constabilis is venerated as the patron saint of Castellabate, for the reason that he founded the town.
_	One suggestion for the reason that laborers in Africa are marginalized in world trade is because the colonial division of labor kept Africa from developing its own industries.
_	The song "Bullet" references the 1963 assassination of John F. Kennedy, with sexually explicit lyrics directed at his wife Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis: ""Texas is an outrage when your husband is dead/Texas is an outrage when they pick up his head/Texas is the reason that the President's dead/You gotta suck, suck, Jackie, suck"".
_	The efficiency of velocity-matched interactions is also the reason that fusion products tend to heat the electrons rather than (as would be desirable) the ions.
_	Short-sightedness on the part of the military was the reason that no preparatory training in guerrilla warfare was ever imposed on the Army... no federal unit under Harmar or St. Clair was ever instructed in the frontiersmen's method of war".
_	These expectations are a large part of the reason that the promotion criteria for "yokozuna" are so strict in the first place.
_	Martin missed the game through injury, and some see this as the reason that Southampton beat Palace by two goals to nil.
_	Henry then defends his own case by saying that the reason that he is still part of the Citizens'
_	His kicking was considered an issue, and was likely the reason that he was overlooked by in 2013.
_	Foote argues that the reason that Louise Mallard wanted more autonomy was because she and her husband did not spend time together.
_	Later the readers find out that the reason that her rapist cannot be contacted is because Susan had killed her attacker.
_	Besides this, in one of the corners, where are the four Evangelists, nude, with books in their hands, it does not seem to me that in a single place did he give a thought to any order of composition, or measurement, or time, or variety in the heads, or diversity in the flesh-colours, or, in a word, to any rule, proportion or law of perspective, for the whole work is full of nude figures with an order, design, invention, composition, colouring, and painting contrived after his own fashion, and with such melancholy and so little satisfaction for him who beholds the work, that I am determined, since I myself do not understand it, although I am a painter, to leave all who may see it to form their own judgement, for the reason that I believe that I would drive myself mad with it, and would bury myself alive, even as it appears to me that Jacopo in the period of eleven years that he spent upon it sought to bury himself and all who might see the painting, among all those extraordinary figures...
_	The first allows the clinician to specify the reason that the criteria for a specific disorder are not met; the second allows the clinician the option to forgo specification.
_	This is also the reason that male sexuality is based, in early Lacanianism, on having (a penis) and female sexuality is based on lack.
_	Visual acuity is typically measured while fixating, i.e. as a measure of central (or foveal) vision, for the reason that it is highest there.
_	On February 26, Ken Keller, a reporter for the "Kootenai Valley Times", telephoned the U.S. Probation Office and asked whether the reason that Weaver did not show in court on February 20 was that the letter sent to him by Richins had the incorrect date.
_	On the other hand, it also made it reliant on these foreign investment, such as reliant on Hong Kong for these foreign investment, due to the reason that Hong Kong is a free trade market.
_	This interaction is the reason that the perchlorate fails to be tetrahedral.
_	I would, Sir, convey a warning on behalf of people of the South for the reason that there are already elements in South India who want separation..., and my honourable friends in U.P. do not help us in any way by flogging their idea of "Hindi Imperialism" to the maximum extent possible.
_	I have been dissatisfied with my handling of decaying races in stories, for the reason that degeneracy is so prevalent in such races that it can not be ignored as a motive and as a fact if the fiction is to have any claim to realism.
_	Member Bruce Johnston refused to travel for the reason that "it had all got too weird."
_	This is the reason that this sanctuary's ecological zone is much larger keeping in view the anthropogenic and cattle population pressure that are considered as a ‘biotic threat’ to omnivorous species like the bustards.
_	It is soon apparent that Medusa's decision to destroy the Terrigen Cloud is the reason that is afflicting Medusa.
_	The division of powers is also the reason that the term "civil rights" is not used in Canada in the same way as it is used in other countries, such as the United States.
_	This was also the reason that John Williams Hope stayed behind in Amsterdam during the French occupation when the rest of the family fled to London.
_	Cædwalla's military successes may be the reason that at about this time the term "West Saxon" starts to be used in contemporary sources, instead of "Gewisse".
_	The inter-operability of cars from several manufacturers with three types of traction control was the reason that they were called Standard Stock.
_	In a widely distributed piece, a geologist wrote that the island was "notable among the West Indian group for the reason that its preponderant population is of the white race".
_	She also said that the style of humour in the film was the reason that the British Empire collapsed.
_	However, divine will is the reason that the house collapses at the particular moment when I am inside.
_	Afterwords, once safe, Rin explains that the walls are thick in this world, which is the reason that they have been taken from their world to this world.
_	This is the reason that the "William Tell Overture" was adopted as the Lone Ranger theme and "The Flight of the Bumble Bee" became the theme for the Green Hornet show.
_	Complaints like this were part of the reason that the Players' League was formed in 1890.
_	Holden suggested that the choice to give Sharon The Vic was part of the reason that her predecessor, licensee Eddie Royle (Michael Melia), was killed off in the serial.
_	Takeru Satoh claims that the reason that "Den-O" has amassed such popularity is because of its comedic timing.
_	The fact that many philosophers have followed Quine in this direction is part of the reason that many now say that the term "analytic philosophy" is a misnomer.
_	This problem, that "messages wash away very quickly," is the reason that the federal government is trying to formulate a better social media strategy.
_	However, after a conversation with Corrine, Garrett realizes that he cannot be the reason that Erin turns down the job and the two part ways after an emotional conversation and a long hug in the airport.
_	The dangerous properties of ether peroxides are the reason that diethyl ether and other peroxide forming ethers like tetrahydrofuran (THF) or ethylene glycol dimethyl ether (1,2-dimethoxyethane) are avoided in industrial processes.
_	Indeed, before the reform of Pope Pius X, feasts were gladly added for the reason that celebration of Matins on a saint's day involved recitation of only nine short psalms instead of the 18 long psalms assigned on Sundays and the 12 long psalms assigned on weekdays.
_	Supernova decided it was Ryan who was eliminated, citing the reason that they feel that he may not be the perfect fit for the band.
_	If, however, the party to whom the father wishes to marry one of his daughters was a desirable person, and the daughter would do well to marry him, although he cannot compel her to perform what he promised, he can disinherit her, for the reason that she was not grateful to her father for the benefit he desired to confer upon her, and caused him sorrow through her disobedience.
_	He believes that Alice is the reason that he can still smile.
_	In 1946, Congress passed the Rescission Act, stripping Filipinos of the benefits they were promised, giving the reason that the United States gave the Philippines two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) after the war.
_	According to the testimonies of Rohingya witnesses, the reason that sparked the riot was because of sexual harassment against female Rohingya Muslim inmates by the Burmese Buddhist inmates.
_	I think that's the reason that we didn't have the big pick-ups.
_	Giving the reason that Karna had humiliated Draupadi and disrespected their shared guru, Parashurama, Bhishma refuses to take him in the Kaurava army.
_	Donald Gray (born Elred Owermann Tidbury, 3 March 1914 – 7 April 1978) was a South African actor, well known for his starring role in the British TV series "Mark Saber", for providing the voices of Colonel White, Captain Black and the Mysterons in "Captain Scarlet and the Mysterons", and for being the reason that Donald Marshall Gray changed his name to Charles Gray when he became an actor.
_	The blogger published in 2008, that the reason that lawyer has freed twice Daniel Dantas of prison is that he was "very smart carioca", met with advisors of the Minister Gilmar Mendes (STF) to bribe them, where after meeting Dantas who was released from custody.
_	This is assumed to be the reason that they hate men.
_	Halley's good feelings for Ray continues to grow when he saves her life from one of her father's obsessively deranged student who is in love with her father and thinks Halley is the reason that her father is rejecting her advances.
_	For this reason, Raz seems determined to inflict his family's misfortune on Airi but in volume 4, it is revealed that actually, he likes her and that the reason that he tried to kill her was because he had a deal with her majesty Queen Veedua that if he helped her in this task she must let him travel wherever he likes.
_	They cited lack of newborn vitamin K administration as the reason that the problems occurred, and recommended that breastfed babies could have an increased risk unless they receive a preventative dose.
_	According to scholar Robert Matz, "this has been assumed since the young man of the sonnets appears to be of higher birth than Shakespeare [and also for the reason that] poets in the English Renaissance often wrote or dedicated their poems to aristocratic men or women, because of the potential for prestige and literary patronage that writing for an aristocrat brought."
_	Papadopoulos had informed his coach Soulis Papadopoulos for his intention to leave the club due to serious economic problems and that was the reason that was not among the starting XI in the home game against OFI.
_	As a national artist he is highly respected and well known in Norway, but doesn't receive much international attention, which is the reason that his name is often not included in registers of internationally recognized painters and artists.
_	Genji adored his stepmother , a later favorite consort of Emperor Kiritsubo, because of her close resemblance to the dead Lady Kiritsubo, and that similarity was also the reason that Emperor Kiritsubo had her enter his court.
_	The relatively recent, postcolonial expansion is also the reason that Q'eqchi' is perhaps the most homogeneous of the larger Mayan languages.
_	Their original charter reportedly derives from the Duke of Mecklenburg, and part of the reason that they might have retained a high reputation (equal to the Marxbruder, despite not having their cachet) for so long was the high requirements for any fencing master in Germany to start a school.
_	This was cited as the reason that BitMover revoked a license allowing Linux developers free use of their BitKeeper product.
_	This same principle is the reason that hydrophobic amino acid side chains are oriented away from water, minimizing their interaction with water.
_	Underlining his lack of faith in the ability to increase agricultural or industrial productivity, he cites America's vast size as the reason that economic policy will fail, and expansionism can be the only route for Germany.
_	This is also the reason that his drum solo on the live album "Burning Down the Opera" is called the "Solitary Bunny Drum Solo".
_	This made the beach quite dangerous and was the reason that the club is sited where it is.
_	They Said that the reason that the Village obtained the Name Panchigaon was only because of, there were only 5 (five=Assamese term Panch )
_	Additionally, he was quite compassionate in that he turned down the requirement of rebuilding palaces for the reason that the people shouldn't labor too much.
_	The attack left Ember's family dead and is the reason that he needs to use a wheelchair, and ever since he's been hunting the demon "Maggie" who he named after the woman it had possessed.
_	Justice Abella's statement in paragraphs 82 and 83 also raises questions because she justifies the grant of positive rights to reproduce compilations based on the reason that the "ability to produce a collective work in the first place depends on the individual authors’ authorization to use the materials that form the compilation."
_	Accordingly, in Ahmad's view, this was the reason that the Old Testament had prophesied a messenger "like unto" Moses, in reference to Muhammad, while according to the Quran , Jesus used the elative form "Ahmad" when referring to that messenger since it reflected his own disposition and circumstances.
_	Some feel the reason that Israeli Centurions defeated the Arab T-55's and even T-62's is because the Centurion has good sights and the Arab tanks were downgrades of the original design, as the T-55 used by the Soviet and Warsaw pact Armies had 200mm armor thickness while T-55's sold to the Arabs had only 120mm frontal armor and mediocre side and rear armor.
_	This is the reason that positive science, according to Giddens, is never possible in the social sciences: every time an investigator tries to identify causal sequences of action, the actors can change their further line of action.
_	His murder strained relations between the Bosnian government and UNPROFOR and was also the reason that peace talks in Geneva were cancelled.
_	This is the reason that we asked that only the shipping agent, Mr Erwin Meister, and myself, Larry Tremaine, to come out here to the "Mebo II" to see what the problem was.
_	In his opinion, the Brunei National Under-16 Youth League has benefits for youth players development for the reason that it will expose them to competitive matches.
_	University President Jim Garland called the benefits "a critical component of Miami's compensation program" and noted that official description of marriage amendment that voters approved said that it "'does not interfere in any way with government benefits granted to persons in non-marital homosexual relationships, so long as the government does not grant those benefits to such persons specifically for the reason that the relationship is one that seeks to imitate marriage.'"
_	This was found to be the reason that sharks are attracted to bright yellow survival gear rather than ones that were painted black.
_	This act later was the reason that van Velde gained his marine commission in London.
_	After the coup on January 13, 1972, the Supreme Court was again abolished by the National Redemption Council with the reason that the 1969 constitution had been suspended and so there was no need for a court to "interpret and enforce it".
_	As Confucianism was the major competing native belief set among the elite, the reason that Buddhist texts enjoyed such widespread printing needs explanation.
_	His reduced subject matter and calligraphic style, has been compared to the works of Philip Guston, for the reason that by focusing on a limited, but meaningful subject matter, an individual technique matures.
_	Vennor resigned from the Geological Survey of Canada in 1881, giving the reason that he had interests in land for phosphate mining which parliament was legislating to make a conflict of interest.
_	It matters not what way the Supreme Court may hereafter decide as to the abstract question whether slavery may or may not go into a Territory under the Constitution, the people have the lawful means to introduce it or exclude it as they please, for the reason that slavery cannot exist a day or an hour anywhere, unless it is supported by local police regulations.
_	None of these conditions was in fact inaugurated or maintained for the reason that the responsible commanders failed to consult and cooperate as to necessary action based upon the warnings and to adopt measures enjoined by the orders given them by the chiefs of the Army and Navy commands in Washington.
_	He tried to get a formal divorce on the reason that "his marriage had never been more than a form, and that his wife had run away; but Russian law at the time was not favourable to divorce, and the attempt failed."
_	Desperate to save the kingdom and her people, Princess Hilda conspired with her servant Yuga to steal Hyrule's Triforce, unaware that her actions were exactly the reason that her ancestors had destroyed Lorule's Triforce and that Yuga wanted the Triforce for himself.
_	Some believe the reason that in ancient times, which in the local language Gabr Gore = gowr are pronounced at this point in life have been well-known blind and over time (G) to (k) has become.
_	Márquez, who was represented by his son, claimed that he was doing research on his autobiography and that was the reason that he showed up on the surveillance tapes.
_	An oxygen tank is especially dangerous for the reason that the oxygen is at a pressure of 21 MPa (3000 lbf/in² = 200 atmospheres) when full, and if the tank falls over and its valve strikes something and is knocked off, the tank will effectively become an extremely deadly flying missile propelled by the compressed oxygen, capable of even breaking through a brick wall.
_	This might have been the reason that in 1879, when the murals on the history of Manchester for Manchester Town Hall were commissioned from both Ford Madox Brown and Frederic Shields, he withdrew, leaving Brown to complete all twelve works.
_	The Coordinating Minister for the Economy gave the reason that the distant between the two cities is only .
_	Hikari had died once but his human host's will, Kazuya Serizawa was the reason that the Mother of Ultra granted the former a new life.
_	This type of technology is not secure for the reason that its procedures do not support error handling or data recovery.
_	The Comiskeys were very conservative spenders (which many hypothesize to be the reason that the Black Sox scandal even occurred in the first place) and it was not until 1958 that the family gave up majority ownership to Bill Veeck, who was an innovative marketer but lacked sufficient resources to compete with wealthier teams.
_	He is also the reason that the London Underground is colloquially named "the tube".
_	Osceola is probably the reason that the sports teams in Irwin County are now known as the Indians.
_	was leaving the band, citing the reason that the demands of constant touring had overwhelmed him.
_	The difference in the above factors for the case of "θ"=0 is the reason that most broadcasting (transmissions intended for the public) uses vertical polarization.
_	Most of the recordings, which are largely abridged musical interpretations of arcane and proper historical text, have not seen official release (several for the reason that they are "not masterpieces").
_	For Marxist philosophy in general, rationalization is closely associated with the concept of "commodity fetishism", for the reason that not only are products designed to fulfill certain tasks, but employees are hired to fulfill specific tasks as well.
_	This was the reason that the disturbances had only effects in Turkey and did not cascade to neighbouring countries.
_	The excuse they used was that the film contained scenes of the Mexican army and was the reason that they had to cut two scenes in which soldiers appear: the final, in which two soldiers are patrolling the ground floor of the Chihuahua, and a scene about halfway through the film, in which two soldiers ask to look inside the apartment in search of students.
_	In response to criticism of HRW's appointment of Jabarin to its Middle East board, HRW's program director, Iain Levine, described the Supreme Court's charges as “curious and misguided” and insisted that Jabarin was “the reason that tyrants in the Middle East are now trembling in their boots.”
_	It is said that producing the ASAP album took over a year for the reason that most of their hosts/performers are already signed with other major record labels.
_	to catch on to the reason that Myron is actually on the team and convinces him that they
_	This is because they either had a very small number of men in France and the date set for the games was too near to allow time for training and transporting others or for the reason that their troops had already left French soil and were being demobilized at home.
_	In 2005, an outdoor music and dance performance in Qalqiliya were suddenly banned by the Hamas led municipality, for the reason that such an event would be forbidden by Islam, or "Haram".
_	An interesting part of the 12th century history is the imprisonment of Richard the Lion heart, the King of England at the Kuenringerburg castle (now in ruins) above the Dürnstein town for the reason that he insulted the Babenberg Duke, Leopold V by showing disrespect to the Austrian flag (he had thrown it into a drain).
_	He used these models to demonstrate that war against a country with a commercial monopoly was just—significant for the reason that England was regarded as a commercial monopolist in France in this period, and that a country with a commercial monopoly in food would defeat a country without such a monopoly.
_	After his return to Germany he and most of the other German gymnasts were suspended, because the "Deutsche Turnerschaft" (at this time the governing body of German gymnastics) boycotted the Olympic games with the reason that competing is "ungerman".
_	After becoming dismayed at the poor quality of coffee in the United States (according to Peet, the reason that the quality of coffee was so bad in the USA is that people were still drinking World War II style "rationed" coffee), he opened his own coffee store in Berkeley, California, in 1966.
_	Simmonds was a small man physically, which is the reason that the RAF pilots chosen to fly the aircraft were of a similar stature.
_	This is a matter of small consequence, for the reason that the gear change is extraordinarily easy to accomplish between top and third without paying much attention to the use of the accelerator pedal.
_	They often resemble slate shingles and were mass-produced during the 20th century as these were more resilient to weathering than traditional slate shingles for the reason that slate is very soft and prone to weathering.
_	The most significant aspect of this product, and the reason that disk drives in general became known as "Winchester technology", was that this was IBM's first drive to not unload the heads from the media.
_	The courts cited compassion as the reason that they gave in to many of the 450 appeals who demanded the courts should allow patients to receive the stem cell "panacea".
_	Since Lotus Notes 8.5, IBM started to change the term Database to Application, because of the reason that these files are not really object databases as mentioned above.
_	She was 26, a Roman Catholic and somewhat delicate, which is assumed to be the reason that they never had any children.
_	Krishna did not approve of this since he desired that the villagers worship Mount Govardhan with the reason that Mount Govardhan is the one that provides natural resources to the villagers for their livelihood.
_	Perhaps this unpredictability is the reason that there are so many variations, including the practice of stringing variations together — which may be considered cheating.
_	"The Crown Diamond" is an alternate version of the short story "The Adventure of the Mazarin Stone" though it predates its counterpart by some time, Sometime during the original run the short story was adapted from the play, this is the reason that the narrative is told in third person rather than by the traditional narrator Watson.
_	It was adopted for the reason that most titles are eventually adopted.
_	The reason that the bipod mast was used for only a short time is also the reason that it developed in the first place.
_	He governs officially for the reason that section 16 expressly vests him with authority to do so.
_	Local resource competition has been hypothesized to be the reason that passerine birds are more likely to be female, while ducks and geese are more likely to have male offspring.
_	She also refrains from taking the mobile from Balan citing the reason that she is not willing to stand against her fathers wish by using mobile.
_	Wil came in for much more than his fair share of insults and jokes, but he was a vital part of the reason that N64 Magazine stood out so much on the shelves: his Manga-styled cover art was different from anything on other magazines, and his years of experience, love for RPGs and generally somewhat eccentric nature were comforting for many hardcore gamers.
_	Jensen also confirms that he knows the reason that he has been kidnapped and that reason is for the code that he alone knows - the Jensen Code.
_	The power of the creek was the reason that New Hartford had such extensive manufacturing operations for a town of its size.
_	The children are going to inherit the responsibility of taking care of Mother Earth, and that is the reason that children should always grow in contact with; so they can learn to love and respect nature.
_	This account didn't draw a connection between the use of an old map and the targeting of the embassy and didn't address the reason that target authorization listed the objective as a warehouse instead of an office building.
_	Its key participation in this battle is probably the reason that the legion also used a trireme as one of its symbols.
_	Cho-won stole ten frames from Yeon-hee (with the reason that she saw her as a top competitor), while So-ra took them from Jin-kyung (stating that she believed her good shots were from genetics and luck).
_	Financial constraints alongside changes to the design were the reason that construction didn't commence immediately after selection of the design.
_	She was faced to trial against the Medical Faculty of Paris solely on the reason that she practiced medicine without a medical license.
_	This is also the reason that some of the silver COAs will number above 14,000, though only around 13,000 of the coins survived.
_	This, as can well be seen, was a loose system, for the reason that the workman's sense of time was frequently not well developed, and there was neither incentive nor necessity for accuracy.
_	For although their calling is rude and bloody, as it is concerned with wounds and death; nevertheless, their minds should not refuse to be naturally pleased with things which are beautiful and elegant, and especially when they wear them; for the reason that, on the one hand, they confer joy and comfort upon them, and, on the other, it induces them to perform intrepid deeds of arms, since that they are aware that they will be better known on this account, and that all persons will pay more attention to what they do; therefore cleanliness and elegance are not impediments to the bravery and ferocity which they ought to possess.
_	The disciples did not fall into the trap, and were immediately able to comprehend that Hilkiah induced the rain, and had asked him on his strange behaviors that they previously observed on their way to his home, as well as for the reason that the rain came from the direction his wife prayed and not his.
_	This is the reason that the theory of evolution is overwhelmingly accepted.
_	However, Fogelin suggests, “Perhaps the reason that Hume does not see this is that he is thinking about the ideas of objects and not about objects themselves.
_	This may be the reason that this coral seldom exceeds a diameter of .
_	Cathine is a less potent version of cathinone and cathinone's spontaneous reduction is the reason that older khat plants are not as stimulating and younger ones.
_	They accept, states Devi Upanishad, that she is the Shakti, the Maha-vidya (the great knowledge), the Vedas, the power of Vishnu, she is the inspirer, she is the reason that gods were born, she is the love in the universe, the primordial source of universe, the bearer of thunderbolt, the cave, the wind, the cloud, the enchanting, the power of Self.
_	It is not known why the RSX did not continue to be sold as the Integra in Japan, however, the reason that Acura gave for the cancellation of the RSX is that Acura wishes to move up in the luxury brand, thus cannot sell a car that is mostly driven by teenagers.
_	In the 2005, ECW documentary "Forever Hardcore", Douglas claimed that part of the reason that he decided to toss down the NWA belt was because of derogatory and slanderous comments that then-NWA head Dennis Coralluzzo had allegedly been making regarding his professionalism.
_	Rowling in an interview said that she "really enjoyed writing the Ron/Lavender business, and the reason that was enjoyable was Ron up to this point has been quite immature compared to the other two, and he kind of needed to make himself worthy of Hermione...he had to grow up emotionally and now he's taken a big step up."
_	Du Guangting subsequently noted that this was the reason that Huangdi could defeat Chiyou and ascend to heaven.
_	He also said in 2003 that the staff enjoyed the first episodes that centered on him, particularly "Simpsons Roasting on an Open Fire", which is the reason that more episodes about him were written.
_	"And we were culpable for the reason that we did not exercise any kind of creative control because we sold the rights for a considerable amount of money."
_	With the reason that the mirrors are smashed explained, Chrissie asks awkward questions about Kate's 'mystery man' with Kate unaware that Chrissie knows about her and Den.
_	The same thing can not be said of Adret's counter-criticism, "Mishmeret ha-Bayit" (Defense of the House), which is written in an acrimonious, not to say malicious, tone: that may perhaps be the reason that Adret published it anonymously, for it was only in later years that he acknowledged his authorship.
_	Indeed, a circle of fifths can be arranged in fourths (G→C→F→B etc. are fifths when played downwards and fourths when played upwards); this is the reason that modern theoreticians may speak of a "circle of fourths".
_	The name was established for the reason that the location was called the manor of Arras Du. in Turkish, the name of the village pronounced Arradiou.
_	This is the reason that judicial opinions are usually quite long, and give rationales and policies that can be balanced with judgment in future cases, rather than the bright-line rules usually embodied in statutes.
_	It was hypothesized that part of the reason that treatment with an FTI such as alendronate is inefficient is due to prenylation by geranylgeranyltransferase.
_	Coppa delle Alpi (translated as Cup of the Alps) was a football tournament, first organized by the Italian national league as it started in 1960 and then they were aided by the Swiss League from 1962, for the reason that the majority of the Alps are in Switzerland.
_	It is unclear whether his remarks were the reason that David Cameron chose to appoint Theresa May as Home Secretary in his new Cabinet, rather than Grayling who held the position in the Shadow Cabinet; Grayling was not given any Cabinet post, as had been predicted by some media commentators prior to the election.
_	Hippocrates attributes this fact for the reason that a patient's pain isn't always located in the same spot on his or her head.
_	The engineers in Victor Studio then found the reason that disguising the original data and copy versions is the electrical distortion such as jitters and rippling occurs during the data recording and transformation.
_	This festival is very famous for the reason that they unveiled the "Purple Dog" that was a chitzu-mananu mix.
_	However, historian Tom Wareham has speculated that the legal case was probably the reason that Laforey was denied the knighthood that customarily accompanied a successful frigate action at this stage of the war.
_	Often this was the reason that men of high rank would live with a woman in concubinage after the death of their first wife, so that the claims of their children from this first marriage would not be challenged by the children from this later union.
_	Even though Mardikian had a very nice life in the United States, he would get depressed from time to time, over the reason that he missed his uncle, Krikor Amirian.
_	According to Donna Brazile's book "Hacks The Inside Story", the Joint Fund-Raising Agreement between the DNC, Hillary Victory Fund, and Hillary for America was the reason that the DNC chair "couldn't write a press release without passing it by" Clinton's campaign staff.</ref>
_	Detective Joey Quinn once confronts him about his behavior, stating it is the reason that no-one likes to be around him.
_	Part of the reason that many Chicano studies programs were not consistent in what was studied is that a core curriculum had not yet been formally published.
_	This has also been suggested as the reason that the trimethylenemethane dication is more stable than the butadienyl dication.
_	Producer Shrikant Mohta stated the reason that Debojyoti's music didn't quite suit the film well and that's why, they were bound to approach Indraadip.
_	They cite as the reason that the "cost prove[d] too much of a burden in the "Professional" game".
_	Though Rashid's official papers were not ready, he was allowed to play for the reason that the tournament was a friendly championship.
_	For example, he explained that the reason that parents as a whole are more fertile than their children is because children must necessarily come from fertile parents.
_	In 1985, he talked to fanzine "Arkensword", noting that he had stopped working for all British publishers bar IPC, "purely for the reason that IPC so far have avoided lying to me, cheating me or generally treating me like shit."
_	Large scale whole genome duplication events that occurred early in vertebrate evolution may be the reason that human monogenic disease genes often contain a high number of redundant genes.
_	He attributes the building of the gardens to a Syrian king, again for the reason that his queen missed her homeland.
_	The entire extent of Nathan's indebtedness to his authorities can not be estimated, for the reason that of the hundreds of books cited by him many have not been preserved.
_	For the reason that I continue to work on this project, I read all the history of the Battle of Stalingrad.
_	He respects Go Morita from V6, he is the reason that Okura joined Johnny & Associates.
_	This is the reason that Ethiopians have long identified the Gihon ("Giyon") with the Abay River (Blue Nile), which encircles the former kingdom of Gojjam.
_	Born chose the term "reciprocity" for the reason that in a crystal lattice, the motion of a particle can be described in "p"-space by means of the reciprocal lattice.
_	This reflected the reason that the squadron was created; to bomb the dams in the Ruhr Valley.
_	Shipov begs the officer of the Marine Corps, who came to the recruiting station to get new recruits, to transfer the personal file of conscript Gavrilov to his officer, inventing the reason that Gavrilov is his countryman.
_	The lack of clay is the reason that architecture on the island employs straw wrapped around wooden frames more often than banco mud bricks.
_	These aggressive fights are thought to be the reason that mature males normally live no closer than several kilometers apart.
_	The League Against Cruel Sports also opposes trophy hunting for the reason that even if the animal that is being hunted for a trophy is not endangered, it is still unjustified to kill them.
_	Plato accuses even Hesiod of this, for the reason that the gods in Hesiod "grow" out of primordial entities after the physical universe had been established.
_	Madelyne reveals that she is the part of Jean Grey that loved Scott with all her heart, and that was the reason that Cyclops' and Jean's marriage failed.
_	The bank was the target of massive demonstrations in 1976 after three female employees at Per Hestvik & Co in Mo i Rana were fired with the reason that they were members of Kvinnefronten, a women's rights movement.
_	Franklin stated new features such as Sim emotions, advanced Sim animation, interaction and behaviours, as well as the new Create-a-Sim and build mode tools as a large part of the reason that detracted focus from features such as swimming pools and the toddler life stage.
_	This was also the reason that there was never a strict "final cut" at steam operations, with the DR continuing to use steam locomotives from time to time until they merged with the DB in 1994.
_	This is part of the reason that modern automobiles tend to have larger numbers of gears in their transmissions.
_	In The Long Game, Bea does her best to convince Bridget that she was drugged and that was the reason that she had a psychotic break.
_	For the first two episodes he appeared in, he smoked "real" cigarettes, but later changed to herbal cigarettes, giving the reason that smoking was dangerous for his health.
_	Based on the characteristics of online Q&A community, which including no reputation-ranking mechanism and no financial reward for users’ knowledge-contribution behaviors, and no mutual interest or conflict between users, people are wondering the reason that motivates users to contribute their knowledge on the Q&A software.
_	The Saiga-12 incorporates an adjustable two-position gas system, for the reason that firing high power loads such as slugs and buckshot generates so much force that the receiver will be damaged if the full power of the gas system is employed without some sort of recoil buffer.
_	The author planned by means of a mimicry and gestures to reflect character of the emperor, but this variant has been rejected of Monferran's for the reason that could not serve the primary purpose of association of spatial ensembles.
_	Klüger resists narrating her story for the reason that she does not want her audience to derive a moral from the Holocaust as a whole.
_	The Trustees liked the idea in theory, but would not endorse a year round farm project largely for the reason that school and college farms had almost always posed a financial liability, and that farms in general in the precarious economy of 1933 were a liability.
_	He is also the reason that Hugo stopped attending school, but Hugo began school again after Georges Melies adopted him.
_	The whole idea of turning a film into a musical was a big challenge for the reason that he had to keep the audience, already happy with the film, content too, maintaining the film story on one hand and avoiding bringing to stage a carbon copy.
_	A quote from the Book of Esther, which says: "On the contrary" () is the reason that wearing a costume has become customary for this holiday.
_	It has also been speculated that this is the reason that the Samsung Moment was silently discontinued, despite Sprint's official statement that the release of the Samsung Intercept and Samsung Transform were the reason for the Moment's discontinuation.
_	On the last days of September 2017, the deputies of the independent group Walter Banegas and Lilian Villatoro of the departments of Cortés and Comayagua respectively has decided to join as members of the Liberal Party of Honduras based on the reason that their original party, the Anticorruption Party no longer exists thus, increasing the Liberal caucus to 33.
_	However, during the last decade it has been idle for the reason that employees no longer need to travel for work while the nearby Jubail residential areas are growing.
_	On 11 July 1975, United States Attorney Michael T. Milligan entered a motion to dismiss charges against Hill for charges filed July 7 on the "grounds and for the reason that the best interest of justice will be served."
_	An Advanced Higher qualification is essentially a simulation of the first year of university in that particular subject; this is the reason that Advanced Highers can be used for second-year university entry.
_	They all yearned to act treacherously towards Felim, although he was the gossip of the Lord Justice; and this was the reason that the meeting had been called.
_	To the author, the reason that our life is deprived of love is adult's lack of creativity and feelings.
_	The Gemara explained that when Jews recite the Shema, they recite the words, "blessed be the name of God's glorious Kingdom forever and ever," quietly between the words, "Hear, O Israel: the Lord our God, the Lord is one," from and the words, "And you shall love the Lord your God with all your heart, and with all your soul, and with all your might," from for the reason that Rabbi Shimon ben Lakish expounded when he explained what happened in That verse reports, "And Jacob called to his sons, and said: ‘Gather yourselves together, that I may tell you what will befall you in the end of days.'"
_	However, the validity of the claim has been disputed, especially the reason that a major Easterner like Jeong would rebel against the Easterner government.
_	The "Imperatrix" still lies on the seabed in front of the island's cliffs and was the reason that a lighthouse was built on an island hilltop.
_	This is the reason that posts and cores' classification start to play an important role in understanding and verifying the type of these micro-prosthesis.
_	Rodney Stark (2003) describes the bull as "magnificent" and believes the reason that, in his opinion, it has belatedly come to light is due to the neglect of Protestant historians.
_	Which could prove a difficulty for her, as that is exactly the reason that she's being sent to mingle with humans in the first place.
_	In January 2012, he cited the impact that his leave of absence had on the company as the reason that he did not wish to receive a bonus for 2011, and said "As chief executive, I believe my bonus entitlement should reflect the performance of the group".
_	Bernard Lazare commented, "Economic antisemitism to-day is stronger than it ever was, for the reason that to-day, more than ever, the Jew appears powerful and rich.
_	On June 2009, hollywoodreporter.com cited the lack of viewership on SingTel's mio TV as the reason that the British Broadcasting Corporation terminated the right to air BBC Lifestyle, CBBC, CBeebies and BBC Knowledge under permission registered BBC from 19 March 2009 to 15 December 2009.
_	This was the reason that Buggisch and Hüttenhain were able to minimise the efforts of Gimmler.
_	A Nepalese stone edict of 695, during the reign of the Licchavi king, Shivadeva II, records: "because of the reason that Nepal paid taxes to Tibet, five officials must take the responsibility of the coolies who carry the [sic = luggage?]
_	The executives of Channel 4 decided to not revive the show, due to the reason that if there would be another Damayan, it wouldn't be complete without Ms. Rosal.
_	Lin's mother was a university professor who taught Western economics and international finance, and was the reason that Lin eventually left the country.
_	This was the reason that promoted practical reforms and moral improvement through education.
_	In April 2016, the Central Board of Film Censors banned ‘’Among the Believers’’ from being screened in Pakistan, giving the reason that it “projects the negative image of Pakistan in the context of ongoing fight against extremism terrorism.”
_	This oversimplification is the reason that the gauge field θ comes out to be a scalar, whereas the electromagnetic field is actually represented by a vector consisting of "V" and A.)
_	Part of the reason that Jaworski replaced Theismann was because of his chemistry with Kornheiser on "Pardon the Interruption", where Jaworski was a frequent guest during the football season.
_	(This is believed to be the reason that dead or dying squid are found floating at the surface or washed up on the beach.)
_	The major right-stepping offset between the fault zones formed a restraining bend and led to transpression and uplift that is still active today and is the reason that the island of Jamaica is now well above sea level.
_	It applied Latour and Woolgar's concept of the cycle of credit to Wikipedia contributors, suggesting that the reason that people write for Wikipedia is to gain recognition within the community.
_	The need for a human life of perfect obedience to God's law was the reason that Christ, who is God, had to become incarnate (take on human flesh) and live as a human being.
_	According to one source this was the reason that Ernst and Eva were both deprived of their German citizenship "in absentia" in 1937.
_	On August 10, 2013, via his official YouTube page, Bow Wow stated the reason that "Underrated" had been delayed was the result of raising his daughter and waiting until he was more mature; he also stated he planned on working on and releasing the album after he turned 28.
_	This is the reason that made Villaverde a typical working class neighbourhood.
_	In scenes shown directly after, Bradley dumped Stacey, declaring that the reason that he wanted to abort their baby was because he could not bear the idea of bringing up a child with Stacey.
_	Randy was the writer and Chris was probably the reason that it was played.
_	The Commonwealth Bank of Australia's rules and conditions for cheques (2014: Section 1.7.6 'Dishonour of cheques') clearly state that a cheque will be dishonoured if it is presented before the post-date as written on the cheque for the reason that, '...the cheque bears a date that is in the future.
_	This is the reason that Buddhism began to develop so vigorously in China with Fotudeng."
_	Additionally, he has stated that Bob Marley, Nirvana and Pearl Jam are major influences on his work, the latter being the reason that he started making music after hearing the song "Yellow Ledbetter".
_	It can be said this was the reason that the German government tried so desperately to suppress, kill, and sterilize those of color.
_	That I'm Anglo-centric" indicating that the reason that these countries also must wait is to avoid criticism from other large European gaming countries such as Germany and France.
_	The same author who broke the news of this claim doubted its veracity, because it was in the context of an uncharacteristic speech in which Cleaver stated "we need police as heroes," and said that he denounced civilian review boards of police shootings for the reason that "it is a rubber stamp for murder."
_	This may explain the reason that they have not significantly grown in population size.
_	We learn further from Cassian the reason that led to the institution of this office.
_	This is the reason that red worms are more usually available commercially for bait worms.
_	For the reason that, digging it intensively can harm core of Earth, which can cause climate change.
_	The nation was, in essence, in a state of chaos, for the reason that the government was still in the process of deciding how it would rule the newly independent country.
_	Strong governorships in other states, such as New York, were at the center of political machines kept together by patronage and corruption, he said, and the reason that Virginia had not suffered from those ills was that the governorship in his state was too weak to be worth fighting for.
_	She eventually finds an envelope containing a one-way ticket to Poland and Archie throws her out, after telling her he knows that she and Ryan planned to double-cross him and cruelly saying she is the reason that her father Frank Butcher (Mike Reid) abandoned her.
_	"... for the reason that the Government often desires to make use in its publications of copyrighted material, with the consent of the owner of the copyright,
_	As of 2004, the reason that abdominal wall defects occur has yet to be determined or understood.
_	Obama said, "I think that the reason that the organizers used the phrase Black Lives Matter was not because they were suggesting that no one else's lives matter ... rather what they were suggesting was there is a specific problem that is happening in the African-American community that's not happening in other communities."
_	He thought his father Jeb Batchelder didn't care about him, which is part of the reason that he hated Max out of jealousy and chased and terrorized the Flock.
_	That was the reason that the Directors went back to Parliament in 1855 to reform the Company as the Cannock Mineral with less ambitious and so a less costly plan.
_	It is also the reason that he shuns the ubiquitous use of Macs in modern graphic design and instead relies on Corel Draw on PC.
_	The general plan provided for a canopy over all the stands of the stadium, all the stands should have been two-tier, except for the East, for the reason that it goes to the roadway.
_	Minor points out the apparent connection that Ballard feels for Echo and cites it as the reason that Ballard is so driven to investigate the Dollhouse.
_	While she believed the reason she had certain opportunities in Physics was because of the war, she thought that the reason that the number of women in this field decreased after the war due to a lack of interest.
_	This was presumably the reason that parts of the largest surviving Gothic text, Codex Argenteus, were retouched.
_	A black magic marker was used to color the wetlayup and is a large part of the reason that people say the car looks so nice!
_	This led Edward III and Edward IV of England to ban football in 1349 and 1477 respectively; the latter stated that, "No person shall practice...football and such games, but every strong and able bodied person shall practice with the bow for the reason that the national defence depends upon such bowmen."
_	Dry peatland, due to the dry season and also drainage for oil palm cultivation, was cited as the reason that fire spread quickly.
_	In fact it is true that these three teachers were seen as the reason that the school went from failing to successful, and it was for this Maureen Brennan was made a Dame.
_	But Maimonides credited another person with suggesting the reason that meat is the best nourishment for the appetite, the source of which is the liver; wine supports best the vital faculty, whose center is the heart; and music is most agreeable to the psychic faculty, the source of which is the brain.
_	The newspaper said the officer's account was the reason that the government had settled with Habib in December 2010.
_	This is the reason that the Musée d'Orsay is not in Orsay.
_	On 2 March 2017, it was revealed that Ong had resigned from MCA with effect from 2 January 2017, citing the reason that he wanted to remain as an ordinary citizen
_	Locals say that the reason that the hospital construction was abandoned by the Germans was not just because of their colonization plans being discovered.
_	The proximity of the Convergence Zone to the King-Snohomish County line is the reason that cities located just north or south of the line, which are located within the rain shadow of the Olympic Mountains, approach Seattle in annual precipitation.
_	Whether this eschatology is the result of caesaropapism, which may have also been the reason that premillennialism was condemned, is sharply disputed.
_	This may be the reason that Pan Am served a variation of "El Presidente" on their larger planes, the "Clipper Cocktail" consisting of golden rum, vermouth and grenadine.
_	These actions to defend Rome may be the reason that Glycerius receives a generally favorable reception from Roman and Byzantine sources.
_	“Mother More’s resolute leadership is the reason that the community survived as the only English convent remaining in mainland Europe.
_	These circumstances, among others, were the reason that between 1914 and 1928 was suspended by the Church.
_	Process rating requires some exercising of expert judgment on the part of the assessor and this is the reason that there are requirements on assessor qualifications and competency.
_	But conceivably, the reason that they had started the band was to receive early parole and leave.
_	Moreover, the key issue that makes this an objective rather than subjective matter is that Scheme makes specific requirements for the handling of tail calls, and thus the reason that the use of tail recursion is generally encouraged for Scheme is that the practice is expressly supported by the language definition.
_	and this is probably the reason that the "terrier man" on the hunt was often
_	In 1966 believers in Kirov even requested from the Moscow Patriarchate to remove him, but they were given a negative answer with the reason that the Soviet government insisted he remain in place and the Patriarch had to cooperate.
_	Minutes of the Arran Community Council show that the future of the church is a regular topic of debate, but difficulty in contacting the private owner or convincing him to cooperate seem to be (part of) the reason that there has been no progress to date.
_	The overwhelming success of this seemingly one-shot book was the reason that Bongo Comics Group was created.
_	The official diploma is delivered in the mail to the graduates due to the reason that not all graduates could attend the ceremony.
_	According to the U.S. Treasury, "Treasury Department records do not reveal the reason that portraits of these particular statesmen were chosen in preference to those of other persons of equal importance and prominence."
_	The high altitude is believed to be part of the reason that the 2002 Kearns games broke most of the previous speed-skating Olympic records.
_	Equally important, on 7 November 1939 following heavy snowstorms, Hitler put off "X-Day" until further notice, which removed the reason that had most motivated Brauchitsch and Halder to consider overthrowing Hitler.
_	This important fact is the reason that the techniques of linear-system analysis have been so well developed.
_	Similar attrition may have been imposed on Liber's cults; his perceived or actual association with the Bacchanalia may be the reason that his Liberalia "ludi" of 17 March were temporarily moved to Ceres' Cerealia of 12–19 April.
_	The more than one hundred works in his oeuvre tend to make great demands on the performer, which is perhaps the reason that only nine works were ever presented to the public during his lifetime, including the two student works "First String Quartet" (1930) and "Etude for Piano" (1930), as well as seven works from his maturity: "String Quartet in A Major" (1951), "Fragments from the War" for choir (1955), the symphonic poem "Song of the Young Hero" (1958), the orchestral "Overture to a Merry Play" (1961), "Songs of My Grief" for alto and orchestra (1962), "Miniatures for Piano" (1965) and "Concerto for Piano, Violin and Cello" (1973).
_	This is the reason that many people consume them during fast.
_	These multiple definitions are probably the reason that Quantity of Electricity has fallen into disfavor among scientists.
_	These diverse ecosystems are primarily the reason that the nature preserve is considered to be a biological corridor with a large variety of animals.
_	This postponement was the reason that the young Abbas managed to live on; IsmailII had died on 24 November, and the courier who was bringing the news reportedly only arrived in the city on 13December.
_	In 1943 he protested that "The Holy See would fail in its Divine Mandate if it did not deplore these measures, which gravely damage man in his natural right, mainly for the reason that these people belong to a certain race."
_	His mutilated jaw was also the reason that he allied with his former enemies as believed that only the American's medical health care could fix his jaw (see "Here Comes Santa Claus").
_	This is the reason that Pretas cannot eat or drink as the rest of the three elements (Earth, Fire, and Water) are missing hence no digestion or physical intake is possible for them.
_	He specifically cited Royce's vote to repeal the 2010 Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, also known as "Obamacare", as part of the reason that he chose to run.
_	In 2010, TV Guide Network listed the hairstyle change at No. 19 on their list of "25 Biggest TV Blunders," with several commentators arguing that it was the reason that the ratings of the show dropped.
_	Abraham Ben-Tzur labeled the Ba'ath Party which took power in the 8th of March Revolution in Syria and had taken power in Iraq as the "Neo-Ba'ath" for the reason that the Ba'ath Party had dumped their pan-Arab credentials.
_	The two-week visit allowed contact with the Indians, who welcomed the Europeans dressed in clothing of gold, which was the reason that some mistakenly attributed to Columbus the naming of Costa Rica (Spanish: "rich coast"), a name which was actually first used by the Royal Audiencia of Panama in 1538.
_	This is the reason that the deaf community within El Salvador sometimes relies upon both ASL and SSL in a combined form.
_	This was considered risky by some, for the reason that single sided disks would only be certified by the manufacturer for single sided use.
_	Progress on the development front as a result of activities by the LFV were part of the reason that Radio Liechtenstein cited as why in September 2017, it was the time to create a senior women's national team.
_	However, this led to some discontent amongst Chinese fans, plus it also seems that this was the reason that eventually led to the replacement of Gao by the CFA.
_	In the 2003 National Health Survey, 30% of poor households identified a large health care expenditure as the reason that they were in poverty.
_	All members of this group have superpowers and that the reason that the children are going missing is an attempt by The Specials to track Michele down.
_	That was the reason that he would not share his paan with anyone as he will run short of his paans.
_	In areas where there are large minority groups, this view predicts high levels of discrimination to occur for the reason that White populations stand to gain the most in those situations.
_	Dylan soon defended his work, writing that "the songs are insanely honest, not meanin t twist any heads an written only for the reason that i myself me alone wanted and needed t write them."
_	The song was originally intended for the Ronettes, and was recorded at Gold Star Studios in March 1963, but Spector withheld its release for the reason that he did not feel it to be a number-one record.
_	"Little Magnets Versus the Bubble of Babble" took on a more mellow sound which was the reason that their record company at one stage refused to release it – it was eventually released in the US but never in the UK.
_	Several incidences of being late for work could lead to a total loss of quarterly and yearly bonus, which was a serious shock to the citizens at the time when income was generally low, and this was the reason that people were anxious to squeeze aboard.
_	It is notably large compared to the township for the reason that it has serviced the entire district for well over a century.
_	It is then, in tearing up the offer, that Pangol reveals the secret of his past and the reason that he is the only young Argolin in the Hive.
_	Sanganer prints are one of its own kinds, for the reason that patterns in bright colours are always printed on white backgrounds.
_	The aspect of retribution for the deed may be the reason that Abegg was also an advocate for death penalty.
_	Spykman sees this importance as the reason that the Rimland will be crucial to containing the Heartland (whereas Mackinder had believed that the Outer or Insular Crescent would be the most important factor in the Heartland's containment).
_	This may be the reason that his early play with right-handed equipment found him using a cross-handed grip (right hand at the end of the club, left hand below it).
_	You all are the reason that I chose to be out.
_	The death of his father at such a young age may have influenced the direction of his entire life and may have been the reason that he left home at such a young age.
_	His leadership skills and experience were another part of the reason that Pools were quick to move for him when he became available.
_	He also finds that part of the reason that Rosie is so desperate to find her biological father is because of her unsatisfactory relationship with her stepfather Phil.
_	This approach is semiclassical for the reason that scattering mechanisms are treated quantum mechanically using the Fermi's Golden Rule, whereas the transport between scattering events is treated using the classical particle notion.
_	James M. Barrie summarised the critical judgment on The World's Desire when he wrote that “collaboration in fiction, indeed, is a mistake, for the reason that two men cannot combine so as to be one.”
_	It has always been the policy of the Minister for Justice to restrict the admission of Jewish aliens, for the reason that any substantial increase in our Jewish population might give rise to an anti-Semitic problem.
_	Part of the reason that Hayek stressed the knowledge problem was also because he was mainly concerned with debating the proposal for market socialism and the Lange Model by Oskar R. Lange (1938) and Hayek's student Abba Lerner (1934, 1937, 1938), which was developed in response to the calculation argument.
_	Although there is no similar documentation regarding the name of Sarasota, that federal one-word rule for postal designations may be the reason that Zara Zota or Sara Sota became Sarasota.
_	This was, in essence, the reason that Quebec juries would not convict him:
_	She is the reason that the systems are down and the defenses have failed.
_	Thus, with the development of a publishing culture, "yōkai" depictions that were treasured in temples and shrines were able to become something more familiar to people, and it is thought that this is the reason that even though "yōkai" were originally things to be feared, they have then became characters that people feel close to.
_	Ironically, Groce's 2011–12 Ohio Bobcats' upset of the 2011–12 Michigan team in the 2012 NCAA Men's Division I Basketball Tournament was probably the reason that Groce was hired by Illinois and LeVert withdrew his National Letter of Intent to play for Ohio.
_	The fringing reef becomes a barrier reef for the reason that the outer part of the reef maintains itself near sea level through biotic growth, while the inner part of the reef falls behind, becoming a lagoon because conditions are less favorable for the coral and calcareous algae responsible for most reef growth.
_	However, Shapiro declined to launch any investigation into Belinda Stronach's floor-crossing, even though it was done for exactly the reason that Shapiro claimed would be inappropriate.
_	The remix was well received in the bassline scene, this is possibly the reason that Platnum decided to produce their own version.
_	Edith, however, was overjoyed to step into the role of a society hostess, which had been the reason that Tolkien selected Bournemouth in the first place.
_	The technique is generally regarded as being rather difficult, which is likely the reason that The Cavaliers are the only drum corps to have used it in performance (1994 and 1995).
_	<br>For the reason that:
_	Their influence being one of the reason that the Greek War of Independence was launched in the Danubian Principalities instead of Greece itself.
_	These valves were probably the reason that the design was not a success, rather than the bell crank transmission, which was used successfully in other locomotives.
_	Their friendship is part of the reason that Clyde and Vicki's mother, Michelle (Susan Tully), form a relationship.
_	Another boycott would occur before the ROC would accept the provisions of the 1979 Resolution although the reason that so many other countries boycotted were not all the same as the ROC.
_	He also said that because man does not understand himself, he has developed “terrifying weapons,” which is the reason that the earth is in war.
_	The so-called shortage of labor to fill some of them and the reason that hourly U.S. real wages have been falling almost every year since 1975 is that desperate immigrants will work for wages that Americans don't want to work for.
_	This may be the reason that the Dhivehi kinship system is partly of Dravidian origin, and bears evidence of some matriliny, like the Nayar and other matrilineal groups of Kerala.
_	He enjoyed the development of the rape case, Veronica's jokes, and Logan's character development, while he disliked the reason that the rapes occurred, Patty Hearst's acting, Veronica's meanness, and Wallace's absence.
_	A legend surrounding stargazy pie, along with the other unusual pies of Cornwall, is that they were the reason that the Devil never came to Cornwall.
_	This is also the reason that many microorganisms cause diarrhea.
_	He ultimately concluded: "Whatever the reason that Halleck ceased so early to write, let us congratulate ourselves that he wrote at all."
_	Jesse explained the reason that they had not been on television was because Festus has been seeing doctors about his "problems".
_	In 1598, with the besieged garrison still intact but running precariously low on supplies, the Dublin government debated at length whether to abandon the fort, for the reason that its location was too far into O'Neill's home territory to be sustainable.
_	He claimed that the reason that modern culture seeks the "iconic building" is because it has the possibility of reversing the economic trend of a flagging “conurbation”.
_	And the reason that I liked Kevin—we picked Kevin to do the movie, Bernie and I did, because what he knew the movie needed was heart.
_	This is largely the reason that athletes warm up, by slight exercise, before engaging in contests.
_	For example: the reason that the Wimbledon tennis tournament uses purple on the Wimbledon official logo is that purple is located almost opposite of green on the color wheel.
_	In 1985, he noted that he had stopped working for all British publishers except IPC, publishers of "2000 AD", "purely for the reason that IPC so far have avoided lying to me, cheating me or generally treating me like shit."
_	Part of the reason that the city remains assessed at basic sustainability is because of the low resource-use and carbon emissions of its poorer neighbourhoods.
_	For the reason that the self-system focuses solely on experiences that resulted in pain or pleasure, it ignores what is going on outside of these experiences.
_	This movement is also the reason that most of the villages themselves are on the West side of their island.
_	Albanians seeking asylum in the UK regularly cite blood feuds as the reason that it is unsafe for them to return to Albania.
_	It is also part of the reason that Zimbabwe-born Gary Ballance emigrated to England, and represents England instead.
_	Part of the reason that the Scots Greys were unable to advance as cavalry was because the bridge that was crucial to the advance was accidentally destroyed when the tank crossing it proved to be too heavy.
_	In another study, scientists from the University of Toronto speculated that the queen bee syndrome may be the reason that women find it more stressful to work for women managers; no difference was found in stress levels for male workers.
_	While this may confer personal jurisdiction, there remains a number of questions as to the validity of these divorces for the reason that Guam lacks any state interest in the marital affairs of nonresidents beyond the revenue these quickie divorces generate.
_	It is also rumored that Henry Aldrich was an admirer of her, hence the reason that he moved the tower to his land despite not being born for another 17 years.
_	Critics such as Carolyn Sorisio have identified Keckley's unveiling of Lincoln as the reason that the book generated such a backlash.
_	Calling it "the grand depositum" of the Methodist faith, Wesley specifically taught that the propagation of the doctrine of entire sanctification was the reason that God raised up the Methodists in the world.
_	The band was dissolved in 2005 after their last CD "Nationaal Revolutionair" with the reason that their national-revolutionary ideas didn't get much credence with the nationalistic subcultures in Europe because most nationalists are too chauvinist.
_	DII titles are notable for the reason that many Texas high schools do not compete at the DI level, making DII titles the highest achievement for many schools.
_	Domina, enraged by what she considers Faey's betrayal, captures Ducon and Lydea along with Mag, bringing them to the secret room where she keeps her regenerative bed, the reason that she has lived so long.
_	Barry had initially found it difficult to believe in her acquisition of stereo vision for the reason that the notion of critical period was firmly set since the groundbreaking work of Torsten Wiesel and David H. Hubel with deprivation experiments in which animals did not develop the neuronal basis for stereo vision if they were prevented from performing stereo fusion for a given time period after birth.
_	The lighthouse is called "Fanale dei Pisani", for the reason that was built by the Pisans in 1303 on project attributed to Giovanni Pisano and by the master builders Rocco Entello De Spina and Bonaggiunta Ciabatti whose names were found engraved on a stone.
_	This is the reason that out of the twelve (12) municipalities of Camarines Norte, Capalonga has the highest rating and accent in speaking the Tagalog language.
_	This White Council meeting, of late summer T.A. 2941, was also the reason that Gandalf was unable to accompany Bilbo Baggins and the dwarves on a portion of their trip to the Lonely Mountain in "The Hobbit".
_	It is thought that Statius' death in 95 is the reason that the poem remains unfinished.
_	(The song wasn't sung in the movie, which is the reason that it couldn't be nominated for an Academy Award.)
_	Antonio Villaraigosa, mayor of Los Angeles, announced an eviction order deadline of Monday morning, November 28, at 12:01 a.m., giving the reason that "It is time to close the park and repair the grounds so that we can restore public access to the park."
_	This may be the reason that triple-agent operations appear not to have been undertaken by U.S. counterintelligence in some espionage cases that have come to light in recent years, particularly among those involving high-level penetrations.
_	A friend of Lauren's has since done an interview in which she said the reason that Lauren ran away is because when she went out to a club with Andrew he started abusing a bouncer who wouldn't let them in because it was past 1am.
_	His failure to make progress in freeing the convicted terrorists is thought to be the reason that he himself was kidnapped and spent five years as a hostage.
_	Part of the reason that the Copperbelt Schools were inter-denominational was the pressure from the Board not to allow contending schools to open up in the towns and repeat the rivalry that was prevalent elsewhere leading to small villages with two schools run by competing missions.
_	However, Apple soon pulled all apps related to Google Voice, giving the reason that Voice duplicated features offered by the iPhone.
_	In other cases, such as the Ubuntu App Store, proprietary commercial software applications "and" GPL-licensed applications are both available via the same system; the reason that the Mac App Store (and similar projects) is incompatible with GPL-licensed apps is not inherent in the concept of an app store, but is rather specifically due to Apple's terms-of-use requirement that all apps in the store utilize Apple DRM-restrictions.
_	Later when Bill gets a call from his wife Karen Hayes and she says that she is afraid that she is the reason that Vice President Daniels will continue acting as president.
_	That is the reason that he is alive today, the teenagers had planned to kill the father as well..
_	War also saw a nuclear arms race between the two superpowers; part of the reason that the Cold War never became a "hot" war was that the Soviet Union and the United States had nuclear deterrents against each other, leading to a mutually assured destruction standoff.
_	This is the reason that the majority of conversations are difficult to categorize.
_	According to Pepys, Chicheley lived extravagantly in London, and this was probably the reason that he sold his estate at Wimpole thirteen years before his death.
_	It was most likely that Stephens' death was the reason that "The Goon Show" episode, "Dishonoured – Again" (broadcast on 26 January 1959) was a remake of the show "Dishonoured" (broadcast on 14 December 1954).
_	Their demand was turned down previously by the panchayat elders, giving the reason that women of village will be corrupted by the liberal images on the television and also the lack of finances.
_	The Populist Party dissolved before World War II as members were unable to meet in Omaha for the party's semi-centennial celebration, and for the reason that many of the party's values have been accepted by other, more dominant political parties.
_	Cognizable harm takes account of the nature of the interest protected, which is the reason that 'the constitutional component of standing doctrine incorporates concepts concededly not susceptible of precise definition,' leaving it impossible 'to make application of the constitutional standing requirement a mechanical exercise.'
_	Blair died in 1863; settling his estate is likely the reason that Sarah was separated from her family.
_	It is notable ornament for the reason that it is worn as accomplishment of "Navas" – a promise to the almighty for fulfillment of some prayer made to Him.
_	This duality is the reason that the binomial distribution is applicable.
_	As a result, it was rumoured that the reason that McCann was unarmed when he was killed was that the Official leadership had confiscated his personal weapon, a .38 pistol.
_	This was the reason that he didn't produce enough to become well known outside Haarlem.
_	They want to discover the reason that these monsters are so frightening to Earthlings.
_	“Perhaps the reason that I survived, in spite of mistakes, was that a simple idea had got hold of me—to make work better for its purpose than was commonly thought worth while…
_	Dan says that Serena is the reason that his book has failed and he is now an outsider again.
_	The exhibition was the reason that in the first issue of 1984 the magazine "Form" printed a four-page report on Kempkens and his digital art and publicity photos.
_	On 17 August Football Federation of Kosovo has sentenced FC Drita to 10,000 euros and 2 games without a spectators, with the reason that the supporters of FC Drita had wrong behavior by throwing fireworks on the field that significantly contaminated the air and hampered the course of the match and used offensive expression to the team and the opposing supporters
_	If such was his duty as defined by law, then he is forbidden by statute from receiving any special compensation on account of such services; this for the reason that no appropriation for such compensation has been made by any statute explicitly stating that it was for such additional pay, extra allowance or compensation.
_	The judge did not accept the charges for the reason that the Raëlians were not attacking the whole of the Catholic Church.
_	This is the reason that an anomalistic month (the period the Moon moves from the perigee to the apogee and to the perigee again) is longer than the sidereal month (the period the Moon takes to completes one orbit with respect to the fixed stars).
_	A longer break in production between series 3 and 4 was the reason that the fourth series was instead filmed in summer.
_	This is the reason that this season's list is the same as the 1978 season's list.
_	This could be the reason that alcohol produces health benefits when consumed in moderate amounts.
_	More than likely, chocolate, vanilla, and strawberry became the standard for the reason that they were the most popular flavors in the United States at the time of introduction.
_	Individual employees do not have the right to make applications under s 9; this, the Court of Appeal assumed, was the reason that two separate proceedings were brought in the Employment Court.
_	In 1911, her mother took the four-year-old to Sweden; her father went to Sweden in 1922, and in 1934 made a statement before an American consul in Sweden that he had "voluntarily expatriated himself for the reason that he did not desire to retain the status of an American citizen and wished to preserve his allegiance to Sweden."
_	This fact is the reason that Brianna looks different from her sisters - she does not share the same mother.
_	Following World War One, the Treaty of Versailles contained the first constitution of a new International Labour Organization founded on the principle that "labour is not a commodity", and for the reason that "peace can be established only if it is based upon social justice".
_	During the 2018 Masterchef UK TV series, Torode received significant criticism by Malaysians and Indonesians for eliminating Malaysian contestant Zaleha Kadir Olpin with the reason that her contesting Rendang dish served with nasi lemak wasn't "crispy enough".
_	From these statements it can be learned the reason that so many of the first arrivals disappeared from Plymouth after a few years of experiencing that hardship existence.
_	The executions in Kragujevac occurred although there had been no attacks on members of the Wehrmacht in this city, for the reason that not enough hostages could be found elsewhere.
_	She may be the reason that Maddie decided to transfer to public school; after any amount of time of such poor treatment, anybody would want to get away from the person causing it.
_	1984 was the one and only year for the GL1200 "Standard" (which was not exported to Europe) for the reason that sales had decreased in favor of the Interstate and Aspencade models.
_	Lex later believes that the exposure which left him bald also gave him a "super" immune system and was the reason that he had never been sick even once after the event.
_	Dhanush gives him the reason that he was distracted due to some issue.
_	This was the reason that Pål Olson Nerolshaugen changed his name into Pål Olson Grøt when he moved to Hovet, and bought a farm on land with the name Grøt, in 1852.
_	According to the national newspaper "The Namibian", the school was established in 1962 in Karibib and moved to Okombahe in 1970, again for the reason that the school admitted black learners, and Karibib was a white-only town.
_	The males naturally produce the steroid lucibufagin, and the reason that the females prey on these males is to obtain this steroid.
_	This extensive intermarriage is the reason that many Taiwanese people today are unaware that they could be descendants of plains indigenous peoples.
_	It is believed that this defect may be the reason that the Pikachu virus did not become more widespread and cause more damage to computer systems.
_	This is the reason that GSM900 singleband phones do not support this feature, while the corresponding GSM1800 version often does (e.g. Ericsson GH-337 vs. PH-337).
_	For example, the Humphrey forces argued that the winner-take-all rule for the California primary violated procedural reforms intended to produce a better reflection of the popular vote, the reason that the Illinois delegation was bounced.
_	This complicated origin is the reason that some sources list "Young Men" #24 (December 1953; the first appearance of the communist hunting Captain America and Bucky) as Monroe's first appearance, though the issue was originally intended to depict the original Bucky.
_	Nowadays, many people associate the very real island of Eynhallow with the magical Hildaland, touting the tale of The Farmer of Evie as the reason that Hildaland/Eynhallow is now visible and relatively non-magical, though some would say otherwise.
_	Gasly said that his team had hoped for a better result in Monaco but the car's amount of performance was not the reason that his team was unable to score points.
_	The race was also the reason that the NASCAR sanctioning body eliminated the Overtime Line.
_	For the reason that veterans from the project fared worse in civilian life than their nonveteran peers, Greenhill hypothesized it might be related to the psychological consequences of combat or unpreparedness for the post-military transition.
_	Craddock never established her own school and this is considered the reason that she never had the lasting impact that Ruth St. Denis made.
_	The ambitious plans for land reform in Manchukuo were vetoed by the Kwantung Army for precisely the reason that it might inspire similar reforms in Japan.
_	That is the reason that it should be like that it is a One-man-show.
_	In the year of 1930, the Ever Shining Circuit Cinema was boycotted by the masses and public opinion and was forced to shut down for the reason that it played an American movie called "Weleolne Danger" (不怕死) which it was felt humiliated China.
_	"This argument is not in good taste for the reason that we are not living in the far South where the colored man is not allowed by Democrats to exercise the rights of a free American citizen", the editorial stated.
_	Wigmore gave the episodes a 9 out of 10 rating and wrote "the reason that this two-parter works is that its plot is simple enough for the audience to still have a handle on".
_	This was the reason that the Fed regularly overshot targets for money growth until the Volcker years.
_	Based on the recent evidence that failed to show declines in the breeding season, coupled with the clear declines in the number of overwintering monarchs in Mexico, some of the leading monarch researchers have embraced the theory that the problem must lie en route to Mexico, i.e. that losses during migration is the reason that fewer monarchs are seen in Mexico in recent years.
_	According to local sources, the reason that so many cars were lined up on the motorway before the crash was that the State Police were exacting a toll from motorists from an impromptu roadblock they had set up.
_	Upon his return from Hong Kong, Jack Jr visits Melanie and she explains to him that the reason that she spied on him was because she was blackmailed by FBI Special Agent Darren Lipton in exchange for him not disclosing that her father, a former Air Force colonel, was once an intelligent asset for Egyptian intelligence.
_	One source states that pregnancy was the reason that she was not asked to return, which Tamm denied as a false rumour invented by producer John Nathan-Turner.
_	To the disappointment of patent attorneys, the House of Lords have refused leave to hear the appeal, citing the reason that the case “does not raise an arguable point of law of general public importance".
_	Jack tried to stop Mickey from uncovering Chandler but once Debbie, who had been the reason that Jack hadn't wanted to do anything, married Chandler and was consequently raped by him; even though she was 7 months pregnant, only then did Chandler take his own life.
_	This was the reason that by the 1770s vessels from North America imported tobacco, Sugar, cotton, timber, dried cod, rum; rice and maize through the port of Gibraltar.
_	Gertrud credited her sister Margarete's packages as the reason that she was able to survive.
_	This may be part of the reason that synaptic plasticity is limited once PNNs become upregulated.
_	This focus on space travel helped early human colonisers and is the reason that many characters in the stories use the word 'via' as an expletive.
_	Umar ibn Abd al-Aziz asked Abu Bakr ibn Sulayman ibn Abi Hathamah what was the reason that it used to be written, ""From the Khalifah of the Messenger of Allah, may Allah bless him and grant him peace,"" in the time of Abu Bakr, then later Umar used to write at first, ""From the Khalifah of Abu Bakr.""?
_	He never sat on a Rikshaw throughout his life, for the reason that it was pulled in the city by a man, and being a man himself he considered it unethical to be pulled by a man.
_	The destruction of the Assyrian host came the night after the giving of the prophecy (2 Kgs 19:35), so the reason that sowing and reaping were forbidden for the next year must have been because that year, the second year of the prophecy, was going to be a Sabbatical year.
_	(Emperor Xuanzong's eldest son Li Sizhi was alive, but his face might have already been badly injured, which was considered unfit for an emperor and might be the reason that he was never created crown prince.)
_	This skin secretion may be the reason that chytridiomycosis has not had a major effect on the toads; the antifungal properties may give the toads a resistance to the fungus.
_	Cutter tells "Stacy" the reason that he kissed her was because he started to develop feelings for her, and that she helped him reform his grifting ways.
_	Dagny chose to continue her studies in Berlin, possibly for the reason that she could be with Munch, who had travelled there in the autumn of 1892, after the Union of Berlin Artists had invited him to stage a November exhibition of his work.
_	This quote by San Jose State professor Joel West explains much of the philosophy, or the reason that the free source movement is alive.
_	Asked if Jac was the reason that Jasmine has come to Holby, Dryzek replied "Yes and no.
_	This abundance is the reason that the Scotian Shelf is one of the Atlantic Ocean's most fished areas.
_	The V12 engine, however, suffered major smoke emissions during high acceleration – or even vibrations around 3,700 rpm – this was the reason that Steve McQueen, angered by the smoke in spite of persistent engine repairs, separated from his GTL in 1967.
_	Part of the reason that many labels were reluctant to sign the band was because of their unconventional sound, which was quite different from the music then popular in the Australian rock scene during the 1970s.
_	On the half days of July 2017, the deputies Rafael Padilla and David Reyes of the departments of Francisco Morazán and Choluteca respectively, have joined to the Innovation and Unity Party, based on the reason that the two deputies they don´t want their original party, the Anticorruption Party to be led by the congresswoman Marlene Alvarenga.
_	This also seems to be the reason that US versions, known as the SCR-520, were largely ignored after having been developed with extreme speed over the winter.
_	For most of these no statistics are published, for the reason that the Census Bureau collects its statistics directly from congregations rather than from the officers of corporations."
_	This is part of the reason that shot peening is a popular operation with aerospace parts.
_	Public goods are "both" non-rival and non-excludable (i.e., public goods are not only non-excludable) thus existence of a market failure is often the reason that self-regulatory organizations, governments or supra-national institutions intervene in a particular market.
_	Owned a property at Westerhall, near Langholm in Dumfriesshire and it is possible that his ownership of St Blaise and Common are the reason that the annual Langholm Common Riding has, as its colours each year, the colours of that year's Derby winner.
_	Appearing on "The Late Show Starring Joan Rivers", Ebert said, to agreement from Rivers and applause from the audience, that Oldman "definitely won't be [Oscar] nominated – and should be", this being for the reason that "Hollywood will not nominate an actor for portraying a creep, no matter how good the performance is".
_	Some oppose the measure for the reason that changing inflation metrics to the Chained CPI would inappropriately cut the growth in benefits under programs like Social Security and Supplemental Security Income.
_	These erosion processes are the reason that very few remaining craters are visible on Earth, since many have been erased by these geological processes.
_	Farmers plant and harvest crops directly related to lunar cycles as well and this may contribute to the reason that the Sambai is considered a fertility ritual.
_	In Maasai mythology, this is the reason that when men die, they do not return, but when the moon "dies" it returns the next night.
_	A such, it was a primitive version of encryption, and the reason that all messengers found with one were tortured: it was important.
_	Davis states that the reason that Irene prioritizes security is she wants to protect her children from the social prejudices of the time.
_	Moses, the representation of the written word, fits well in the scene of St. Catherine studying for the reason that he received the ten commandments upon Mt. Sinai where, eventually, St. Catherine was to be buried.
_	This is the reason that sophisticated anti-doping officials do target testing.
_	90% of the country is desert and that is the reason that only 10% of Libya’s population lives outside the coastline region.
_	Hartford had conceded that the district court has the power, upon proper proof of fraud, to set aside its 1932 decree in a bill of review proceeding, but nevertheless denied that the court of appeals possesses a similar power, for the reason that the term during which its 1932 judgment was entered had expired.
_	A piece by commentator Erick Erickson published by Fox News described the withdrawal from the Paris Agreement as the correct move, for the reason that "climate change is [not] an issue worth caring much about".
_	Johnston refused to travel for the reason that "it had all got too weird."
_	Susan the reason that he and Edie broke up was because he kept an old picture of Susan underneath his mattress.
_	However, quite apart from the ramifications that establishing this point might have for the utility of info-gaps' robustness model, the reason that it behooves us to clarify the relationship between info-gap and Maximin is the centrality of the latter in decision theory.
_	Typically, pressure waves travel faster in materials than do shear waves, and in earthquakes this is the reason that the onset of an earthquake is often preceded by a quick upward-downward shock, before arrival of waves that produce a side-to-side motion.
_	It is revealed that the reason that Bridon made up the fad because of his theater-crazed, flamboyant metrosexual father (also voiced by Parker) forces him to do it.
_	The judge did not accept the charges for the reason that the Raëlians were not attacking the whole of the Catholic Church.
_	Meanwhile, the Kangxi Emperor was eager to gain a degree of influence in Tibet, for the reason that the hostile Dzungar khans adhered to Tibetan Buddhism.
_	There are however some very puzzling aspects to the matter; for example, the employment of the CAM metabolism is very slight, which was part of the reason that it took so long to establish its presence at all; it is not understood why this should be.
_	The 17th of the 18 psalms is similar to Psalm 72 which has traditionally been attributed to Solomon, and hence may be the reason that the Psalms of Solomon have their name.
_	This is also the reason that many jury/trial consultants are now referring to themselves as "litigation consultants".
_	The troll was so angry that he threw the half pillar through the air, and this is the reason that the church has only three and a half pillars to this day.
_	Galileo postulated air resistance as the reason that objects with less mass fall more slowly in an atmosphere.
_	Remos has said that the reason that lead him to accept the proposition for the show was that "the singers who are auditioning for the show, professionals or not [...] are "fighting" for their talent to be recognized".
_	It is also possible that some of the reason that churches remain segregated is because that society and communities at large are very segregated, and that churches are merely a reflection of this.
_	The workers pumped more than one billion gallons (3,800,000 m)of water out of the facility and probably were the reason that the rocket factory suffered very little damage.
_	These waves of illness may have been the reason that Mudie was not further promoted.
_	The Glasgow Herald Newspaper, on 14 June 1975, wrote ""Robert Gayre, of Gayre and Nigg, is singular among genealogists, dynasts and the like, if only for the reason that, along among them, he has been able to create a Scottish clan from scratch, providing it with traditions, rituals, precedences and privileges...""
_	Coleoptera occupied his own attention but he had a regard for insects of other orders if only for the reason that it brought him into communication with the lovers of them, for he had a sympathy not only with the entomologists as such but also as cultivators of a sense of pleasure and enjoyment in the varied realm of nature, and he was able, as a rule, to give far more information on cognate matters than he received"
_	This masking of flavor is the reason that low-quality and old sake is often served hot.
_	Because of this early hierarchical arrangement, Patterson thinks that this is part of the reason that men look upon themselves as better and more superior than animals.
_	The chronicle then states that the after effects of this Manx civil war was the reason that Magnus Barefoot was able to take the island with ease later the same year.
_	Soon afterwards, he agreed a new five-year contract with Derby, saying that his bond with the fans was part of the reason that he chose to stay: "I've got a good bond with the fans as well and that was a big part in my decision to stay here.
_	Stemming from the resettlement of United Empire Loyalist after the American Revolutionary War with traditionalist conservatism views alongside pro-market liberalism ideals, is the reason that unlike the conservatives in the United States, Canadian conservatives generally prefer the Westminster system of government.
_	The botanist Ikegamino gave the reason that carnivorous plants take time to digest the things they eat.
_	Malone goes on to argue that Ptolemy also based his account about the island Skandia and its Scandinavian tribes on western sources, and that this is the reason that Ptolemy does not have any Suiones or "Swedes" among the tribes on Skandia, but may instead have placed them among the tribes on the southeastern Baltic coast.
_	Whitley challenged that the reason that local property taxes were high is the State was budgeting for a 14% local tax increase instead of increasing funds for education.
_	Depending on state laws, refusing to rent to a tenant solely for the reason that they have Section 8 may be illegal.
_	Since key money is in many cases illegal for the reason that it is a payment without consideration or even a bribe, it is often disguised as other costs:
_	The immune response prevents fungal dissemination and is the reason that most "Sporothrix" infections are cutaneous.
_	She was confused and angry over the reason that lead to Serena and Dan's break-up by saying that it was such a "clichéd class war nonsense".
_	This is the reason that X-ray diffraction has a difficult time locating hydrogen positions.
_	It is so called "Jumping Rock" for the reason that it performs as a natural diving board.
_	Locals say that the reason that the hospital construction was abandoned by the Germans was not just because of their colonization plans being discovered.
_	These late and inaccurate weather reports may be the reason that one of the 457th BS Patfinder aircraft almost had its wing torn off by bombs falling on it from an aircraft overhead.
_	One is a hidden track at the end of Things I Would Do (the reason that song is 7 minutes and 48 seconds long).
_	After this tour, Li Jing, giving the reason that he had a foot illness, requested to retire.
_	Another legend surrounding squab pie, along with the other unusual pies of Cornwall, is that they were the reason that the Devil never came to Cornwall.
_	Her arrival is the reason that Silvio takes pity on the Count and spares his life.
_	She lived alone in a flat and shunned society for the reason that "the only people whom she ever agrees with are found in books, and she is tired of coming in contact with their ignorant maligners."
_	The art collection has been kept with the other original furnishings according to the wishes of Aleida's will, which declared that the regent's room with all of its paintings had to remain as they were on the occasion of her death, and this is the reason that this art collection with all of its curiosities still exists in its entirety.
_	After that, he announced the fait accompli to the royal court and made Lý Chiêu Hoàng cede the throne to her newly married husband for the reason that she was not capable for the position, so Trần Cảnh was chosen as her successor.
_	It's been several years now, and of course the contract probably isn't valid anymore, but the reason that I haven't done anything with this game is that I made this promise with Sega back in the day, and it's exclusive because of those conditions."
_	We often endeavored to advise him and to tell him of the danger he was in with his soldiers; but he never appeared pleased with us, and that was the reason that a great many of our warriors left him and would not be under his command.
_	The London Football Association (LFA) is unique for the reason that it is the only one founded by The Football Association.
_	The famous calligrapher at the Shahrok court was also accused of having been a friend of Ahmed and was sentenced to prison and they even exiled Qasem-e Anvar to Samarqand for the reason that his diwan was found at Ahmed Lur's booth.
_	Part of the reason that he could not be kept imprisoned for long is his quick backup schemes and arrangements.
_	Its name is given as Gurgum in Assyrian sources, while its native name seems to have been Kurkuma for the reason that the capital of Gurgum—Marqas in Assyrian sources (today Maraş)—was named "the Kurkumaean city" ("ku"+"ra/i-ku-ma-wa/i-ni-i-sà"(URBS)) in local Hieroglyphic Luwian inscriptions.
_	This is part of the reason that the wallpaper group of A and B is different from the wallpaper group of C.
_	The Nobel Prize-winning economist Joseph E. Stiglitz, says: "the reason that the invisible hand often seems invisible is that it is often not there."
_	The Titans refused to comment whether or not this was the reason that they released Grevsmuhl.
_	Isabel and her younger sister, Ruth were supposed to be released from slavery as promised by their owner, Miss Mary Finch's will when she dies but unfortunately they landed in the hands of Miss Mary's nephew, Robert Finch, who claimed them as his property with the reason that there was no actual will in physical form.
_	Their material of choice was satin rather than canvas, which may be the reason that no works have survived.
_	This was the reason that the Moorbad Gmös was founded in 1907.
_	And the Midrash explained that the reason that they buried Joseph's bones in Shechem could be compared to a case in which some thieves stole a cask of wine, and when the owner discovered them, the owner told them that after they had consumed the wine, they needed to return the cask to its proper place.
_	In Henri's Letter to John, it is said that fate is not the reason that they went to Paradise but because Henri was looking for Malcolm.
_	The setting is also significant to the Philippine culture for the reason that the couples are inside a traditional colonial Filipino house known as Bahay na bato, with it's iconic interior, Capiz WIndowpane and Ventanilla, while the woman is wearing the traditional Maria Clara gown of the Filipino women.
_	On July 20, 2006, "Nihon Keizai Shimbun" published a front-page article about the discovery of a memorandum detailing the reason that the Emperor stopped visiting Yasukuni.
_	The Cavell case was the reason that von Sauberzweig was supplanted.
_	A woman from Ryan's past was the reason that both men gained their shrinking belts, though Ryan was deceived to believe it was from Ray Palmer himself.
_	This was rumored to be the reason that Ashley demanded the repayment of his £5m loan to the club.
_	The Malaysian police have issued an arrest warrant for Clare Rewcastle Brown, who manages the Sarawak Report website giving the reason that she was involved in activities detrimental to parliamentary democracy and disseminating false reports about Najib Razak.
_	This changed her work schedule in a substantial manner and provided the reason that she could still recall this prisoner after many years had passed.
_	The shaman reveals the reason that Niko is a prefect vessel and the reason he survived the Master's attacks was because he has no soul.
_	The trend towards hyper-sexualized female characters in mainstream comics is part of the reason that independent comics have become so popular among women; independent artists, regardless of gender, tend to draw both male and female characters in a similar style.
_	Having previously combated piracy from their base on Rhodes, the reason that the Knights were given charge of the city was to prevent it from relapsing into the nest of Barbary pirates it had been prior to the Spanish occupation.
_	Ultimately, shoddy construction was also the reason that the 1943 gymnasium was torn down in the 1990s.
_	They are also the reason that Khalidor didn't invade Cenaria straight away, the Sa'Kage controlled everything and the royalty controlled next to nothing, Khalidor wanted to control the Sa'Kage to allow them to take Cenaria in a single attack.
_	It happens frequently that knights, merchants, or other men who travel, are compelled to lodge in the houses of inn-keepers and in taverns, and have to entrust their property to the charge of those whom they find there, confiding in them without any witnesses, and without any other security; and also those who are forced to travel by sea place their property in ships in the same way, by trusting the sailors; and for the reason that it frequently happens that among these two kinds of men, some are found who are very dishonest, and are guilty of great injury and wickedness towards those who confide in them; hence it is but proper that their criminality should be restrained by punishment.
_	The new name was chosen for the reason that it clearly states an important feature of the game, when a ship is damaged, it is reassembled by tractor beaming in any nearby transients parts that floating around, and rebuilding ships based on the blueprint design created by the player on the fleet configuration screen.
_	Although the classrooms at the Turkish madrasah of Seljuk era and after were built with vault or as a single hall with a dome, the reason that it was built in rectangle shape with two lined up domes at this madrasah can be explained in terms of reducing the effects of the hot weather.
_	In some localities, the moisture content of the precipitation from the storm exceeded 3 inches (76 mm) This was probably part of the reason that the section of the snowpack generated by this storm persisted into late April 2010 in some locations.
_	This may or may not be the reason that the audience with which I saw the film yesterday booed at the end."
_	The reason that the test is controversial, and the reason that lie detector tests are fundamentally flawed, is the Othello error—an especially emotional, angry or distraught subject produces similar results to a supposed liar.
_	Part of the reason that so much of Norway’s electricity can be generated from hydropower is due to the natural advantage of its topography, with abundant steep valleys and rivers.
_	For instance, he could never understand the reason that white settlers equipped their houses with chamber pots.
_	According to Thomas, the Jets told him that part of the reason that he was released was because he did not "engage" enough with his teammates.
_	"Photometria" had significant, though long delayed influence on technology and commerce once the industrial revolution was well underway, and is the reason that it was one of book listed in "Printing and the Mind of Man".
_	As Sahakian and Sahakian state, "... if an idea does not work, then it cannot possibly be true, for the reason that the truth always works ...".
_	This is the reason that the "Jeanie Johnston" draws more water than most ships of her size and cannot enter some ports the original ship would have been able to visit, e.g.
_	Aries later explained that the reason that he attacked Black was because the fans turned on him.
_	For the reason that, any contact on the hypersensitive territory, although it can be bearable in the moment, can induce several hours of a very painful post-effect or even several sleepless nights.
_	This event is believed to be the reason that he was excluded from the American Ornithologists' Union when it was first formed in 1883.
_	Pius protested that "The Holy See would fail in its Divine Mandate if it did not deplore these measures, which gravely damage man in his natural right, mainly for the reason that these people belong to a certain race."
_	New England Patriots' head coach Bill Belichick explained that punters are generally holders for the reason that punters and kickers usually have more time together to game plan, watch film, and are able to have more reps during practice than a player who has to play another position.
_	And the reason that the topic of the book focused on the United Kingdom being "All that is best in England is the heritage of America.
_	It has often been said that the reason that Saxton got the nod was because of his ties with the underworld.
_	That was the reason that the village was neglected by post-war Communist authorities.
_	The risk of hepatotoxicity and death associated with CPA treatment is reportedly the reason that CPA has not been approved by the FDA for use in the United States.
_	And the reason that your odor does not match your appearance is you have become common (i.e. keep company that befouls your reputation.)
_	This wharf is called "Molo Cosimo" or "Andana delle Ancore" for the reason that was built under Cosimo II.
_	It has a length of 240 meters and finish before to reach the "Fanale dei Pisani" for the reason that the "Sassaia" reef blocked the construction.
_	January 6 2018 : Leader and founding member Pour Lui announced her intention to graduate at the final date of the group's 2nd BEGiNNiNG TOUR at heavy sick ZERO, Tokyo with the reason that since BiS got a major-label deal recently, that the group doesn’t need her and she no longer needed them either.
_	The third is, that they endeavor to make them poor, and employ them in such great labors that they can never finish them; for the reason that they may always have so much to consider in their own misfortunes, that they will never have the heart to think of committing any act against the government of the tyrant.
_	Loosely speaking, justification is the reason that someone (properly) holds a belief.
_	"Entertainment Weekly" gave the film a "B+" rating and Owen Gleiberman wrote, "In "Matinee", Dante has captured the reason that Cold War trash like "Mant" struck such a nerve in American youth:
_	This gives Isaac a certain ecumenical potential, and is probably the reason that he has come to be venerated and appreciated among many different Christian traditions.
_	This is the reason that I want to fight, / Not 'cause everything's perfect, or everything's right. /
_	After walking in on Mac Nightingale as seeing his wounds, Jack quickly works out that he is responsible for trying explosion and is therefore the reason that Jack wasn't with Frankie when she died.
_	Engblom was the reason that the boys started competing.
_	This would be an energetic cost towards both genders for the reason that instead of using the energy for reproduction, they are redirecting it towards ridding themselves of this illness.
_	issue Beyoğlu 2. Criminal Court of First Instance decided to make the publication of the Book Series stopped with the reason that it was a periodical.
_	Miramar's two remaining matches were successful, a 4-0 win over Académica da Calheta, then the regional association awarded an 0-3 win over Santana de Morrinho, a club who would finish last, the reason that they did not shown up on the final match of the season.
_	The logic was that Murray should not have sent a junior officer on this mission, but the fact that this officer was the brother of the Commandant is more than likely the reason that Murray was attributed the blame.
_	Therefor, it can be deduced that the Parthians enforced a more hard and tyrannical domination than presumed on their submitted shahs and that might have been the reason that facilitated Ardashir's conquest.
_	This is the reason that we called it 'Curtain Call', because this could be the final thing.
_	Since,a lot of Tamil migrants are residing in the city and it also the reason that the city located 5 km closure to the Indian state Tamilnadu, on the way to Coimbatore.
_	Another example is the Great Vowel Shift in English, which is the reason that the spelling of English vowels do not correspond well to their current pronunciation.
_	This is the reason that they are often known as raising and lowering operators.
_	The FBI withheld documents requested under the FOIA citing the reason that the withholding was "in the interest of national defense or foreign policy."
_	This is the reason that the emblem of the University is an X cross which symbolises the one on which St. Andrew was crucified.
_	Beginning in the years immediately after 1967, around 6,000 Arabs were evicted from the Jewish Quarter, and the start of exclusion of Palestinians from appropriated land by the private company in charge of its development, for the reason that they were not Jewish.
_	But Salam Hashim blamed the Ministry of Transport for not supporting Al-Zawra and he told the players that he doesn’t have any money in the moment and he will give them next season, the players refused to play giving the reason that they are human and they need to eat and to pay for their houses rent.
_	The Courts in Taiwan have never accepted President Lee's statement, primarily due to the reason that the (now defunct) National Assembly never officially changed the acclaimed national borders.
_	This unique style evolved for the reason that the lake is covered by reeds and floating plants making it difficult to see above them while sitting.
_	This ancient legend may be the reason that the people treated Paul and Barnabas as gods.
_	This was the reason that Karna developed great hate towards Draupadi.
_	Bowman alleged his investigation was the reason that he was taken off of the case and transferred out of the Detroit Police Department's Homicide Division.
_	Mario points out that cheap ice cream is full of air and vegetable fat, he believes the reason that his business has grown is because people are willing to pay more for quality.
_	I think the reason that it didn't work was that there was something very difficult to understand about the relationship between Bryan and Rachel.
_	This is perhaps the reason that John Rowland is not only Gabrielle's personal gardener but also her current lover.
_	His "Rocket Girls" series deals with human spaceflight in a light novel form with hard SF backing; the reason that only girls are hired as astronauts in the novels is for their light weight.
_	This is the reason that impregnation resins are mostly composed of dimer and trimer molecules.
_	This is the reason that the dynamic range of the pixel is low.
_	In 2008, Waltrip admitted the reason that he failed as a driver-owner team was because he thought like a driver, not as an owner.
_	His mother was the reason that Lord Ram was given an axile, since she wish Bharat to become the king instead of Ram.
_	Nevertheless, by 1866, when several clubs in East Galway were affiliated to the GAA, there was no mention on Ballinasloe, probably for the reason that the main emphasis was on hurling and Ballinasloe, at this time, was not a hurling area.
_	He enlisted, partly due to the reason that his father, the bread-winner for the family had died the week before due to a heart attack.
_	The presence of Essanay's badly redone version is likely the reason that "A Burlesque on Carmen" is among the least known of Chaplin's early works.
_	These features, coupled with the heavy mannerist use of rustication on ground floor with segmented arches and windows, is the reason that Lyme appears more "Italian" than many other English houses in the Palladian style and has led to it being described as "the boldest Palladian building in England."
_	It was becoming apparent that the reason that the Socialist Sunday Schools were encountering so much opposition was because they were 'being seen as subversive and as poisoning the minds of the young people of the country with their political and anti-religious doctrines and teachings' and there were those who tried to discredit the Schools by accusations of blasphemy and revolutionary teachings.
_	He contended that was the reason that Indian athletes had such poor showings internationally, where things were much stricter.
_	Its donor was the city consul and reeve Augustín Cromer, the reason that the chapel is also called Cromer's chapel.
_	An IAF official stated that while the stealth of the F-35 in its current form will be overcome in 5–10 years, the aircraft will be in service for 30–40 years, and that is the reason that Israel insisted on the ability to make its own changes to the aircraft's electronic warfare systems.
_	It would not be until much later that Charlie learned the reason that his relatives preferred to distance themselves from his mother.
_	There are also veterans of private sector, such as Sri Nimmagadda Prasad, or the "Matrix Prasad" as he is popularly known for the reason that he is the force behind the Matrix Laboratories, who add colour to the cultural landscape of Sainikpuri.
_	The letters record that she should be now kept more securely and it is thought that this is the reason that the only doorway was replaced with a solid wall.
_	In a January 2009 interview with the "Orlando Sentinel", Strong expressed his belief that race played a large part in the reason that he hadn't been offered a head coaching job in 2009.
_	He was the reason that they all got to safety — because he stalled the Saviors and [prevented] them from finding any Alexandrians with his smoke grenades and he led them away from everyone and saved everyone.
_	He viewed foreign rule as the reason that national prohibition was not yet established at his time.
_	That she owned a house near Como and would be staying there over the summer was the reason that Romani traveled to meet her and Bellini.
_	However, the reason that it made Harvey-Jones Britain's most notable and public business person was the fact that he engaged both the audience and the company on a human level.
_	These same powers are the reason that Brautigan has come to this sleepy town.
_	However, she finds out that the reason that her husband had so much money was that he was a con artist and the police were starting to suspect him.
_	That is the reason that I carefully control my copyright of the BSD
_	This is the reason that the secondary side of most three-phase distribution transformers is wye- or star-wound.
_	Since these species are most often the reason that native fauna and flora is threatened, their removal is essential to the restoration project.
_	The team was also successful in the regional oblast competition, the honor of which passed to its second (junior) team to enter this competition due to the reason that Bastion were admitted to the Professional Second League (see the Ukrainian Wikipedia ).
_	A gluten-free diet should not be started before the tests for excluding celiac disease have been performed, for the reason that the serological and biopsy tests for celiac disease are reliable only if the patient is consuming gluten.
_	It was later revealed that Leech's cancelling powers were the reason that Reed Richards wanted him to be with Franklin.
_	The disparition of the "brigadier" rank is the reason that there is no one-star insignia in the French Army.
_	The winter cold is likely the reason that "Opportunity" twin rover "Spirit" stopped working in 2010.
_	Additionally, forest fires are exceptionally dangerous for the reason that they can trigger series of other natural disasters, including landslides.
_	Most of the reason that they were able to pass one another so evenly was that one would go through a sticky patch and sort of only be giving 4-bar of boost or 4.2, and the other would be getting a burst of 4.5, so it would have the legs of the other guy.
_	She and Frisch had discovered the reason that no stable elements beyond uranium (in atomic number) existed naturally; the electrical repulsion of so many protons overcame the strong nuclear force.
_	Hence, the reason that face-to-face communication must evolve in stages when an initial relationship develops.
_	The disability resulting from his dismissal from the Union Army was removed by order of the President of the United States, Oct. 23, 1867, due to the reason that:
_	Grace is the reason that Enitan is able to get more information about her father and she influences Enitan to put herself in danger.
_	This is the reason that heavily used articles like shirts and towels become thin over time, and why these particles collect in the lint screen of a clothes dryer.
_	The next rig is called a "porgy rig" for the reason that it is effective on porgies, grunts, snapper, and any other schooling, medium sized fish.
_	This is the reason that even when in mourning for near relatives, Jews will not recite mourner's kaddish for longer than an eleven-month period.
_	Male-male stabbings were originally probably harmful to males and so it was speculated that male-male stabbings were the reason that "Afrocimex constrictus" males have - like females - evolved a spermalege.
_	Most of the youth say the reason that they’re homeless in the first place is because they have been rejected from their families for being Gay or Transgender.
_	The same day, it was also announced that Law had left the film, for the reason that he had signed on to work with Ramsay.
_	Parker placed a similar condition on the silver that he also bequeathed to the college, and these stipulations are part of the reason that Corpus Christi College retains to this day the entirety of the library and the silver collection, as they were unable to sell off (or melt down) the less valuable parts of either collection without losing both.
_	In the light of fresh revelations about the extent to which the CIA and West German intelligence co-operated with Nazi criminals after the war, Zuroff said he thought it quite possible that Heim worked for West German intelligence and that this may have been the reason that he was never prosecuted.
_	Snapper maintained it was "wrongly blamed" for the delays, declaring “Auckland Transport is being disingenuous with its attempt to position Snapper as the reason that the [integrated ticketing] project is delayed."
_	This creates a land surface which is stony, unfertile and sparsely vegetated and is the reason that the term "serpentine barren" is used to describe these areas.
_	The Rabbis think that these two faults were the reason that this book is not mentioned under its own name, but forms part of the Book of Ezra (Sanh. 93b).
_	Patrick thought the reason that Manners was being purposefully secretive was that the director wanted Patrick to still "be in wonderment" as to the mysterious visitor's identity, thereby aiding his performance.
_	However, part of the reason that children with ADHD have deficits in the social realm is their lack of focus and self control, which obstructs their ability to properly interpret social cues.
_	The abuse of detainees at Abu Ghraib was in part the reason that on April 12, 2006, the United States Army activated the 201st Military Intelligence Battalion, the first of four joint interrogation battalions.
_	Hutton further suggests that the reason that Wicca includes skyclad practice, or ritual nudity, is because of a line spoken by Aradia:
_	This is mainly the reason that Argentina became one of his favorite countries to play in, as he states in the "" DVD filmed in Argentina, and also because "it's the only public that will sing out the guitar parts".
_	Part of the reason that this consistency was possible, was due to Syd King signing players that went on to become West Ham legends and record holders, as well as England internationals, including Jimmy Ruffell, Ted Hufton & Vic Watson.
_	The rude and harsh proceedings of the Greater Poland Duke were maybe the reason that in 1185, one year before his death, Leszek changed his testament and appointed his younger uncle High Duke Casimir the Just as his successor.
_	This part was also the reason that the stage would be renamed after the village – "Lyubnitsa".
_	Simple groups have been studied at least since early Galois theory, where Évariste Galois realized that the fact that the alternating groups on five or more points are simple (and hence not solvable), which he proved in 1831, was the reason that one could not solve the quintic in radicals.
_	The reason for Centennial being added to the school's name is for the reason that the school was built 100 years after Canada had claimed its independence from the United Kingdom.
_	Etienne himself probably had it for the reason that so many writers and sages had skulls hanging around--to make their office look cooler.
_	With the reason that classrooms used for the annual SPM examination, which was scheduled until 4 December 2008, were quite a distant from the burning blocks, the students sat for their exam as planned with no hindrance.
_	For the reason that it was first built earlier than Beijing city, so there is a saying that "there comes first the Tanzhe Temple, then the Beijing city" ().
_	On 26 January, François Fillon appeared on TF1 to respond to these allegations, stating that his wife had "edited my speeches" and "stood in for me at events when I couldn’t be there", also claiming that the reason that she was never seen working in the Palais Bourbon was because "she was never on the front line".
_	Stegemann suggests that the reason that nothing is said in 1 Maccabees about a High Priest between Alcimus and Jonathan was apologetic: to conceal the fact that the Hasmoneans obtained the High Priesthood by usurping it from its rightful holder, the Teacher of Righteousness.
_	The main reason of this half marathon is to promote the values of peace, coexistence and excellence in sports, and this is the reason that the motto of this Marathon is “Run for Peace and Tolerance".
_	After serving on various posts during his administrative career of ten years he resigned from IAS in 1996 for the reason that can be best described in Arun Shourie's words "to be able to serve Indian society better".
_	Hanstholm is located on the northern edge of a salt dome, and this edge consists of very hard chalk, which is the reason that ice age erosion did not remove these formations.
_	As with all supplements of nitric oxide, the response is short-lived because, as a normally produced internal physiologic control mechanism, increased concentrations lead to increased rates of clearance, which is the reason that the effectiveness of sustained use of nitroglycerin for vasodilation fades to none after hours to days.
_	The Lodge's building (the Overton Lodge Masonic Temple) is listed on the U.S. National Register of Historic Places as a contributing property in the Rogersville Historic District; as such, it is an historically-significant part of the reason that the district was itself included on the National Register.
_	Lesser mouse-tailed bats are considered to be a primitive bat in terms of echolocation, primarily due to the reason that these bats produce signals with four or more harmonics with limited frequency variation.
_	According to rail historians John F. Bromley and Jack May, this was the reason that the subway was built to the streetcar gauge of 1495mm, which is the gauge used for shop tracks at Hillcrest.
_	In fact, the creation of such a centre is becoming obligatory for every university for the reason that the modern day science demands the use of precision equipments for the acceptability of data.
_	Madras Motor Sports Club with its history of over 50 years is the reason that Chennai can be called the epicentre of motor racing in India.
_	Taylor, also commented that his weight was the reason that Crane received at least a yellow card in nearly every game he played in, mentioning that he was slow on challenging and his big frame would often be used against him when in a tussle with an opponent.
_	In history, the Moors sacked Guatiza's homes several times in the past this was the reason that the homes are now located in a secure area from the pirates.
_	Some consider long-time Buffalo Sabres enforcer Rob Ray to be the reason that hockey jerseys are now equipped with tie-down straps ("fight straps") that prevent their removal; he would always remove his jersey during fights so his opponents would have nothing to grab on to.
_	In the 2011 season of "Doctor Who" spinoff "Torchwood", morphic resonance is given as the reason that all humans have suddenly become immortal.
_	Representations of the Poincaré group are in many cases characterized by a nonnegative mass and a half-integer spin (see Wigner's classification); this can be thought of as the reason that particles have quantized spin.
_	This is the reason that the cars of the company were sometimes also referred to as "Fournier-Searchmonts".
_	HIs uncle, John George Mactavish, was a chief trader in the HBC, and was the reason that he was able to get his original job as a clerk.
_	The researchers predicted that the reason that galls were a critical factor to the evolution of soldiers...
_	The television production company and station's close relationship with the Belarus government was cited as the reason that any attempt to claim copyright infringement would be in vain because the company copying the episodes is operated by the government.
_	India has around 120 air charter companies, on year 2014 DGCA tried to force the companies to cancel their NSOP (Non-Schedule Operators Permit) due to the reason that most of the companies have less than three aircraft and would be treated as, 'private'.
_	Rose suggested that the reason that Murray's theory gained such support was partly because of her "imposing credentials" as a member of staff at UCL, a position that lent her theory greater legitimacy in the eyes of many readers.
_	Years later, D'Alesandro insisted that the riots were not the reason that he walked away from politics.
_	It is possible that the large scale deforestation that occurred during the late 1800s and the beginning of the 1900s is the reason that the nightjars are no longer found on the north part of the island.
_	The district's location on a lake bluff is likely to be the reason that it has survived; many similar sites likely once existed along nearby beaches and ridges, but they have likely been destroyed by the expansion of Erie and its suburbs and by quarrying for sand and gravel.
_	This is part of the reason that Erythnul is called the Many.
_	Swedish ambassador Karl-Ivan Westman wrote that the Soviet-minded "Sextuples", the far-left Social Democrats, were the reason that parliament couldn't be trusted in foreign policy questions.
_	Cross engaged in another round of redundancies in April 2009, giving the reason that the global recession has been deeper than had been planned for.
_	Cross made further redundancies in October 2012, giving the reason that their quarterly results were not as good as they had planned for.
_	This obviously hurt him and that, together with some other disappointments with the service in 1910, was the reason that he applied for retirement early in 1911, at 58 years of age, still in the prime of his life.
_	He explained that the reason that he denied his original "yaocho" claims was because the Japan Sumo Association promised to pay him retirement money if he did, and that they later reneged on this agreement (the Sumo Association has denied any such agreement ever taking place).
_	He suggested a co-operative way for creating the collection guide among library committee, field specialist, as well as authors, for the reason that “no one person living unites in himself the wisdom necessary to make the best notes on all the books of the library”, and “not one but many minds must contribute to the work [of book selection].”
_	But it does not end there; further special attention to fruits, vegetables, pulses and oilseeds are a must to increase its production and productivity levels, for the reason that first Green Revolution did not pay any heed to the same.
_	It is for the reason that a parish was established dedicated to the Saint Rose of Lima as the patroness.
_	Tacitus claims that Poppaea was the reason that Nero murdered his mother.
_	No by-election was held for the seat of Havelock, vacated in 1983 upon the passing away of Minister of Finance Hon Sui Sen, for the reason that the constituency will be redrawn and merged into Delta constituency.
_	This is due to the Nightwatcher using tactics like Raph's and due to the reason that Donnie believes that the team still exists where as Raph does not.
_	In his "", Jason Elliot records that Afghan villagers believed that "Mir Samir could not be climbed by man", which was the reason that foreigners who had tried had not succeeded.
_	That's part of footy in London, so don’t let that be the reason that you don’t give it a go.
_	This can be explained by the reason that all the Canadian top athletes were preparing for the Olympics in Salt Lake City and didn't go to the National Championship Allround.
_	This is precisely the reason that the Army spent considerable effort on making Jupiter mobile, in order to make surprise attacks difficult without prior aerial reconnaissance missions.
_	Perhaps this was the reason that he gave up folk bands, and became a film producer.
_	In Nautilus, Vanille reveals herself to Sazh as a l'Cie from Pulse, and indirectly the reason that Dajh was turned into a l'Cie.
_	Results show that the reason that there is seldom supplier providing a cooperative advertising program to his manufacturer is that his unit profit margin is too low.
_	On Tuesdays, the format changed to the "Little Big Payoff" in which children sent in a letter in which they voiced the reason that they should appear.
_	In his opinion, this is the reason that he's maintained his career; the music never sounds dated.
_	It was probably the reason that the civilized world did not protest against these deportations..."
_	However, according to rail historians John F. Bromley and Jack May, the reason that the Yonge subway was built to the streetcar gauge, was that between 1954 and 1965, subway bogies were maintained at the Hillcrest Complex where the streetcar gauge is used for shop tracks.
_	Part of the reason that he's so good and so effective is that the guys like playing with him.
_	It has been conjectured that his forthright views were the reason that he was never selected to play any representative cricket.
_	Although the website is a reliable source, it does not summarize the highest grosses of all time for the reason that its scope is limited to the Metro Manila Film Festival, an annual event during December to January.
_	In 2003, the selling of the SWP's in-house printing press, for which they give the reason that it was outdated technology that was too expensive to replace, forced them to find new printers for the magazine; Warners Midlands plc.
_	Hannibal was the reason that Carlos, his son, has the scar on his face today.
_	The name "Capo Colonne" (graecicized "Kavokolones") is reported from the 17th century, for the reason that unusually, several columns of the temple of Poseidon had remained standing since antiquity.
_	He blames Ambar for being the reason that he can't have Vaidehi when suddenly he sees Vaidehi from the corner of his eye.
_	These properties are the reason that SSL is an excellent emulsifier for fat-in-water emulsions and can also function as a humectant.
_	In the meantime, Churchill tried to promote the advantages of the conflict, such as the possibility of territorial gains in the Middle East (the reason that would ultimately bring Italy and Balkans nations like Greece into the war).
_	The fact that wolves are pack animals with cooperative social structures may have been the reason that the relationship developed.
_	This fact and the reason that the Seminario-colegios were not what the church meant them to be, moved the late Pope to exert all the means available to restore the Seminaries to their purpose.
_	It was reported that a disagreement between head coach Chuck Fairbanks and Rucker about being placed on injured reserve, was the reason that led the Patriots to trade him to the Cleveland Browns on January 28, 1975, in exchange for a fourth-round draft choice (#86-Allen Carter).
_	That was the reason that he borrowed the name of the Sacred Band of Thebes.
_	The Tour organisation gave the reason that Cipollini had never been able to finish the race.
_	It is thought that this low profile was the reason that the 845 anti-Buddhist edict ignored Islam.
_	This is the reason that iron ore is preferred in the form of pellets rather than in the form of finer particles.
_	These technical issues are the reason that the Stone–von Neumann theorem is formulated in terms of the Weyl relations.
_	It is due to the reason that world gold demand is mainly driven by Indians and its price is fixed by Indians in Indian rupees.
_	According to the national director of public relations for Little League at the time, Robert Stirrat, safety was the reason that girls were not allowed to play in the Little League.
_	Part of the reason that al-Jazzar chose Acre as his headquarters was that the city's citadel provided him a more strategic advantage over Sidon in the event of a potential dismissal by the Ottoman authorities from his post; the central Ottoman authorities replaced provincial governors relatively quickly, either out of fear that a prolonged reign would lead to a governor's rebellion or in pursuit of bribes that aspiring governors often paid to gain appointment.
_	The society had 31 members, most of whom were still general surgeons with an interest in orthopaedics; this lack of committed orthopaedic surgeons is likely to have been the reason that the society disbanded after 4 years.
_	This complicated origin is the reason that some sources list "Young Men" #24 as this character's first appearance, when in fact this, and subsequent 1950s-published Captain America stories, was clearly created with the intention of depicting the original Captain America.
_	This is the reason that nuclear reprocessing is a useful activity: spent nuclear fuel contains about 96% of the original fissionable material present in newly manufactured nuclear fuel.
_	Later, the reason that the moon was not as bright as the sun was explained by a tale, known as "The Contendings of Horus and Seth".
_	When Betty tells her the reason that she didn't want Hilda working with her, Hilda assures her that she's not interested in stealing her sister's spotlight and offers an apology for not telling Betty about the phone call.
_	The SPD chairman, Sigmar Gabriel, however, stated that the reason that Die Linke was the only party that did not support Gauck was its "sympathy for the German Democratic Republic."
_	Part of the reason that Doro has so much control is because he determines whether one lives or dies.
_	He regained his form and was an important part of the reason that Colo-Colo would win three straight championships from 1996-1998.
_	This possibility is the reason that most network protocols that include a CRC do so "before" the ending delimiter; it is not necessary to know whether the end of the packet is imminent to check the CRC.
_	This may well be the reason that Hausdorff did not feel at ease at Leipzig.
_	Part of the reason that The Drifters' version of "White Christmas" was less controversial was because that version was played only on black radio stations.
_	Man, as I have hinted before, naturally loves to imitate what he sees others do, which is the reason that savage People all do the same thing:
_	This explains that the reason that most of the "mitzvot" of Judaism involve action is their metaphysical role in achieving the redemption of the hidden divinity in creation.
_	Calling it "the grand depositum" of the Methodist faith, Wesley specifically taught that the propagation of the doctrine of entire sanctification was the reason that God raised up the Methodists in the world.
_	Furness expressed her philosophy of never declining a job, and she believed it was the reason that she progressed through such an unconventional series of professions.
_	D'Arc argues that the reason that such portrayals became sparse in the 1930s was the introduction of the Hays and later Breen regulatory codes, which sharply curtailed the portrayal of polygamy in movies.
_	A nail also was found in the front wheel of McCall’s car and was the reason that he had tire trouble that night.
_	Stephen Mullaney provides insight into the reason that Mary Wroth's work survived by stating, "What comes to reside in a wonder-cabinet are, in the most reified sense of the phrase, strange things: tokens of alien cultures, reduced to the status of sheer objects, stripped of cultural and human contexts in a way that makes them eminently capable of surviving the period that thus produced them".
_	That is the reason that Tafahi is now where it is.
_	Piacenza was ruled by Spanish Bourbons like in Sicily and Naples but the reason that the region has uses Spanish suits is because French occupying forces brought Aluette decks in the late 18th century.
_	The word is formed from "aubain", a foreigner, which Gilles Ménage derived further from the Latin "alibi natus"; Jacques Cujas derived from "advena"; and du Cange from "albanus", a Scot or Irishman, by the reason that these were anciently frequent travelers living abroad.
_	A large number of horror clichés were used, but the reason that these clichés are present is subsequently revealed.
_	It is said that the reason that a Supreme is so powerful is because she is the physical embodiment of many or all powers.
_	SarDesai said that the mixed origins of Vietnamese people explains the reason that Vietnamese people have in common a variety of animistic beliefs, which are common to all peoples who are Austro-Indonesian.
_	This policy was part of the reason that the PDA ran into the financial difficulties that led to its dealings with the Urban Group.
_	We often endeavored to advise him and to tell him of the danger he was in with his Soldiers; but he never appeared pleased with us, & that was the reason that a great many of our Warriors left him & would not be under his Command.""
_	Six members of the committee resigned in June 2017, citing as the reason that the president, "has no strategy to address the ongoing HIV/AIDS epidemic, seeks zero input from experts to formulate HIV policy, and—most concerning—pushes legislation that will harm people living with HIV and halt or reverse important gains made in the fight against this disease".
_	The steep cliffs and loose rocks are the reason that the Sunken City beach is fenced off from the public.
_	This was due to the reason that the Kings never maintained a standing army instead had a Royal Guard during peace time and formed a militia in wartime.
_	At the beginning of the fourth season, Richard and Adele declare that his work is the reason that their marriage has failed and separate.
_	They believe Israelis to be prejudiced towards them and see in them the reason that their chances of achieving integration are low: ‘You feel betrayed and are called ‘n-gger’.
_	Rich explained, "The cool thing about V2, the reason that we chose them, is that they told us, 'You guys go make the record you want to make.
_	On the first days of August 2017, the deputies of Cortés Fátima Mena and Anibal Cálix has decided to join as deputies of the Innovation and Unity party, based on the reason that they don´t want to be members of the Anticorruption Party led now by congresswoman Marlene Alvarenga.
_	With the exception of the 1973 elections, the reason that elections were not held on the nominal date was that the election date was advanced, and as previously stated, in 1973 the elections were delayed due to a war.
_	Many pundits remarked after the season that the lop-sided loss to Iowa was the reason that Ohio State was not part of the College Football Playoff, even though the Buckeyes ended the season as the B1G Champ.
_	The sale price of $8.4 million was notably low, for the reason that Hull hopes to use it to get a lower property valuation, and thus lower taxes.
_	It was ultimately revealed that the reason that Amanda Waller even kept the heroes such as Nightshade around, was in order for them to act as her conscience.
_	He later wrote in his memoir that "the reason that I got do to all those stage announcements was because of my relationship with Chip Monk [sic].
_	These people have claimed that the wetness liner is the reason that their children have gotten rashes in the genital area.
_	It also is perhaps part of the reason that this language currently holds the status of “developing” on the EGID scale as mentioned above, as transmission of a language to children of the culture is vital to its survival.
_	This is the same prayer posture used by the Christian hesychasts and is the reason that they were mocked by their opponents as "navel gazers" (omphalopsychites).
_	The opinion that the name of the midrash finds its explanation in the first words, "Rabbi Hosha'yah rabbah began . . . " as if the word "rabbah" belonged originally to the name of the amora, and that the name of the work, "Genesis Rabba," is an abbreviation of "Bereshit derabbi Hoshayah rabbah," is untenable for the reason that in the best manuscripts — and in a very old quotation — the name "Rabbi Hoshayah" stands without the addition "rabbah" in the first preface at the beginning of the midrash.
_	This list contains only the films that are already released to the general public, and no films that are still in production, post-production or just announced films, for the reason that these costs can still change in the production process.
_	Due to the reason that the starting exponents are integers, the Frobenius series are power series.
_	Yet their petition was denied for the reason that they could not meet the required number of 500 tributes or taxpayers.
_	That was the reason that originated its first name, Club Atlético Libertarios Unidos, naming José Garrone as its first president.
_	The book follows Wang Ruohai’s (汪若海) established principle that “three soldiers become five when roped together with a leather thong”, believing this to be the reason that the Jin army was able to triumph in every encounter with their enemies.
_	On 7 December 2004, the Belgian Minister of Economic Affairs, Marc Verwilghen, stated that no Council decision would be taken until 2005 "for the reason that the qualified majority does not exist anymore".
_	This is the reason that after the move to the present location in 1913, the museum took on the name of Frans Hals as these were considered the most prominent paintings of the collection at the time.
_	There the union of all men together, those of superior, middle, and inferior rank, was called the people; for all are necessary, and none can be excepted, for the reason that they are obliged to assist one another in order to live properly and be protected and supported.
_	These winds may have been the reason that the fire then blew across the border into northeast Florida.
_	In explaining why the game has only been re-released once despite apparent interest in the title, Eno has stated that: "It's been several years now, and of course the contract probably isn't valid anymore, but the reason that I haven't done anything with this game is that I made this promise with Sega back in the day, and it's exclusive because of those conditions."
_	He gave the reason that it had been a hard season, but the real reason was that his wife was dying of cancer and he wanted to spend his time with her.
_	He speculates that this ability is the reason that he is 'chosen' for his role in the first and second books, although he notes in "Perelandra" that it might as well have been anyone else.
_	Though Rand rejected the notion that individuals have duty towards one another, her heroes are marked by an essential generosity, for the reason that they act out of compassion and empathy rather than guilt.
_	In July 2016, the deputy of the independent group Yenny Murillo has decided to return to the National Party of Honduras, with the reason that she is feeling changes in the form of life in Honduras, also had said that she is in favour of the reelection but with a regulation that will be established on the Constitution of the Republic, to limit how many times a president can be reelected.
_	In 2005/06, when the team participated in the First Division, they were not allowed to use Pegeia Stadium, for the reason that the stadium does not satisfy the criteria of First Division and the team used for home the Pafiako Stadium.
_	"If the lawyer acknowledges, with the reason that my brother (Giambattista) was the one who made the types, reply him that Bodoni didn't engrave any type.
_	It has a large water tank all-around it and this is the reason that the Bhuteshvara temple is also recognized as Rani Talab.
_	This was the reason that he murdered her.
_	During the campaign, Trump said of the European Union, "the reason that it got together was like a consortium so that it could compete with the United States."
_	It is speculated that this is the reason that there are so many cats in Japan with short tails nowadays, because natural selection has favored those with short tails.
_	As a result of this, there has been no restriction on the exploitation of the story by film producers, which is the reason that most of these films share no continuity, were produced by different companies, and tell widely varying stories.
_	This connexion may be the reason that the Dahns were initially employed as imperial "ministeriales" and then increasingly as "ministeriales" to the bishop.
_	It must not be inferred from this, however, that Yost does not know the game from the ground up – merely that any move he makes is absorbingly interesting for the reason that something fancy is apt to develop from it without notice to or benefit of clergy for his opponent.
_	Higher viscosity will retard the phenomenon, and that is the reason that the addition of sugar will create a better foam.
_	The episode was originally intended to have been produced during the series' third season, thus the reason that Sugara former storyboard artist on the show who had left after working on the earlier episode "Simon & Marcy"was credited for having co-written the episode's story.
_	His youth and appealing demeanor as the all-American face of "not guilty" are cited by Ron as the reason that Tom (rather than Ron himself) should lead most trial representations.
_	This vast overspend was the reason that the Lancaster canal was never joined to the main canal network – there wasn’t enough money for the planned aqueduct over the River Ribble at the southern end of the canal.
_	Preobrazhensky, he renounced his support for the Left Opposition, citing the reason that Joseph Stalin's rise would have meant the application of much of the Left's recommended policies, and that the dangers the Soviet state faced, from the outside as well as from within, required their "return to the Party".
_	Livorno lighthouse, called Fanale dei Pisani, for the reason that was built by Pisans in 1303 on project attributed to Giovanni Pisano and by the master builders Rocco Entello De Spina and Bonaggiunta Ciabatti whose names were found engraved on a stone.
_	However, that usage was not the reason that the stone was named a "pier", because the surveyor who erected it had already used that term himself.
_	The chamber examined evidence on 21 March and placed Ampon under detention again in the course of the trial, citing the reason that "The act against the King, Queen and Heir Apparent is of serious nature affecting the sentiment of all Thais."
_	In 1925 part of the roof collapsed, blocking the line, and this was part of the reason that this section of line closed prematurely.
_	She told one interviewer, speaking for women in the circus in general, that "the domestic instinct is very strong among circus women, for the reason that they are deprived of home life a great part of every year.
_	The reputation of the school in Busan is relatively high, and many students choose the school for the reason that they can study with excellent students.
_	According to Erik Stover, Red Bulls managing director at the time, Harrison Redevelopment Agency chairman Peter B. Higgins was "quite simply the reason that the New York Red Bulls have a new home in Harrison.
_	Then one day Lavanya reveals her passion for the name of "Mahesh" and she reveals the reason that she loves him because his name is Mahesh.
_	However, Congress may tax goods not in transit even though they are intended for export so long as the tax is not imposed "solely for" the reason that the good will be exported.
_	It is unclear if the reason that no coins were minted with his name was his short term of office or a change in policy towards the Archbishop of Canterbury minting coins in his own name.
_	For the reason that most of the data traveling through the Internet is routed through neighbor countries, because of the nature of the Internet to connect people and data, a bigger area than a national wide one would be more reasonable.
_	Due to the reason that he worked as a designer in an advertising company, he often provided artworks such as the front cover of cassette "Goodbye Ideal" (再見理想) (1986), the clothing design of "Beyond LIVE" (生命接觸演唱會) (1991).
_	The District Court was not in agreement with his argument and denied his motion for the reason that racial segregation is a "deeply rooted social policy of the State of Oklahoma."
_	Professor Troy, Spike and Goose - Professor Troy is a talented scientist who wants to find out the history of Quetso and Illoka, and the reason that it sank.
_	Also in the final week of September 2016, the deputy of the independent group Kritza Pérez has decided finally to be a member of the Liberal Party of Honduras based on the reason that in his first party PAC, they don´t allow the pluralism of ideas and discrimination against women that they have announced several times on the national media.
_	Eusebius gives the reason that Thamphthis was not meant to be named, for he "didn't do something worth to be mentioned".
_	It is also believed that these "unproductive disputes" and Fisher's "stubborn insistence" might be the reason that the concept of confidence distribution has been long misconstrued as a fiducial concept and not been fully developed under the frequentist framework.
_	Narada had informed Kamsa that his birth was the result of a rape of his mother by a gandharva, called Dramila, and that was the reason that Kamasa's mother disliked her son and had cursed that he would be killed by a member of his own family.
_	Having been granted papal rights from Avignon was perhaps the reason that the ties to Rome were never very strong in Haarlem, since the building most commonly called the "Cathedral" in the centre of town only held a cathedra for 19 years, from 1559 to 1578.
_	Antonio Villaraigosa, mayor of Los Angeles, announced an eviction order deadline of Monday morning, November 28, at 12:01 a.m., giving the reason that "It is time to close the park and repair the grounds so that we can restore public access to the park."
_	The big limitation of the plans was the reason that the original plans were cancelled is the I-75 trumpet interchange, which narrows to one lane on three of the four ramps to and from the interstate.
_	While alone, Don asks Mona about the reason that she is cold-blooded, and if it was due to her upbringing.
_	This erosion processes is the reason that very few remaining craters are visible on Earth.
_	Priyanka to leave the house, stating that she was the reason that Yashodhara came back.
_	This is due to the reason that branching out to make connections will create bonds and pathways for companies to extend into other markets which they can receive more exposure.
_	"Usually, the reason that USTR fails is that it doesn't really try," he said.
_	The judge did not accept the charges for the reason that the Raëlians were not attacking the whole of the Catholic Church.
_	This valuable work is the reason that journalists are being silenced, and it is also the reason that - despite the difficulties involved - the federal government must step up and bring those responsible for crimes against the media to justice."
_	It mostly came together in the studio and I think that's the reason that the sound is a bit more similar between songs - there's a lot more ties between them, similarities.
_	After the win, Nilsson announced his retirement from Submission Wrestling with the reason that he wanted to focus more on his MMA career and his family.
_	For weeks Lulu sinks into depression and blames Dante for the reason that they lost Connie.
_	On 23 February 2017, the Electoral Commission rejected the application for registration with the reason that the proposed party name would "likely to mislead voters as to the effect of their vote", as the name is the same as that of a partnership of local health and social care organisations.
_	Since childhood, he wanted to direct his own films, stating that ""Star Wars" is definitely the reason that I wanted to become a filmmaker".
_	This unequal pay is part of the reason that many women are the ones to leave the workforce when it is determined that a stay-at-home parent is required; if women are contributing less to the household income, it will make less of an impact if they quit their jobs.
_	Part of the reason that Dr. Mallard and he are often not at the crime scene until well after Gibbs and his team arrive is related to Dr. Mallard's emphasis on Jimmy being a horrible driver and always getting lost, although Jimmy tries to defend himself by pointing out that Ducky is the one with the map.
_	Hormesis: In 2006 Dr. Mattson proposed that the reason that vegetables, fruits, tea and coffee can improve brain health is that they contain ‘noxious’ chemicals that are produced by the plants to protect themselves from being eaten by insects and other organisms.
_	However, the greatest problem, and the reason that MYCIN was not used in routine practice, was the state of technologies for system integration, especially at the time it was developed.
_	Part of the reason that Silva delved into the topic of art theft was the realization of the impact it has on the art world.
_	There are but few swamps or bog meadows, for the reason that the surface is tilted this, that, and every way, but valuable intervales lie along the brooks and rivers.
_	Cut to the present, Bashya reveals to Shankar that it was Amar who killed Santosh for the reason that the latter pursued Amar's sister.
_	He added, "Vascodigama is likeable for the reason that it does an encouraging job through entertainment".
_	The freedom to marry and to live in marriage is doubtless the reason that cardinals who were not in major orders were popularly, though inaccurately, referred to as lay cardinals.
_	That is the reason that
_	Part of the reason that the Narrows are so notable is because they have a downward gradient of over 100 feet per mile.
_	"I ran my eye over them and then handed him the one I liked best...He said he preferred that one himself for the reason that it was shorter and more expressive.
_	Nourishing a beach that has little submerged sand requires understanding of the reason that the submerged sand is missing.
_	PLEX is the reason that the cost of in-game assets can be translated into real-life money.
_	He inquired about the reason that the Diamond Sutra was chanted, and the person stated that he came from the Eastern Meditation Monastery in Huangmei District of the province of Qi, where the Fifth Patriarch of Chan lived and delivered his teachings.
_	For the reason that Jack White repeatedly denied all these accusations after several months of costly trials the lawsuit ended up in a settlement in 1994.
_	A British school decided to send 60 students showing up in treggings home on the reason that the clothing was too tight to be worn as trousers.
_	He doesn't play much anymore, which is certainly a shame, because he's my mentor, and he's the reason that Fleetwood Mac became what we became."
_	However this place was not intended for such a use, for the reason that its wall isn't closed and could never have been built for that use.
_	This is the reason that an optional reference detector should be placed after the excitation monochromator or filter.
_	The staff of the school is dedicated and hardworking and that is the reason that the institute is progressing day by day.
_	The area became a residential area chiefly due to the reason that the water was potable.
_	This is thought to be the reason that this species will modify its strike precision according to prey size as strikes at large prey will be directed at either the head or neck to prevent them from biting back.
_	Persistence of vision, which is popularly taught as the reason for motion illusion, is in reality merely the reason that the black spaces that come between each "real" movie frame are not perceived, which makes the phi phenomenon the true reason for motion illusion in cinema and animation, including the phenakistoscope, zoetrope, and others.
_	One of the first delegations of American educators who rose to prominence in the Philippines arrived on a ship called the "Thomas," which is the reason that the American teachers became known as the Thomasites.
_	Out of all these titles, he preferred to single out "Vicarius Filii Dei", used in the "Donation of Constantine", for the reason that it met "all the conditions [that] [Cardinal] Bellarmine had thus far demanded."
_	However, military authorities prohibited any Christian sect activity in Artsakh, for the reason that they would preach pacifism among population.
_	It says, briefly, that if we introduce several instances of green as separate individuals, we nevertheless have to accept that the reason that we group them together is because they are similar.
_	It also is perhaps part of the reason that this language currently holds the status of “developing” on the EGID scale as mentioned above, as transmission of a language to children of the culture is vital to its survival.
_	Mattson also proposed that the reason that vegetables, fruits, tea and coffee can improve brain health is that they contain 'noxious' chemicals that are produced by the plants to protect themselves from being eaten by insects and other organisms.
_	At a dinner held in his honor in 1927, Healy was lauded by United States Secretary of Labor James J. Davis, who asserted that "No labor leader has ever had more friend than Healy for the reason that he has given labor a new dignity, a new title to public respect."
_	A German report stated: "The executions in Kragujevac occurred although there had been no attacks on members of the Wehrmacht in this city, for the reason that not enough hostages could be found elsewhere."
_	According to the Dominican, Guañameñe would have prophesied these facts a century before the arrival of the Castilians in 1494, and was the reason that the mencey of Taoro ordered the rest of Guanche kings to notify him if any foreigner arrived on the shores of the Island, something that the one of Güímar did when appearing on its beaches the image of the Virgin of Candelaria.
_	According to a press release on Carter-Ruck's website the reason that "The Guardian" could not report the question asked by Paul Farrelly was because a gagging order had been in place since 11 September 2009, before the MP asked the question.
_	It was also the reason that the group was not very visible after the war.
_	Milton mistakenly thinks the reason that Roy isn't keen on his wonderful business idea is lack of funds and tells Sylvia that's easily solved.
_	Lakshmi tells them the reason that she came in the hostel.
_	His mother's lesson to be proud of his native heritage is the reason that during his hall of fame induction speech, he decided to bring light to the issue.
_	The House of Lords refused leave to hear the appeal, citing the reason that the case "does not raise an arguable point of law of general public importance".
_	Brookings Institution fellow Benjamin Wittes went further in the pages of the "New Republic", claiming Haynes's memo "the reason that the military, unlike the CIA, never waterboarded anybody."
_	It is part of the reason that the score is, as Andrews describes, so simple.
_	Ironically, the inclusion of "science" in the title was the reason that science fiction writer Isaac Asimov began reading the magazine; when he saw the August 1929 issue he obtained permission to read it from his father on the grounds that it was clearly educational.
_	The game is also arguably the reason that EA Sports Big was introduced in the year 2000 as several other titles were created around the design and gameplay of the original "Sled Storm" .
_	Opponents of holding non-binding plebiscites include monarchist David Flint, who described this process as "inviting a vote of no confidence in one of the most successful constitutions in the world," and minimalist republican Greg Craven, who states "a multi-option plebiscite inevitably will produce a direct election model, precisely for the reason that such a process favours models with shallow surface appeal and multiple flaws.
_	Bryan wrote, "the court will not allow a delving into any details of alleged infiltration ... for the reason that ... this would divert the jury from the issues raised in the indictment."
_	He also said the reason that he pounds his chest and points up is that he has a "heart for God" and as a reminder that he plays for God.
_	When given a survey of the reasons why they cohabit, most couples listed reasons such as spending more time together, convenience based reasons, and testing their relationships, while few gave the reason that they do not believe in marriage.
_	Matari Advertising is an Indonesian advertising agency which was established in 1971 with the reason that "Only Indonesian would understand and could communicate with other Indonesian", referring to the advertising industry in Indonesia which was, at that time dominated by foreign advertising companies.
_	The causal-final is a grammatical case in Hungarian (and Chuvash) expressing the meaning 'for the purpose of, for the reason that', and denoting price asked of or paid for goods.
_	His excellent performances were the reason that he gained a transfer to a bigger team.
_	Sudharani a research scholar of Garhwali drama writes, " Is natak ko dekhne sabhi jagah darshak toot pade and this was the reason that Lalit Mohan thapliyal entered in Garhwal drama taking leave from Hindi drama.
_	The combination of opposing winds, a huge supply of sand from the valley floor, and the sand recycling action of the creeks, are all part of the reason that these are the tallest dunes in North America.
_	Ultimately, this is seen as the reason that God chose to emanate His Divinity through the 10 Sephirot, and chose to create the corresponding chain of four Worlds (called the "Seder hishtalshelus"-"order of development").
_	This is the reason that Shellsort gap sequences have a larger optimal shrink factor of about 2.2.
_	This was the reason that the most famous courtesan of Stockholm, Catharina Norman, was hired in 1771 to remove the king's virginity.
_	After the end of the Balkan Wars, the Kingdom of Serbia achieved the expansion towards the south, but there was a mixed reaction to the events, for the reason that the promises of lands gaining access to the Adriatic Sea were not fulfilled.
_	They sound fantastic, but Philip stops the song and confesses publicly that he is actually the reason that the boys failed their drug test at Regionals; he used his stepmother’s home botox kit to help him hit the high notes.
_	The reasons why the Goths attacked horseless is unknown, but the suddenness of the attack seemed to be the reason that Narses fought horseless as well.
_	Understanding that this river is the reason that settlements first occurred in this region, many organizations came to together to reclaim, enhance and protect this valuable natural resource.
_	Part of the reason that this scene was so literally transcribed from the play was so that the "chessboard" effect, which would have been problematic had a real church had been used, could be retained in the film.
_	By the end of the 14th century the Zamorin conquered Thrikkanamathilakam and it became a threat for Mahodayapuram (Thiruvanchikulam), which may be the reason that Perumpadapu Swaroopam changed their capital to Cochin from Mahodayapuram.
_	This keeps the concentration of methane in the atmosphere relatively low and is the reason that it currently plays a secondary role in the greenhouse effect to carbon dioxide, despite the fact that it produces a much more powerful greenhouse effect per volume.
_	The 7th Circuit concluded that the jury had adopted the before & after method, but that this proof did not furnish a proper measure of damage for the reason that it could not be proved what petitioner's earnings would have been in the absence of the illegal distribution of films.
_	He commented: "What it revealed is that the reason that hospitals tend to fail is often much more complicated and much more difficult than just poor management".
_	Craw reported from one of the ships that the ship's captain had refused to hang any nets or lower any craft, giving the reason that his crew was not sufficiently trained to go on the expedition.
_	Part of the reason that the lift lock was built was political.
_	He is also mentioned in "The Big S.T.A.N.K", where he was the reason that S.T.A.N.K was created, to lure him to the toilet-shaped stink bomb, but the project was abandoned with the realization that dolphins don't use toilets.
_	According to Beaufoy (in an interview given to Fabric Nightclub) part of the reason that their demo cassette tape was actually listened to rather than thrown away (by 1998 cassettes had become virtually obsolete in favour of CDs) was because of their friendship with Jemma Griffiths, who worked for Marine Parade at the time.
_	Stemming from the resettlement of United Empire Loyalist after the American Revolutionary War with traditionalist conservatism views alongside pro-market liberalism ideals, is the reason that unlike the conservatives in the United States, Canadian conservatives generally prefer the Westminster system of government.
_	Securing the "Doom Bar brand" was cited as the reason that Molson Coors spent £20 million on their takeover of Sharp's Brewery in 2011; Doom Bar is now the largest cask ale brand in Molson Coors' portfolio.
_	This was the reason that the Gmöser Moor was declared to be a natural preserve in 1987.
_	For the reason that freight took priority over passengers, the Rear Air Element of the 320th remained at Wendover, and flew the squadron's C-47s to ferry necessary equipment to the base, which would be transshipped to Tinian on the C-54s.
_	The greyback cane beetle was, along with the Frenchi cane beetle, "Lepidiota frenchi", the reason that the cane toad ("Rhinella marina") was introduced into Australia.
_	These properties are the reason that SSL is an excellent emulsifier for fat-in-water emulsions and can also function as a humectant.
_	Whatever he wrote was rejected by publishers for the reason that his name was blacklisted.
_	He blames her for being the reason that he is in jail.
_	Part of the reason that he could was the escape of Charles Xavier (who now chooses to go by X, since he is now in a younger body after escaping), and now X leads the X-Men directly into an ambush, as Proteus has warped an entire village with his powers, leading to a mind-to-mind battle that leaves X on the receiving end of a psychic beatdown.
_	These differences reflect the reason that " was invented – to create a sport that was accessible to a disabled player in a wheelchair.
_	Most of them were never accused due to lack of evidence or for the reason that they were only lucky gamblers who had a hint on the results of meaningless games.
_	As such, it is an historically-significant part of the reason that the district was itself included on the National Register.
_	Inoue said that the reason that so many of Raizō’s movie posters feature an image of him from behind with his head turned to face the camera was because many directors felt that this view of him best showed off his "intriguing emptiness".
_	The male members of the cast seemed to enjoy their roles, perhaps for the reason that it is a man's picture; the laugh seems on the ladies."
_	Set in the backdrop of snow-covered mountains, the lake, like its neighbours, is famous for a variety of high Andean waterfowl, particularly flamingos (mostly white for the reason that algae that creates the pink colour is comparatively less in the lake waters), and other bird species such as ducks and the Andean goose, and herds of vicuña are also reported.
_	In an interview with "USA Today" in October 2009, Damon Lindelof stated: "You'll be hard-pressed to find a huger fan of "The Dark Tower" than me, but that's probably the reason that I shouldn't be the one to adapt it.
_	Whatever the reason that Renaissance style never became popular in Sicily, it was certainly not ignorance.
_	As to the reason that he doesn't trust the "bigger" dinosaurs is that they, in his opinion, only seem to think: "Because they're bigger, it makes them more important".
_	This operation was the reason that Corporal Lauwers was given the Bronze Star.
_	"Louis Marshall is largely the reason that everyone from the college is here today.
_	Architects have pronounced against it in their plans and specifications ... for the reason that architecture must have a change of style and material the same as millinery and tailoring.
_	This is the reason that visitors are offered much more information about the paintings than about other aspects of the building, including the objects in the courtyard.
_	The failure of an Iowa film production tax credit reportedly is the reason that the film was shot in Ann Arbor, Michigan, rather than on location in Cedar Rapids, Iowa, itself.
_	The complicated nature of these balancing procedures is the reason that automatic solutions are gaining traction, because it reduces or eliminates the need for complicated balancing procedures.
_	With regard to Esselstyn's claims, Nancy Brown, CEO of the American Heart Association, said: "Diet alone is not going to be the reason that heart attacks are eliminated."
_	However, Todd vows revenge on the pair, for not turning up to lunch at the bistro, as he thinks that they are the reason that he was attacked.
_	Consequently, Ramsey filed a claim through the grievance procedure, believing that race was a determining factor for the reason that she was singled out by her employer to perform a task outside of her job description.
_	They lived in the mountainous region between the core Hittite region in eastern Anatolia and the Black Sea, and are cited as the reason that the later Hittite empire never extended northward to that area.
_	They looked like feathery arms, and they are the reason that crinoid are often called sea lilies.
_	(Some sources mistakenly state that his father was a Yemeni Jew whose family had settled in Jerusalem at the beginning of the 20th century; according to Halevi's brother Marc, when Halevi went to Israel "he obtained a passport with the testimony of a Yemenite residing there – the reason that this origin is sometimes given as his.")
_	John is hurt when he discovers that the reason that Mr. and Mrs. Holmes did not attend Sherlock's funeral was because Sherlock had told them, unlike John, that he was alive.
_	Researchers are beginning to attribute the reason that only 5% of anti-cancer agents are approved by the Food and Drug Administration after pre-clinical testing to the lack of tumor heterogeneity and the absence of the human stromal microenvironment.
_	During October 2007, Rajko Ljubić has, in production of Radio-Subotica, directed a radio drama, made after the scenario of Matija Poljaković "Č'a Bonina razgala", mostly with amateur actors (mostly for the reason that at that time there were no Croat professional actors in Subotica).
_	B.K. Roberts in his book "The Making of the English Village", suggests the reason that large numbers of villages have been laid out in regular pattern in Durham and Yorkshire, was through a restructuring at a single point in time, as opposed to natural settlement growth.
_	Decades later he was also the reason that the team returned, when they received electronic signals telling them that he was still alive and that the evils they had rid Mars of were returning.
_	Or perhaps, the reason that a certain evaporite zone has dissolved, is because of underlying faults in the bedrock.
_	On March 15, 1806, DeWitt Clinton offered a resolution in the Senate for the expulsion of Ebenezer Purdy for the reason that he had been bribed and that he had attempted to bribe Stephen Thorn and Obadiah German during the controversial chartering of the Merchant's Bank of New York during the previous session.
_	All seems wonderful, until she discovers that the reason that the hospital was abandoned was a series of murders in the 1940s by a strange "shrieking killer" who was never captured - and the discovery that someone who's living in the hospital is using occult means to bring back the demonic "Shrieker".
_	Love enacted the lawsuit for the reason that Murry never credited him for approximately 35 of the songs he had co-written with Brian, and, therefore, Love had also lost out on royalties.
_	On 26 January, François Fillon appeared on TF1 to respond to allegations of the fictitious employment of his wife, stating that she had "edited my speeches" and "stood in for me at events when I couldn’t be there", also claiming that the reason that she was never seen working in the Palais Bourbon was because "she was never on the front line."
_	The authors of this study suggest that the reason that this finding is limited to fussy infants could be because difficult children may be more susceptible to both the positive and the negative effects of their rearing environments than non-difficult children.
_	Bonfire night is a major annual celebration across the whole of England, but it is likely that the reason that the West Country Carnival was originally so keenly celebrated is that the South West towns were predominantly Protestant – hence the celebration of Robert Parsons' (and Guy Fawkes') failure.
_	This might be the reason that the government has decided to use 'net worth' to measure size of companies.
